The thread where everyone is discussing which U.S. president would win in an arena knife fight.
Will never be topped for me.
I'd say I am. I make cocktails for everyone. I help them recognise that they do actually like tequila.
I fascinate people with cocktail history.
I certainly don't slap lite beer out of someone's hand and call them a pussy who drinks shit water.
I ask them what they've had that they liked and I make them a cocktail they've never had, which often blows their mind, and opens up their world to reveal one outside of lite beer.
I also usually drink too much and hit on moms. General life of the party stuff. <3
Thank you. You must like Martinis.
This'll probably get buried, but I've wanted to rant about this for a long time.
Fucking. vodka. martinis.
"Hello, I'd like a bucket of tasteless chemicals that make me drunk please."
Whiskey has subtlety. Ordering scotch or bourbon says 'i have patiently curated a taste for something with an incredible depth of complexity.'
Wine. Cocktails - which I build with fresh ingredients I've juiced, that are bloody fantastic. Craft beer. Same.
All of those things say "i enjoy variety and uncertainty, trying new things, and experiencing my sense of taste. "
All of it has subtlety, complexity, and is part of a taste experience. People who order those, actually live life. Take it in, experience it.
Vodka martinis? They say you've curated a taste for shit.
"Hi, I don't like to experience shit, I like a bucket of poison that gives me the least hangover, that's the easiest for me to hold my nose and suck down, and is cost effective. "
Why are you alive?! To make more humans and pass on the money you've made? Just to eat sleep piss and bang, and forget tough things once in a while through chemicals? Or are you alive to experience the world?!
Then order a gin martini, at least there's something to taste.
Same goes for lite beer. You've curated a taste for shitty water, and you're too much of a pussy to try something outside your comfort zone.
YEA I SAID IT 90% OF DRINKERS OUT THERE, COME FOR ME. COME AND GET ME LITE BEER DRINKERS AVA VODKA MARTINI DRINKERS, I'LL BE WAITING to give you a taste of something so much better and you'll never look back, if only you're patient enough to try. ;)
A library is an incredibly apt metaphor, especially since they burned the best one in the ancient world, and that's exactly what dropping net neutrality would do.
This is our burning of the library of Alexandria.
Since the internet came on, the entirety of human knowledge has been at our fingertips, a giant hub of information and commerce. All the world's information... All for the price of access to the library.
And now, they want to turn that library into a maze of fees and profit for them.
My dad just went in for his last cancer treatment and got to ring the bell on his way out.
The man's been ill for six years, I don't even know what to do with myself.
"Regulatory capture is a form of government failure that occurs when a regulatory agency, created to act in the public interest, instead advances the commercial or political concerns of special interest groups that dominate the industry or sector it is charged with regulating.[1] When regulatory capture occurs, the interests of firms or political groups are prioritized over the interests of the public, leading to a net loss to society as a whole. Government agencies suffering regulatory capture are called "captured agencies".
Lol prostitution. Pay the "extra toll " wink wink
Werd. The French revolution was actually organized by a bunch of upper middle crust lawyers who thought monarchy was kind of a shitty way to run a country, and mobilized the really pissed off and, yes, starving, peasantry.
Antionette and the rest didn't stand a chance.
Edit: werdzing
Edit 2: Yea then the average heighted Napoleon had to come and fuck it up.
This. This one of the most frustrating, but fascinating, misconceptions in history.
If you took a cave child born 80,000 years ago and raised it today, it would be indistinguishable from a modern human (barring accrued microbial and alcohol resistances).
Homo Sapien means "thinking man."
We've been able to think at the same level of complexity for almost 100,000 years - only, only writing has launched us beyond by allowing every generation to not have to start from scratch.
If she doesn't answer your texts, she's not romantically interested.
Oh that's what you think.
Until the wrong person comes at you when those dogs are around, trust me.
They'll lick something, and it'll be the cold dead corpse of whoever tried to fuck with their beloved owner's stuff or family.
Its easy to forget what they're capable of when you're lucky enough to be loved by them.
No no you guys are screwing up!
Yogurt topper. Granola topper. Salad topper.
Delightful crunch and stupendous super food.
But never just eat them plain. Just like greek yogurt. Always add.
Man I need to get me some nibs.
Had a handsome straight friend in a long term relationship come with us to the gay club dancing one night. He liked dancing.
You wouldn't believe how much he suddenly understood.
"I'm sorry I'm just trying to dance with my friends right now."
Don't forget jails are actually really lucrative. You get a federal "funding" paycheck per inmate in a privatized prison.
Oh man, I'm leaving today for Connecticut, where I'll be running a live adventure game booth all weekend with one of my best friends. Their renaissance faire asked me to be a partner in the game and I couldn't be more fucking excited.
All sportsball must be played in the duck shoes.
The ones that quack when you walk.
Being a hipster...?
I made a website & project to watch the AFI's list of 100 greatest movies of all time because I agree so whole heartedly with this!
I haven't been keeping up with it much because, life, and lack of interest, and net neutrality.
But I'm thrilled to see I wasn't crazy to start it, older movies are in a class all their own. Some really amazing stuff.
No enthusiastic sex for your super strong bad guy destroying ass.
Better listen to tenacious D on repeat.
They had tracked a dragon back to its lair and killed it's minions, but the dragon itself was out hunting at the time.
They then, instead of lying in ambush, decide "oh... Well ok, we shove all the treasure into our bag of holding, leave, and cast earthquake to fuck up its lair."
...
"You sure you want to do that?"
"Lolol yea."
Aaaand that's how the third dragon war started.
I'm not sure what the raging dragon death toll of innocent people was after they left, but it was way too high, especially when they proceeded to sell off different bits of this dragon treasure in various cities.
The Mayweather Magregor fight, said the time traveler.
Well historically speaking, King Leopold III of Belgium fell in love with a prostitute, hard, and lavished the state's wealth and gifts upon her for like 5 straight years.
The whole time she was still with her "pimp" and they both ran off to the French Riviera afterward, taking as much as they could.
Read King Leopold's Ghost. Colonial era history was pretty fucked.
Fuck bottled water in general.
George Carlin did a bit decades ago when bottled water was new. Said he wondered how companies convinced people to buy something they get for free.
We've been able to pipe water places since 200 AD. What a great hustle.
She's working to support a 4 person household and has since age 16, unable to go to college, unable to take vacations, shouldering a 40 year old adult's responsibilities solo.
I mean.  She handles it.  But her quality of life is nowhere near where it should be.
Thank you for the clarification. Will keep you guys updated.
I cannot thank you enough for that clarification.
>if he's not in violation of the law or a court order, he's not doing anything wrong.
I would argue that "in violation of the law" and "wrong" are two different things.
And he is certainly court ordered to pay child support. The loophole is it's excused due to his being unemployed (as far as my gf's knowledge goes).
Dude what other "Bacon Challenge" ideas do you guys have??  The beggin' strips roulette thing was hilarious...  You guys should do a like... baconweave size competition or something.  Though that'd take a lot of bacon.
It's almost like you need to troll the internet to feel better about your pathetic life.
Lol hate hate hate, so much hate.
Lol don't worry about these trolls, man.  Keep chuggin' ... Bacon is awesome.
Is Syria aware of the way in which the U.S. entered the Iraq War, in the exact same way - claiming that its leader used unacceptable weapons or possessed unacceptable weapons, only to find many years later than he had not?
Is Syria aware of the way New Warlords have been set up in Iraq, simply those loyal to U.S. interests rather than their own, but similarly oppressive to the people?
What can you tell us of the mental state of the majority of your fellow Syrians?
Is there a significant group of conservatives who back the current regime, for example?  What percentage of the country, would you say, backs U.S. intervention?
STUDY. ABROAD.
Expensive? Uh, maybe a G or two more than your normal semester - but never again will you get insanely low interest loans, visa opportunities, and be able to actually LIVE in another country for an ultra reasonable cost.
Absolutely changed my life. 
Basically, your balls grow three sizes from the confidence of such an experience.
Well I wouldn't say it 'tells' you as much as gives you a ton to think about. There are still plenty of choices out there - it just... does a fine job of giving examples, and describing the  forces at work on the most good hearted of beings, so you can better handle tough choices when they come down the road.
Classic example 1: Your liege lord orders you to do something morally questionable. The book says honor dictates you trust and obey your superiors... but what if the thing theyre ordering turns out to have been for their own evil gain? When do you draw the line?
Classic Example 2:  A wicked creature exists, but isnt currently harming anyone. Do you go crush its face? its evil! ... na, you better not, its currently innocent, right? ... but... uh oh, will it do evil in the future if you dont? 
The book doesnt explain shit like that. Instead it says duty pushes a person toward making the world safe, so slay it... but justice tells us that just because something has a wicked heart and MIGHT do bad things is not enough to merit just crushing it in its den... but a good heart knows how bad we'll feel if innocents die because we DIDNT act... and on, and on, and on.
That exact scenario is given as an example - the bottom line to them is that torture is evil means.Any evil act, no matter the good consequences, remains an evil act - a paladin would have to atone, etc.
The thing we always forget in D&D is that there are many alternatives. Truth spells, presuasion via magic, harmless divination to discover the truth, skillfull diplomacy, and so forth. Torture is the easy, lazy, evil choice...
And sure, we dont have magic in real life, but its STILL the easy, evil choice. We have this guy here and now, and he might know something, we must torture him... forget the fact that he might not at all... that further investigation could easily yield answers without toenails getting ripped off, and, most of all - forget that torture probably wouldn't be needed at all if our country wasnt advantage taking, empirical dicks to 98% of the world all the time, making enemies everywhere.
Yes, I'm idealistic as fuck, but I truly believe that torture is rarely left, as it should be, as the final resort after every other option has failed, and theres no excuse for it in D&D, especially, unless you're neutral.
Read the book of exalted deeds.
Good ends never justify evil means, an evil act is an evil act, no matter the 'good' that will come of it, and torture is evil, man. A paladin would have to atone, an exalted character would lose his powers, etc. etc.
side note: D&D 3.5's Book of exalted deeds still means more to my moral compass than every other 'holy' book I've ever come across in my life.
With such brilliant tidbits as 'the outbreak of violence over peace is not just a failure of diplomacy, it is a failure for good, and a victory for evil' and my personal favorite (among others) 'hope is more than just a vague wish for things to be better than they are, it is a taste of things as they might be.'
DM to DM, Strongly suggest that book to shut your players up when it comes to alignment debates - it leaves little doubt what 'real' good people/characters do, and its surprisingly inspiring.
way to start an alignment debate.
aaaand, way to start an alignment debate, op.
By utter random luck, I met one of my best writing partners while on a semester abroad in London. Made friends at an open mic, turned out he was a producer, had a short film at cannes film festival in france, decided to take me along to shop scripts.
At the time I could barely rub two nickels together, so it was pretty incredible, then one night I'm at a party, and I lean over to order a beer, and the guy who is handing it to me was in my improv class at college back in the states the very semester before.
We must have spluttered the phrase WHAT THE FUCK like 10 times before we could actually speak.
TL:DR - saw fellow classmate at a fireign film festival neither of us should have been at.
This might be ambitious and politically incorrect, but I: 
1) groan and complain because of waking up
2) Call myself a pussy and remind myself its not that hard to get out of bed
3) imagine some family guy style scenario with an important person waking up and accomplishing things to compare my bitchness to. (for example: I wonder how einstein used to wake up... wait, he was probably STILL UP DEVISING EQUATIONS WITH WHICH TO DISCOVER THE ORIGINS OF THE UNIVERSE YOU ENORMOUS PUSSY, GTFO OF BED!!!)
4) Do a simple workout, run a mile.
Its amazing what a small run can do to banish the sleeps.
EDIT: I make look better good.
Yes, yes, yes to this.
Simple:
It is good business to pay underlings as little as possible. More profits = better for owners, more company dollars to spend on expansion.
Except, that's now been happening for so long, slowly getting worse & worse (the rich/poor gap has been growing and growing worldwide) that the middle class, those people being paid less, no longer have enough for us to have a healthy economy worldwide. They've stopped buying.
Think about it, average people of reddit. How often does the phrase 'i cant afford that ' go through your mind? Do we need to be millionaires? No. 
But here's the rub: When the middle class has less, every company loses, because people can't afford their products.
Then they lay people off because their profits are down.
Then we can afford even less.
I once had an economics professor that said the first great depression didnt exactly happen because people were living beyond their means, but because the money they made wasnt enough to support a normal lifestyle, and they stopped buying. Organization of labor got us out of it, and the jobs provided by the needs of the war effort.
tl:dr - less money for lower echelon workers = less money for companies, they're just too nearsighted to realize it.
My two pieces of writing advice are in this vein:
Shockingly simple thing no one ever seems to do?  
Get a proofreader. An eye that is not yours immediately sees more mistakes.
Secondly . I'd be willing to bet 3/4s or more of student writing assignments are written the night before.  Writing under pressure helps sometimes, but you would be god damn amazed what leaving your writing for a week and coming back to it can do for its quality. 
A more recognizable example, perhaps:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O3qQIaiQJks&feature=youtube_gdata_player
Anything on Uilleann, or Irish, bagpipes.
Seriously one of the most unknown, underrated instruments on earth. Almost every movie soundtrack that has bagpipes uses them rather than the huge pipes we think of as bagpipes, aka, Highland Pipes:
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mwxga8udIio&feature=youtube_gdata_player
(Mobile right now, hope that link works, if not, look up Davey Spillane)
They're a quieter, more subtle bagpipe so that the Irish could play them without the British getting pissed from five hills away, unlike Scottish highland pipes.
They also have a hand bellow, so the Irish can play them and drink at the same time, I'm told.
EDIT: More N's, plus wording.
mmm, I thought you had to be a guy who lived like... IN the horse's mouth, makes sense. Glad you enjoyed it, my friend.
Yea, you're seriously not my libby, and other serious puns.
aaaaand now I kno why shakespeare wrote like four plays about this shit. Unreal.
Heres a list of over 20 awards that whiskey has won, among the hundreds of others for their beers and other spirits:
 http://www.rogue.com/awards/awards.php#27
Hey, I'll be honest, in my experience behind the bar and trying craft beers, Rogue makes some fantastic stuff, and is, without a doubt, one of THE most successful craft brewing companies in the states.
I personally don't think they got that way just by marketing, but hey, if these guys know the distiller and he's an idiot, he must be lucky, because I really enjoy it, and I really enjoy their beers, too, and I've drank some of the best. Its different, and a prime example of craft distilling.
I can't speak for their business practices, but I think they're like the Dane Cook of craft brewing, they're so mainstream and so popular, people now hate them and trash them all the time for it, is what the issue is.
EDIT:
Heres a list of over 20 awards that whiskey has won, among the hundreds of others for their beers and other spirits:
 http://www.rogue.com/awards/awards.php#27
Well, like any alcohol, its an acquired taste, and dont let whoever forced Old Crow on you one time in college ruin it for you haha.
Oooh, depends on the state, lot of wierd red tape I hear. Apparently people will do it, but there's a chance it'll get confiscated or something.
If you're going to get it shipped in, try to get it within state lines.
Whiskey is taking off, so I would not be surprised if there's a store with good enough selection near you. Most of what I named is mainstream enough.
EDIT: Redundancy
Shit would been CRAZY.
Give me a coast.
Place in philly, in an old firehouse.
Ill never tell which of the three bartenders is me, the internet is scaaaarryyy...
Place in philly. Old firehouse.
Ill never tell which of the three bartenders is me.
DUDE. What lottery did you win to try sometheling like that, is that even real?? Where what and how, spare no details.
Hmm. 
Source: My bartender's guide.
Not that us westerners dont attribute shit we didn't really do to ourselves all the time.
But shit if you can't trust a book, what can you trust?
Yea its pretty different, sweeter. They make it from the leftover wort, i'm told, from	dead guy ale brewing.
Libby?
Like. Libby is that you?
I have a drinkin buddy named libby.
You're not seriously Libby, that shits impossible.
Both great whiskeys, btw. JD single barrel is one of the most popular.
Upvote for kindness in correction. I appreciate my knowledge being corrected and improved upon. I do not appreciate 98% of ppl who instead go LOL UR RONG DOOD
Oh man, special whiskey for an Irishman?
If he drinks whiskey already, find out what he drinks (Jameson? Bourbon? Scotch?) and get him a more aged bottle, that's sure to please, its like that first day someone brought home whole foods beef after hes eaten McDonalds all his life.
 I know a lot of guys that drink crown royal - they make a finer, 10-12 year reserve, so does jameson, there is jamey 12, 18, and 25 (gets pretty pricey, though).
My fav Irish? Blackbush (Regular bushmills irish, aged in sherry barrels, makes it smoother) and Redbreast - 12yr copper pot still Irish whiskey that is fantastic, not too expensive, and a bit off the beaten path.
Actually come to think of it, I'll have to check the bottle. If I recall, its just CALLED 1816 chattanooga whiskey, but its distilled in kentucky from a recipe found in Tennessee.
All distilleries have their legends. Good whiskey anyway.
Also: Whistlepig. Fantastic craft whiskey, a guy from makers went rogue and started his own.
Yea totally. That's why 25yr old whiskey us so expensive, shit takes years. 
Like 25 of them.
Interestingly, there is some contention with years. People say scotch just gets better and better, but a lot of folks claim bourbon doesn't need to be aged for stupid amounts of time to be fantastic.
I always say 'My generation actually cares about the world, you'd just never know, because we're waiting for you to die & give up the power so we can fix it.'
Yea I say it in my head...
THIS.
Lost the love of my life in a car accident at 19.
Awful, yes, cynical as fuck, yes,but it sure taught me that 98% of whats got anybody down right now? It doesnt matter in the slightest - someone just died, someone has no legs, someone just went to war, so stfu sunshine, you're just fine.
Life's short dude. Less time complaining = more time enjoying.
Yea, we all love being the kings of our own castles here in the states.
Also, apparently (I've heard this multiple times) u.s. auto & gas companies helped run many public transit/train systems into the ground because they were their competitors when auto first came into use.
Apparently LA used to be super well connected via electric lite railway. AND NOW. OOOH AND NOW.
Source: Reddit + I live in philly, and I see tons of unused tram tracks IN the streets all the time, makes sense. 
Everything.
No seriously, EVERYTHING.
I lost the love of my life in a car accident at 19. Yes, its awful, heartwrenching, bla bla bla, but you know what it taught me?
Your bad day at work doesn't fucking matter, and neither does your bad haircut, or most of what currently 'has you down.'
What matters is that you're alive and life is amazing, so stop complaining, sunshine, its a beautiful day, even in the rain. Because you can still feel the rain, and life is god damn short.
And if there's something wrong with your life, CHANGE IT. Its up to you, dude, not anybody else.
Hm. Never tried it.
Word on the street in the last five years is that Pappy Van Winkle is the incredible craft bourbon.
That said, woodford & blantons are my favorite 'mainstream' bourbons, rather than craft bourbons.
Oh yea dude, shine straight up sucks in my opinion. Some is more drinkable than others, but it tastes like tequila and whiskey had a baby.
A baby that was a very, very bad idea. There's a reason they age whiskey.
That said, give me a few jars of it, come back in a month, and I'll have 10-15 jars of apple pie, georgia peach or strawberry lemonade shine - which is still some of the most delicious alcohol I've ever made/tasted.
Shine is strong as hell, so you can mix things with it to be strong as hell, but still taste delicious.
I hear this, I have a virginia bourbon at my bar.
Virginia is like our Texas out here on the east coast.
EDIT: There's also a fantastic scotch out there that is made in japan. So 'wrong' but I tell you, its fantastic.
You've got your traditional spots. Champagne is from champagne, France. Cognac is from cognac, France. Bourbon is from Kentucky.
Its supposed to be true. But its not 100% true, naa mean?
Bartender and huge whiskey fan here (my bar has 100+ in house) and I just want to add some cool facts to impress the ladies, because I love whiskey. And I love ladies.
1. The irish totally invented whiskey. Thanks ireland.
2. Moonshine can also usually be called unaged whiskey. Whiskey gets that color from the wood in the barrel. Shine ain't seen no barrel, no how, yankee.
3. So you make your whiskey, stick it in a barrel, come back in 5-25 years, you have less whiskey.
Slow evaporation = 'the angel's cut' ... any distillery visitors will tell you, you can smell it in the air.
What Soaks Into the Barrel/Cask's wood = 'The	Devil's Cut' ... never chewed on a whiskey barrel, but I bet its better than just chewing on a barrel.
4. The number of whiskey distilleries in the states has tripled in the last few years.
Move over craft beer. Here comes craft whiskey. I ain't complaining. (My faves = chattanooga tennessee whiskey, colonial e.h. taylor & rogue dead guy whiskey)
5. If you're under 25, someone is probably drinking a whiskey older than you right now.
6. All beautiful women drink whiskey.
EDIT:  Forgot the coolest one, for the history buffs, not the ladies. Unless they're history buff ladies, in which case, they should come to my bar.
The whiskey rebellion = that beautiful time in U.S. history when we beat the british, & then tried to tax our own people on whiskey, at which point those people said 'fuck you, George Washington, we ain't paying SHIT'
'cept they lost that rebellion. But, see, most of them just picked up and moved out of central/western pennsylvania, where they had their rebellion, and went out to... you guessed it, Kentucky, where they've been doing it since.
So thats where I understand we get the whole 'Bourbon should be from Kentucky' thing. Its tradition, baby, and its god damn American.
Tl:dr, Whiskey cool, yo.
Dude, problem here = grade.
Wish we could go to school to enrich our lives instead, learn shit, instead of get 'good grades' and such.
Blah blah blah, idealistic hippy bullshit.
Yea I hear newton still makes adjustments regularly.
>how many people really want a pet that can break your spine or rip your guts out with one swift kick?
Dude, so can horses, and we domesticated the SHIT out of them.
And I bet theyre WAY less fun to ride than kangaroos.
I would very much like to see my faith in mankind, and human consciousness itself, as a supreme architect of the world, being that all we experience in this life is filtered through it... but I do not wish to duck such clear doctrine as Chuckeye wrote:
>In 1964 the Grand Lodge of British Columbia "purported to adopt" the following in lieu of the first paragraph of those composed by Anderson:
"A Freemason is obliged, by his tenure, to obey the moral law; and if he rightly understands the Art he will never be an atheist nor an irreligious libertine. He, of all men, should best understand that God seeth not as man seeth; for man looketh at the outward appearance, but God looketh to the heart. A Freemason is, therefore, particularly bound never to act against the dictates of his conscience. Let a man’s religion or mode of worship be what it may, he is not excluded from the Order, provided he believe in the glorious Architect of heaven and earth, and practise the sacred duties of morality. Freemasons unite with the virtuous of every persuasion in the firm and pleasing bond of fraternal love; they are taught to view the errors of mankind with compassion and to strive, by the purity of their own conduct, to demonstrate the superior excellence of the faith they may profess."
This is certainly possible.  I thank everyone for your wisdom, and, perhaps, with some soul searching, I can find a place in my belief for such a thing and join you, brothers.
That said, though - a more simple question I now have, since asking THIS question:
What is masonry to you gentlemen who are in it?
In my research, I found it to appear to be a brotherhood dedicated to making themselves better, and the world better.  What are your thoughts on this?  There is some contention on this in other areas of this thread - many say it is focused much more on being a good man in the eyes of a god.
This is interesting, because many of the others on this thread insist that divine understanding and belief is central to masonry.  Has your experience been different?  I suppose it must be, since you are not a mason, I guess I'd better trust their opinions, rather.
Hm, yet still it causes me to wonder, then... There is a divine element to my belief, in spite of its lacking a traditional "supreme being," and I would contend that I would, if joining masonry, have a very good sense of how I fit into the divine, both spiritually and morally.
Perhaps I should look into the doctrines of any lodges I am contemplating joining for better, more specific wording on yay or nay.
Hm.  Well there's certainly not much ducking such clear cut doctrine.  One could insist that "the glorious Architect of heaven and earth" is mankind's own consciousness, but this is clearly stretching to suit one's needs.
Perhaps what I really need is a religion composed of divine spirituality centered upon the human consciousness as a vehicle very similar to a god.
Am I all wet and idealistic in this?
Because my impression upon researching freemasonry was very different - it was that freemasonry is a society in which the members strive to make themselves better people for the purpose of making the world a better place ("Better men make a better world"), and that it was a place where those who believed in such ideals shared in brotherhood with those of like mind.  It seemed to me to be a place where one was marked apart by the compass as a man who was part of a brotherhood that strove to perfect themselves and the world around them.  The members were marked apart by their symbols, and by their handshakes, so that when one came across another, they would recognize their shared belief in working together to improve the world.
So the point of freemasonry, then, is to make oneself better to achieve a better stance in the eyes of the divine, whatever the divine may be in the eyes of the mason in question?
>We don't perfect ourselves to serve our fellow man, serving man perfects ourselves to allow us to be closer to deity.
That is the true purpose of masonry?  To become closer to God?  Why then any difference from a normal church?
If this is true I do not belong here.  However, if the true purpose is philanthropy and brotherhood, I stand by my previous statements.
I mean, that said, perhaps all of this intense spiritual debate is pointless, because there are clandestine lodges that would gladly take me, and there is likely a humanist church just as strong in philanthropy as masonry.  But I can't shake the feeling that there is room in the Masonic teachings for one of my faith and belief, you know?
>Well I don't know any other Mason that disagrees with your statement. We believe in each other as well in our ability to triumph over our vices and superfluities. We are all about spreading harmony.
Excellent, I'm glad we agree (Unless I am mistaken of your point) on a similar dedication to harmony among man as Theist mason and Atheist mason hopeful.  It is this that draws me in spite of the possible hurdles regarding tradition and faith.
As for the conversation about being beholden to a watching, divine being as a compass to morality, this is... always a tough point for theist and atheist to meet over, because it is a fundamental difference to the core of us, I think.  One could write an entire doctorate thesis on the subject, but I will nonetheless try to explain my viewpoint in brief, and its fit into the structure of masonry as I understand it.
>What entity is most likely to keep you to preserve the obligation? An all seeing force that observes your every move, or people which don't always see your every move? At the fundemental philosophical level, God is more encompassing a force to make a man stick to his word then any other known mechanism.
I agree that this is true for a certain portion of the population: theists.  The idea that a divine being is watching, however, does nothing in regards to morality for a growing portion of the world's population, and, indeed, seems even... forgive me, but self-preserving, to us.  Moral behavior in this sense is pursued for reward - for everlasting life, and due to a fear of the divine rather than a wholesome, loving place of unity and care for one's fellow man for its sake alone.
That is all well and good, but how does this create a moral compass that will hold a man to his word in the same way that fear of eternal damnation will, or the knowledge that a supreme being is watching at all times?  I confess I do not immediately have an answer - but I find that an ironclad thread that will bind a man to his word within this system is buried in there somewhere.  It has to do with a belief that we are responsible for our own fates, and can therefore not ignore the evils of the world, and must remain beholden to our word for the sake of our fellow man.  It has to do with seeing human consciousness as a supreme being, one that knows right from wrong instinctually and is pained to see suffering, and overjoyed to see triumph and happiness, at its core, from birth, regardless of any belief structure... and can therefor witness ones actions with the same power of judgement as a divine being.  It has to do with a simple difference that often frightens us of non-theist belief - that it sometimes seems to us that all that keeps the other, theist portion of the world from lying, cheating, murdering and stealing their way though life is a fear of divine retribution rather than the desire not to cause others pain for its sake alone.
Let us have an example.  Say I am given $1,000 to give to charity, and I am tempted to skim $50 off of the top to pay my electric bill or I'll be chucked out of my apartment.  
The Theist chooses not to because 1)  His religion forbids stealing, 2)  The more bad he does in his life, the more likely he will land himself in a bad afterlife rather than a good one, and 3)  Because a divine being is watching, and knows he has done this bad deed, even if no other human will.
Myself, as a humanist, chooses not to because 1)  All of man knows taking that which does not belong to them is wrong, and doing so is a failure of rationality, and a triumph of greedy instinct, 2)  Care for my fellow man dictates it is wrong in the similar way that the good book states "thou shalt not steal," and 3)  There is a spiritual sense of responsibility to each other present that I have not yet totally defined for you, or even for myself, in a satisfactory manner, yet that grounds such action utterly in a way that is just as strong as any decision based in a god.  This decision is taken on faith, in a similar manner that it is taken on faith that god is watching.
TL;DR:  I truly believe that there is a moral anchor to be found in Atheist humanism that is just as strong as faith in god, and that a growing portion of the world's population will require it.
>an atheist joining masonry is like a person who's afraid of heights asking to become a pilot.
At the risk of sounding full of it, I would contend that an atheist trying to become a mason is much more like someone who wants to become a pilot trying to fly in a plane no one considered before... and fly that plane among other pilots who have been flying the same, wonderful, traditional planes that were built centuries ago.
These pilots say he should probably fly his plane somewhere else, that his plane is fundamentally different than their planes in a way that means they cannot fly in the same formation. 
They may not be wrong.  But their planes also might be outdated.
This is what I mean when I say that there are traditional assumptions regarding Atheists that, perhaps, no longer apply.
Please read my reply to AchieveDeficiency and weigh in, I think you may understand more than many.
That said, I do not want to live life in masonry as a lie, pretending I believe in a supreme being when I do not.  I want to make sure that my view of human consciousness as the supreme creator of our world, will apply to the traditional, spiritual teachings of masonry.  If it will not, clearly I am barking up the wrong tree.
I find your answer to be well phrased, unexpected, and extremely helpful.
At the risk of sounding the beggar, I would insist, however, that Atheism is not the crux of the matter - humanism is.  It is not about a lack of belief, but rather, it is about a strong, extremely spiritual belief in the power of humanity to triumph.  It is simply placing faith in each other rather than in an external being that is beyond comprehension.  The architect of our world is ourselves, our consciousnesses as sentient, moral beings with a responsibility to the universe.
It is difficult to explain without sounding like a fool simply trying to BS his way into an organization, to mold his beliefs into a structure already in existence and insist upon inclusion in it, but I beg you to hear me out.  Here is a fantastic article written by the Praxis Lodge of Idaho on the subject:
http://www.praxislodge.org/humanism-secularism.html
This article explains the exact similarities I see between my beliefs and the goals of Masonry.
>A belief in God is required to hold you to your oath by something more than your word.
You mention that my statement of Atheists being viewed as those who care little for the world and have little responsibility to it is in no way true, yet this statement betrays something of an adherence to that assumption, with all due respect.   I find that my faith in and responsibility to mankind as a humanist provides a glue just as concrete as, if not more so, than any oath made "in the sight of god..." for my oath would be in the sight of all of mankind - to which one is, perhaps, even more heavily beholden to than a divine being.
>Masonry's teaching's are spiritual in nature (which I feel is the more important reason for the requirement). Because of this, lacking belief in the spiritual will stunt your learning and dilute the teachings of Masonry.
I understand, truly, I believe I do.  A sense of something greater than oneself, a responsibility to something greater than oneself, must permeate all who choose the path of masonry, from what my limited understanding, and hope, tells me. An Atheist appears to lack this in totality - any sort of belief in a greater being, in something less concrete than science - I, however, would contend that it depends greatly upon the atheist.  Yes, there are many that eschew any sort of spirituality and scorn those who believe in anything without factual evidence.  Speaking for myself, however, I can confidently say that I am truly a religious person.  I have faith in mankind, belief in mankind's responsibility to each other.  I take it on faith that the problems that face humanity today shall be conquered by unity and action among us.  I know little about the specific brand of spirituality required among masons, but I do not lack spirituality in general, in spite of my lack of belief in the divine.
There is a god central to my belief. That god is human consciousness.
I understand that masonry is a most ancient organization, steeped in tradition, and challenging such tradition is a foolish and uphill battle - but I think there actually may be space among you for people such as myself.  All I ask is that you consider it in a new light, and forget the term "atheist" as you know it.  Replace it, instead, with humanist - I am not one who does not believe in god.  I am one who DOES believe in people.
I accept your advice with gratitude, and understand if my debate is futile.  Perhaps masonry is not for me... but I must confess that I find myself to be intensely drawn to it.
(PA) (PHILLY) My gf's deadbeat dad has himself covered from all legal angles we can see, and it's destroying her life.
(Throwaway, obviously) It tears me apart to see her this way, all of her life she's had to be the adult for her mom & two siblings because dad won't pay child support. As a man who's father's hands are like rocks because he worked so hard every day for his family, it positively blows my mind. This dad, classic case - pays for a bit, slacks off until chewed out or court ordered, then repeats. Except now he's covered himself to probably never have to pay again.
It has gotten to the point where they're in fairly desperate circumstances - risk losing a house, mom can't work and has filed for disability (which very well may bounce back *because* of the child support they're *supposed* to be getting.)
... And here the oldest daughter is, a legally single 24yo, never having gone to college because she needed to work, supporting a younger sister, brother & mom basically by herself. She has been 1/2 of the household's breadwinner since 16, and fully breadwinner since 21, when mom couldn't work anymore.
Here's the kicker. Dad has himself totally covered from all angles we can see. He's currently listed as unemployed, yet plays in bands, cash under the table, utilizing his fiancee's (who he obviously won't marry until youngest brother is 18) income. They're going to Aruba. He's buying her engagement rings. Meanwhile his oldest daughter is tearing her hair out trying to pick up the slack for this incredible disregard for family.
I can't see any way out. I can't see any way to force this scumbag to shoulder even a chunk of the responsibility his daughter now shoulders for him. 
Is there any legal recourse? They certainly can't afford a lawyer. Are there foundations made to help? Are there forms or documents to file with mom's disability to help show his lack of support? My research has turned up little help other than OSCC, and what can they do given his "unemployed" status? We're lost and in the dark here.
Seriously fuck this guy. I can't begin to imagine bailing on three people I brought into the world. Blows my God damn mind. It's the least fair thing I've ever encountered in my life - my gf working her tail off every day, not taking the European vacation she'd saved for for years because dad bailed on support, meanwhile dickface mcguitarist is jet setting to Aruba, totally covered, not contributing a dime. And it seems like there's not a thing she or her family can do. :(
Please help.
Masons of Reddit - I am a humanist atheist. Can I be a freemason?
I have always been interested in Masonry - I first got interested because I met one of those guys that insisted Masons ran the world because of the illumanati and all of that garbage, so I looked into it and discovered a community dedicated to making themselves and the world a better place... which I am... just absolutely into.
Problem - I researched more, and found that most masonic lodges insist upon a belief in the divine, an "architect" of some sort, if you will.  Being an atheist humanist, I wondered both if there was a lodge somewhere of like minded masons (Humanists who did not insist upon belief in the divine), and two, if there was not such a lodge, if not believing in a "god" of some sort would keep me from being able to join masonry.
I find that there is an unfortunate assumption that goes along with atheists that the tradition of not allowing them into a lodge stems from:  That an atheist is inherently one who cares little for the world, and has a negative, hedonistic view of everyday life.
As a humanist Atheist, I find that nothing could be farther from the truth in my case, and I find that humanism, or faith in mankind, has a great deal in common with Masonry.  In the end, I would hazard my belief in the divine, in an architect, would be found in faith in mankind itself.  Rather than attempt such explanation and risk getting black balled from a lodge, I thought it prudent to ask with a throw-away reddit account first.  :)
If net neutrality dies, why won't a company that provides an open internet just out compete the others?
Sorry if the answer seems obvious, that's why I posted here - I'm just looking for a silver lining to all of this net neutrality hellfire.  I don't see any reason to expect lawmakers not to ignore the people, just like they have been, and kill it - which leads to my question:
Why wouldn't a company that provides open internet rise from the ashes?  Sure, Verizon and Comcast are people's only real options, but if another company suddenly provided every website for a low rate, they would CRUSH the two companies, wouldn't they?
Sure, there would be a start up cost, but it'd be easily worth it.
All of this to say obviously I'm missing something.
Yo r/drums, what are your go to drum choices for a tribal sound?
Joining up with this fire dance act that's been rocking with just djembe, and I *know* there are some bigger, bring the war type acoustic drum sounds out there, I just don't know the obscure name of the drums. 
So what are some of your go tos?
To my SOs Father who just got back from his 3rd vacation this year...
If you die during a battle with cancer, you should go to Valhalla.
Does the universe require the same amount of time to travel a vast distance at a slow speed as it does to travel it at near light speeds?
Every time I move.
Every bar is a karaoke bar if you sing loud enough.
LPT: If you FIND a thumb/flash drive, you probably shouldn't use it.
This 'Religious liberty' order has some pretty ass backwards logic.
LPT: If you are concerned about the environment, switch to your electricity provider's "Green Plan."
Which form of undead best fits Jesus?
My Dad worked with many Mexican folks over the years, both legal and illegal, and his story breaks my heart.
Went home to visit my Dad who's dealing with a heap of medical trouble (a story for another time) and out of nowhere, we got on the topic of immigrants, the current political clime, and his experience, which left me fucking enraged.  I had no idea he had such rich knowledge of the immigrant community.  I've been wanting to grab people in the street and tell them about it ever since... but I guess this will have to do.  Someone just needs to hear.  Or read.  Whatever.
The thing I remember most about my Old Man from my youth was that his hands felt like *rocks* from the work he did, straight up *rocks.*  Drywall, plumbing, construction, electric, painting - you name it, he did it. He worked with a variety of guys, busting his ass for years - Many of those guys were Mexican, and most would fight tooth and nail to be able to work with, and under, my Dad.  When I asked him why, he wasn't really sure.  He said maybe it was because he bought them espresso sometimes - said they missed how good it was back home, but it was $4 a cup in the U.S., and that was too much luxury.  "Christ," he'd said, "You'd have thought I bought them each a steak every time, just *thank you thank you thank you.*"
Another time, one of them genuinely asked him why he works so much.  My old man just says he's got bills to pay, family to take care of (the reality is he's got two kids he wants to send to college on a minimum wage job and a mountain of medical bills - again, story for another time).  His coworker didn't know much English, but he said "You the only guy I meet work hard as me.  I work.  Send money home.  Maybe I have one beer.  Back to work."
The day my old man lost his job, they all walked off the job with him.  They said "We no work for them, we work for you."  No one was more surprised than my old man, but he said he knew most of the other guys treated them like shit.
And just... Once my old man started telling stories, I got angrier and angrier at all of the entitled people I've known, at my ignorant American friends who don't know shit about hard work, let alone the type of work my old man had to do with these guys.  He mowed lawns, he dunged out busted septic with a shovel, he nearly got robbed and beaten in the roughest of neighborhoods, shot at, blowing though a bottle of Hydrogen peroxide a week just on random wounds from screws, hammers, nails, who knows - none of it was glorious, all of it was hard on his body, but he did what he needed to for his family, and I'm thankful for it every day - That's all any of these guys were, hard working men, busting their asses, hands like rocks, to take care of their families, and *why the fuck are people mad about that??*
Because "they don't pay taxes?"  **Bullshit**.  Green card holders pay, visa holders do if they stay too long, and, hey, fun fact according to my Dad, most illegals don't work under the table.  Most use a bogus ss# and their employers take out taxes perfectly normally - but the hell if the guys ever *file for a tax return.*
Oh, so, it's because "they take our jobs??"  
That's the biggest load of entitled bullshit I've heard in a long time.  What makes them "our" jobs?  The fact that we came squealing into this world on *this* side of some shitty river beneath Texas?  And who's "they," a hard working guy who was born on the other side?  Why is he any different than my Dad?  My Dad's ancestors once came here for a better life, we're Americans, all of ours did (Barring our black friends, of course).  So who the fuck are we to bar someone else from doing the goddamn same?? 
 Who are we to *let* someone bar them from doing the same?  I thought we learned in elementary school that treating people different based on looks or language or where they're from is fucking wrong - but hey, if we wanna go there, lets talk about how my Dad was the only white guy on their crew, because he was the only white guy within 10 miles of the place who could swallow his pride enough to dung shit out of a hole for $10 an hour so his kids could have a better life - *Dad* didn't want that job, *they* didn't want that job, but they did it, they did it while paying fucking taxes, and trust me when I tell you, they didn't fucking *take* that job, from *anyone.*
What hit me the hardest was realizing that those guys didn't walk off of the job with my old man because he bought them fucking *espresso,* they did it because he was the only guy there that treated them with any amount of fucking *respect.*  Like the hard working guys they were.  Like humans, instead of second class citizens, and that's what this is really all about.  People don't want Mexicans out of the country because "they're illegal, and you should follow the law" or "they don't pay taxes,"  or "they're taking our jobs," none of that shit holds any water.  They want them out because they're different, and brown, and speak a different language, and they're from somewhere else, and that's icky.
I don't know where those guys are now, but god dammit I wish them well during this politically induced shit storm, busting their asses to take care of their families, just like my Dad did, only difference is they were born on the other side of a shitty river in Texas, meanwhile my country is trying to spend trillions on a fucking wall while kids in schools can't afford pencils.
Wherever they are, I hope people are treating them like decent, hard working human beings, but I doubt it, and it breaks my heart.
**Edit: the fact that this blew up some and so many people feel the same way has given me more hope than I ever realized it could. Thank you all. It's exactly what I needed.**
Where's a great place to get same day professional photos printed?
Hey everyone, just a guy who needs photos printed by Monday (it's currently Friday) and my go to local place said they won't have time.  
So I thought I'd ask a community who knows - where can a guy get professional grade printing done in a day or two?  I just need headshots for an acting job done by Monday.
Edit:  Sorry, yea, I'm in Philly, USA.  JW if any chainy places like FedEx kinkos or something are good enough, really - thought the pros would know.  Thank you in advance!
It's bribery. And the constitution doesn't support it.
Yea, the constitution says we can petition - but for redress of grievances.
The constitution specifies for a reason.
Just sharing a little history...
I guess now we'll all just use the darknet?
They're seriously like supermarket tabloids, I don't know why it's so hard to recognize.
If we ever discovered faster-than-lightspeed travel, we could watch history in real time by intercepting light waves from earth that left decades & centuries ago.
ELI:5 What is the justification for gutting the EPA? [Serious]
[Pennsylvania] I am 28, uninsured and could have cancer. What hurdles will I face trying to become insured in the current political limbo? Do I have a chance?
I am your classic young healthy male who didn't think he needed health insurance. All my life the most I spent at the doctor was 80 bucks, when ACA was passed I crunched the $200+/mo numbers, decided it wasn't worth it, and continued with life uninsured. So far that's been a great financial decision, saving me 2k+ over the past two healthy years. (Yes I know it's actually an idiot decision. )
It dawned on me slowly that I needed it, simply drug my feet about it, as we do. Already tried ACA, they said I missed the enrollment period.
Aca could be repealed, meaning insurance companies will be able to deny me insurance in the near future if I do get a cancer diagnosis. 
What can I do if the worst happens, if this little lump behind me ear turns out to be something really serious?
And, more importantly, as I move forward with receiving a diagnosis, what will go on my record? Are medical professionals required to tell insurance companies I have cancer in the future? Should I run out of this waiting room, go get insured, then come back insured just in case??
Why yes, I didn't think it would happen to me. But here we are. Please help.
And please be aware of the buying / selling of reddit, via companies that want to send the conversation a certain way. I love you all and trust you to help. <3
[PA][Philadelphia] I am 28, uninsured & could have cancer. What hurdles will I face trying to get insured in this current limbo?
I am your classic young healthy male who didn't think he needed health insurance. All my life the most I spent at the doctor was 80 bucks, when ACA was passed I crunched the $200+/mo numbers, decided it wasn't worth it, and continued with life uninsured. So far that's been a great financial decision, saving me 2k+ over the past two healthy years. (Yes I know it's actually an idiot decision. )
It dawned on me slowly that I needed it, simply drug my feet about it, as we do. Already tried ACA, they said I missed the enrollment period.
Aca could be repealed, meaning insurance companies will be able to deny me insurance in the near future if I do get a cancer diagnosis. 
What can I do if the worst happens, if this little lump behind me ear turns out to be something really serious?
And, more importantly, as I move forward with receiving a diagnosis, what will go on my record? Are medical professionals required to tell insurance companies I have cancer in the future? Should I run out of this waiting room, go get insured, then come back insured just in case??
Why yes, I didn't think it would happen to me. But here we are. Please help. I'm not trying to be buried under a mountain of medical debt.
Girl scout cookies are the most successful child labor hustle ever.
r/getmotivated, what are your tips and tricks on Actually STAYING motivated - on seeing things through?
Lpt: Answer those job application tests like a righteous 1950s boy scout.
Now I'm going to do it every time I do my laundry...
I'm just a Neutral Good Commoner trying to make it in a Lawful Evil world.
Hosting a D&D 5e Tournament of Champions Thurs. Struggling with what abilities (if any) to bar - also curious what YOUR strategies would be!
Hey r/rpg!
This community has always been a fun & quality resource for this kind of thing, so I wondered what thoughts you had on the matter.
Here's the deal - hosting a 5th edition D&D bracket tournament of 8th level characters for fun for the holidays.  Have quite an interest, will have at least 8 players, and 8 NPCs.  I've had a great time creating characters, and I've focused it, this year, on fiighter style classes - thus, I hit some walls thinking about what to focus on, what abilities to bar that might ruin the fun.  The object isn't to restrict people, I just don't want anyone to feel cheated by another player's strategy, that's all.
So far I have the following rules:
Characters are 8th level, Players Handbook Only, though multiclassing is allowed.
Each character has 5,000gp to spend, and is allowed one uncommon magic item of their choice.
This is a martial focused arena tournament, no levels in Sorceror or Wizard.
No healing magic (that's a standard PvP rule in games across the board, tabletop and otherwise, I feel).
Where I've hit a wall is in what other magic to possibly bar.  So far I've said "I'll likely bar magic that directly damages your opponent.  So no fireball, eldritch blast, things like that - but attack enhancing magic, mind effecting magic, probably in."
On the one hand, magic is part of the game, so an arena in a D&D world would include it.  On the other hand, I have already focused it (this time) on martial classes, so it feels somehow... crappy if someone pulls a warlock and starts casting "hold person" and "eldritch blast" everywhere.  
So far the few players I've approached about it are just as torn as I am.  It's kind of fun to say "nope, we're going all face smashing this tournament, save the magic users for the next tournament, where we do a wizard arena!"  Still other players are pissed, saying "if my strategy is cast fear and darkness, and kill them with 'assassinate' then that's my strategy!"
Just wondered if you guys had any insight.
Besides that like... let's geek out about the best strategies, i've had a *great* time so far creating NPC's.
Edit: lol downvotes? Really? 
I use the dead corpse of a sea creature to clean my dishes. Savage.
LPT: If you're against Dakota Access Pipeline, make a difference by switching banks.
Hey all.  Here's a thing we can do about Dakota Access Pipeline, that actually matters. Take your money out of the banks / companies involved, & pick a different bank or local credit union. Wachovia. Wells Fargo. PNC. Goldman Sachs - all are invested, and tons of people don't know.  If *we* don't invest in banks that give to projects like the DAC, they can't invest in being awful to indigenous peoples. It might seem small, but millions of people have accounts in these banks. If enough people switch, they *will* feel it. 
Here's a graphic detailing those invested:
http://www.foodandwaterwatch.org/sites/default/files/web_1611_daplbakkensankeyupdate-web.jpg
My bank is pnc. Just switched to a local credit union, PFCU. To those concerned about needing nation wide banking, use a credit card when not local,  or most credit unions are part of a national network. 
Note:
ALL of the companies listed in the graphic (sunoco logistics, energy partners, etc) are invested in the pipeline, and the banks invested in THEM, the red lines are just those that gave DIRECT loans to the project.
Source:  http://www.foodandwaterwatch.org/news/who's-banking-dakota-access-pipeline?gclid=CKDLm4PFydACFYZKDQodB2cN9A
Cyber Security folks of reddit, How possible is it to manipulate votes through hacking?
Tried to do an ELI5, but there's a current events ban. I know this is a dumb, tin foil hat deserving line of thinking, and I have no desire to start yet another hate filled war about current events...
But If a country could pull that off in order to disrupt the strength of another nation, it would be an incredible triumph for them. 
Remember how... well. Shitty & outdated the voting system is from the days of the Bush election?
Just. You know don't get your tin foil hats out yet, but all the data said Hillary victory, even the exit polls. 
If there was some way to adjust the numbers just barely, cleverly. If the channels weren't secure between the thousands of little tiny voting locations, and a country put millions of people to work on it, had millions of people to throw at that task of adding votes here and there. Intercepting, adjusting. If the channels weren't secure between the counting locations and the media. 
I'm sure all the data is confirmed and confirmed again. Like I said, dumb line of questioning. But simply put based on those more superior technology knowledge than mine, is it possible?
ELI5: What are the real reasons Russia so happy Trump got elected? [Serious]
So we're not doing phrasing anymore, CNN?
ELI5: Why aren't there swappable electric battery stations, like gas stations, but for electric vehicles?
And the auto mechanic wanted almost $1k...
Pennsylvania - the bank notarized a title wrong. What can we do?
At a bank, trying to sign over a title. The bank had the car *seller* sign the title on the 'application for title' line. That's wrong, we're pretty sure. She legally just signed her title over to herself, right? Here's the question - can we sign it *again* on the back, notarize it once more, and then do it correctly this time in the available boxes on the back of the title? Is that legally binding.
TIL half of the world's food is wasted worldwide.
How do criminals who make cash illegally make big purchases? Wouldn't the IRS come down on them right away?
and I was just going to get a gym membership...
r/voiceActing, Help! What CAN you do on a demo - getting conflicting reports!
A little background.  I'm an actor who's always been told to get into voice over.  Took the necessary steps last year, workshops, got a demo done doing "covers" of commercial spots - big ones, like Subaru, GoPro, etc.  They sounded great - the original spots are, of course, out there and *not* actually done by me.
I say neato, pay the money, and go on my way sending out this demo.
Fast forward about a year, I'm still not getting voice over jobs (though granted, I did not market), so I drop into another workshop to see what's going on.  *This* six figure earning voice actor believes without equivocation that demos like that are *lying.*  It is the same as pretending you were a chef somewhere when you've never been paid to cook in your life - like fudging your resume for any job interview, entertainment business or otherwise.  Using a demo like that will, he believes, get you blacklisted as soon as they realize it.
Obviously I'm upset about it, but the guy who did this demo for me is legit, he's done hundreds of demos, he's done his homework, he does VO for a living, albeit in a smaller market.  The guy teaching the workshop is a giant in the business, makes plenty, so it's possible he's out of touch with today's situations.  I like the guy, he doesn't seem at all like he's trying to take advantage of anyone.  It may be an honest mistake.
Does anyone know the truth?  Who's  right in this situation??
I'm a bicyclist in a major city. It's every day.
Hi r/asktransgender... when and how do you tell a love interest?
Dating is hard enough when people know what to expect, I imagine the trans community has an even wider variety of challenges explaining their transsexual state.
Long story short I am working on a screenplay that touches on trans issues, and I need to hear from those who have actually experienced it.  I have heard stories through the grape vine, of course, some of partners being understanding, open minded, others of them being horrible... I just wanted to hear them from people going through it... how could I try to make a movie touching on that struggle without hearing from those going through that struggle?
Trans people of reddit, when and how do you tell most partners you get intimate with?
Trans people on the dating scene... What do you find most difficult?
Trans people of reddit, when and how did you tell your partner?
TIL Elizabeth Taylor was just 17 when she starred as a romantic lead in "A Place in the Sun" opposite Montgomery Clift. He was 31.
If you've never showered drunk, I recommend it.
You sign a non disclosure agreement (NDA) so someone can read your script - they're not allowed to share it. What agreement do you sign when they want to disclose that script to their contacts / potential buyers, and act as broker?
Have a feature film I'm proud of, and a colleague with contacts in Hollywood. Last night I signed an NDA with him, and he wanted to scratch out the part about not disclosing it to a third party - he *has* to disclose it to a third party, he says. That's the point of giving it to him to pass on to a big film studio, he says.
This makes sense, and I want to trust the guy... But I didn't know enough about the situation to waiver from a traditional NDA. I decided to leave it as is, and sign a new agreement in the case that he'd like to send it on... But I don't know what that new agreement would be.
Can anyone shed some light on the situation? I feel like the correct legal move is a finder's fee agreement with him, and another  NDA with anyone he sends it on to, right?
Edit: Philadelphia, PA, USA
After growing up in a bible thumpin' small town, this girl caught me by surprise now that I live in a nice city...
LPT: Turn off the soundtrack of your favorite RPG, replace with Hans Zimmer radio on Pandora.
Analysis of No.92 on AFI's 100 Greatest American Films - A Place in the Sun. Fun fact: Elizabeth Taylor was only 17. O_o
TIL the whale in "Moby Dick" is based on the true story of a fierce albino sperm whale off of the coast of Chile that fought back with tenacity against whalers, and survived over 100 harpoonings.
100 weeks 100 movies, back again with #93 - The Apartment... the last gasp of Hollywood's gorgeous Black & White era.
ELI5: Why aren't permanent wire mesh coffee filters a thing?
TIL the movie "GoodFellas" had the most uses of the word "fuck" in cinematic history when it was released. Almost half are said by Joe Pesci.
What are some lesser known movie fan communities besides IMDB & r/movies?
Just looking to branch out into other communities and get varied opinions for discussion.  Really the only spots I know are IMDB and r/movies.  There have got to be a ton more out there to get involved in.  Thought it was worth asking.
TIL That iconic shot of Jules & Vincent from "Pulp Fiction" never actually appears in the movie.
If technology were gone tomorrow, the only pictures I'd have from my life are random senior pictures from high school.
After reading TIL that to be in the richest half of the world, you only need $3,650...
The average human could erase their lifetime carbon footprint by planting just 2 trees a year for life. [r/theydidthemath]
Originally posted on r/theydidthemath.
Some simple Math.  Figure one!  [The average human lifespan in the USA is 78.74 years] (https://www.google.com/webhp?sourceid=chrome-instant&ion=1&espv=2&es_th=1&ie=UTF-8#q=average%20human%20lifespan%20usa). 
Figure 2!  In that lifetime, The average human's carbon footprint is about [4 tons per year.](http://www.eoearth.org/view/article/150926/).
Figure 3!!  A tree can sequester [1 ton of CO2 per 40 years](http://www.americanforests.org/discover-forests/tree-facts/).
So simple.  Let's round that lifespan up to 80 for simplicity's sake.  Now we see in 80 years, planting 1 tree covers 2 tons.  If you plant 2 trees, in 80 years, that's 4 tons.  That's one year of carbon emissions covered for every two trees planted.  :D
Therefore, you realize, if you plant 2 trees a year for life, each of those two trees will remove your carbon footprint for that year totally from the Earth.  It will take 80 years for each pair of trees to do it, of course, but each of us could do much better than two trees a year.
All of this to say that if each of us made it our goal to erase our own footprint in this ultra simple way, instead of preaching to companies or getting frustrated with people who don't recycle, what a world it would be, right?  You don't even have to change your life!  Stop driving your car, even stop pumping the heat in the winter time... as long as *you're* responsible for *your* carbon footprint being erased, you have had zero impact on global warming.  It doesn't do us any good to wail and worry and yell at the government to do something.  Right here, right now, each of us can do something, just by planting *2 trees a year.*  More than something, we can be utterly responsible for *us.*  We can lead by example.
No one can tell big companies what to do, it's painfully obvious we're going to have to do this ourselves - no company cares about anything but $$$.  So let's do it ourselves.  Let's start planting trees.  If this post ends up going anywhere, I'll start a kickstarter to do just that.  I'll call it... 160 trees.  That's your lifetime goal.  Just like doing your taxes each year, each of us should plant two trees.  Hell, plant four, and make up for another loved one of yours.  Plant 6 and cover that one climate change denier at your work, now his attitude doesn't even matter anymore - his footprint is gone, thanks to you!  It *is that simple.*
[Request] How many trees would the average human have to plant per week for life to offset their average carbon footprint?
Doesn't have to be trees, could be any plant really.
How many trees would the average person have to plant in a week to erase their (average) carbon footprint by the end of their lifetime?
Got downvoted into oblivion by askreddit, so I thought I'd ask here and not be judged.
Brothers. Is there a place one can learn which state uses which dialogue to recognize one and other?
Pennsylvania FA&M here. I work as a bartender in the city of brotherly love (aptly named, of course) and I often wear our symbols... However, every state's brothers seem to approach recognition in a different way.
Obviously we can't discuss it in depth here, but all brothers know there are various ways for us to recognize each other - but it's frustrating to be part of the world's largest fraternity, be excited to meet another brother, and then realize neither of you speak the same simple recognition dialogue. In Pennsylvania we use a grip & dialogue. I met a Virginia mason, he used a different grip and dialogue.  A Georgia mason didn't believe my junior warden was even a brother, their language was so different, and we had to resort to pulling out dues records instead.
Just curious if there are any solutions I guess, besides the obvious, points, the word. If there are various dialogues to know, I wish I knew them, as I'm something of a world traveler, and outgoing fellow.
Edit: I'm just kind of a nerd for dialogue I guess! Though thanks for the distinction - an average convo in public doesn't require total verification because we're not exchanging knowledge... Just. "What's up, bro"
100 Weeks 100 movies No.#96 - "The Searchers" watches more like a Thriller than a Western.
TIL: The stars of classic film "Bringing Up Baby," Katherine Hepburn & Carey Grant, caused it to come in WAY over budget and over schedule because they kept dissolving into laughing fits on set.
AFI's Original 100 Greatest American Films of All Time, complete with Itunes, Amazon, & IMBD Links
TIL Clint Eastwood sat on the script for "Unforgiven" for almost 20 years because he thought it was so good. It is one of only three westerns to ever win best picture.
Is the time it takes to reach a point in outer space at a "normal" speed inversely related to the amount that time "speeds up" due to the effects of time dilation at a near light speed?
Does your phone power cord fall out of your phone all the time?
TIL Classic film actor Spencer Tracy was so ill during his last film, "Guess Who's Coming to Dinner?" That Katherine Hepburn put up her salary so it could be made, as insurance would not cover him. He passed away only two weeks after shooting wrapped.
Hey r/movies! 100weeks, 100movies back again with #99 - Guess Who's Coming to Dinner? ... Or, 'how to write a ballsy movie for social change.'
ELI5: Why must combustion engines "idle?" instead of just turning on or off when using energy, like most devices?
What's the best real or fictional band name ever?
Me and my buddy love coming up with these, or coming across them, fictional or not
Hey r/classicfilm, back again with 100weeks100movies at no.99 - Guess Who's Coming to Dinner?
Hi r/truefilm! Just launched a project to finish AFI's 100 Greatest Films (original list). Do you love/hate that list? What is your favorite classic that got rejected?
Hi r/entertainment! Started a project & resource to watch AFI's 100 Greatest Movies of All Time. Feedback welcome!
Hi r/movies! Built a website dedicated to counting down AFI's 100 greatest movies. Started today with #100, Yankee Doodle Dandy. Feedback welcome!
TIL George M. Cohan is the only actor to have a statue on Broadway, and the first 'artist' to receive the congressional medal of honor. He is one of two statues in Times Square.
Hi r/classicfilms! Built a Website dedicated to counting down AFI's 100 Greatest Movies. Just started with #100, Yankee Doodle Dandy! Feedback welcome.
Hi r/filmtheory. Built a website dedicated to watching AFI's 100 best movies and analyzing why they're amazing. Feedback welcome.
TIL Half of the 100 best movies ever are "unoriginal" (were a book, musical or foreign film first)
Antique doctor's kit (we think). It's our fam's favorite mystery.
Found this antique doctor's kit (we think??). No year or online research success. Chock full of old medicines. What is this thing?? Are we right? Is it rare or historically valuable?
I'm sorry whut?
ELI5: How are solar cars (and now a plane) able to travel thousands of miles without a drop of fuel while the range of a fully electric car is only about 100 miles?
What's the best song ever made?
Songs both ancient and modern. Songs that pull thy heartstrings and thy nether regions. Songs that destroy sorrow, make kings weep and soldiers lay down their arms.
Edit: lol downvotes, just, why?
Craft beer fans of reddit, what makes you love craft beer so much?
Writer here.  I enjoy craft beer for how much variety there is out there, and I've definitely had some memorable beers - but I'm missing some of the passion I know some people have for it.  I couldn't rave passionately for 10 minutes about how awesome craft beer is, but I know there are those that can.  So reddit, what makes it special to you?
We spend world culture class learning all the things that make people & places different. Maybe we should spend them learning all the things that make people & places the same.
My late Grandpa donated his body to Science after death, but his wife is being shifty, and his will hasn't appeared. There must be something we can do?
I hate this.  It's hard enough to lose someone *without* the added nastiness of fighting over their estate :( .  It hurts to even consider that my late Grandfather's wife would try to cut our side of the family out of whatever he would have liked us to have of his... but I am no fool, and my suspicions are growing and growing.  
For example, two weeks after Grandpa passed, she had her son from a previous marriage, whom my Grandfather loathed, legitimized as *his.*  Why on Earth would she do that if not to better benefit from my Grandfather's estate?  
She also claims she cannot find his will, or any instructions regarding what to do postmortem.  I find this highly odd, my Grandfather was tremendously organized financially - there was a letter left for her kindly explaining that he had chosen to donate his body to Science... yet "there was no will?"  Fat chance.  
Yet, legally, is there even anything we can do?  They were married... therefore, she's the executor of his estate.  If the will has "gone missing" and there's no public record of it (I called a great many courthouses in search of it) do we even have a chance of defending my Grandfather's true wishes?  If this will has not "gone missing," but my Grandpa's 3rd wife is withholding it somehow, isn't that a crime?  There's got to be more to a will than just a piece of paper somewhere in someone's house that says what to do, but can get misplaced, right?  A copy at a lawyer's office?  Something.  Anyway... I hope you can help, internet.  :/
Edit:  R/legaladvice says I have to note the location.  Green Valley Arizona is where he resides, though he died while on Mission work in Chico, California.
CMV - You can't just decide that because Bruce Jenner got a sex change, I now have to call you a "her."
ELI5: Why isn't every surface of an electric car covered in solar panels?
It seems like a no brainer, but I can't seem to find any info on it, only mentions that it might happen in the future.  
I've heard of solar cars making it all the way down the coast of South America, and I've heard worry that electric cars do not have enough range.  
Sure, solar isn't enough to power the fully functional automobile consumers want, but it's an obvious supplement...  ELI5?
What is an action the average person can take to do their part in alleviating climate change?
The problem is not that people do not care about climate change. It is that folks feel powerless to stop it. It is a distant and terrible fact that we all know, but cannot change. We grit our teeth and hope for the best.  
If we refuse to focus on gloom and doom, and instead focus on the positive of what we can do, we might be amazed at just how much we can.  
Our generation, my generation, is the resignation generation. "Whelp, politicians are jerks, the NSA has all of our dick pics, and the environment is screwed... but what the hell can I do about it?"  
Forget. That. I want to know how I can save the world. I'm going to do it. I'm going to save the fucking world, ok?!?   
So, people smarter than me, how do we do it?
What is a simple action the average joe can take to do their part in alleviating climate change?
Environmentalists of Reddit, what is a simple change the average Joe can make to do their part in alleviating climate change?
[WP] The A list celebs of earth have gathered their fame & endless youth by slaying the talented and absorbing their powers... But a ring has finally banned together to bring down those that have been on top for too long...
Considering making this an extremely over the top comic book series, wherein Madonna & the rolling stones are all vampires (who would doubt it?) and fame is a secret superhero supervillain battle with out the knowledge of mortals. Their once ordered world was brought low with the death of the celeb king Michael Jackson, and since then, chaos has ruled.
Thought of while playing dungeons and dragons last night. 
Thought. You know reddit or whatever.
The A list celebs of earth have acquired their fame by slaying the stars of the past and absorbing their powers. The last 5yrs have resulted in stalemate, but a new ring of mortal B & C listers unite to bring down the tyrannical top tier...
Taking pubic transit is like using a porta jon. You only use it 'cause you have to, and it always reeks of piss.
Vampires are the original superzombies.
ELI5: Why does Science think things can exist within Black Holes?
Just finished reading an article in Nat Geo about black holes, and it's not the first time I've heard this notion that "if you wonder what lies within a black hole, perhaps you need only look around."  Sagan himself put forth a similar postulation in his series, Cosmos.
Well I must be missing something, here, because everything I've ever read about gravity of even large stars means they would rip apart and crush any matter within them, let alone the incredible forces at play within a black hole.  Look, they're so massive even *light cannot escape them,* yet Science talks about visiting the even horizon as though its remotely *possible,* it also talks of getting "spaghettied" there, as though an astronaut *wouldn't* die immediately because of the severe effects of gravity.
Am I all wet here?  What am I missing?  How does Science think anything BUT so much super smashed together matter could exist within a black hole?  The only thing keeping stars in existence is a balancing act between explosion and gravity, how can another universe "exist within a black hole" where that balancing act has collapsed, and matter is so incredibly smashed together we cannot even contemplate it and time effectively stops?  Wouldn't there be *no space* between things within that universe because all of the matter is so condensed by gravity within a black hole??  It sounds to me like Science is saying "well we have no idea WTF, so, like WEEE OTHER UNIVERSE."  That can't be right, so please, ELI5.
"I like animals. I never met an animal that was a cunt."
--- Ricky Gervais
Sex + food. 
All you get is stickiness. Stickiness everywhere. 
More people need to be able to recognize a hustle when they see one. 
College textbooks. "Genuine" leather. 
Bottled water.
North Korea could totally hit California with a missile, perhaps nuclear, within the next three years, and there is *zero* white house strategy to counter it. 
California is the bread basket of America.
Edit: ok guys, spiders, spiders make me uncomfortable. 
Spiders and potential nuclear holocaust + ensuing catastrophic famine. 
But mostly spiders. 
Mmm. Affirmative action exists for a reason. 
I know its not popular, and its hard to understand, and yes, all things being equal, all people being equal, it is utter bullshit. 
That said, though, for decades, there were laws on the books that put these folks into deep, deep holes. Holes their people still try and fail to dig themselves out of every single day.
Laws that do the opposite are not meant to be there forever. They're just meant to be there until the playing field is one day level again.
And yes, they're divisive. 
 African American. Pfft.
I have German heritage, you don't hear ppl calling me German American, do you?
Na. We're all American. Some of us can just talk to cops without getting shot. 
 Any movie in the 80s.
So much cocaine. 
 Always pee before you leave the bar. 
In Pennsylvania it's illegal to throw away a liquor bottle in a bar without breaking it. Pennsylvania break rule. 
Also illegal to have sex with a trucker in a toll booth.
Pennsylvania. 'Tis a silly state.  
NO ONE KNOWS WHAT IT MEANS
 Yo blackstreet rule, check it. 
I was going to say stubbing a toe, but get real that shit's like 35 dmg critical hit.
 Nice try, old spice. 
Not giving up my scent soul that easily.
It's simple, really. 
Take someone who's scared of death, watch them discover a thing that questions the tradition promising death is living forever in the sky with puppies and shit, and then watch them have a conniption. 
 Yea literally low literally means figuratively, and word nerds are pissed. 
Thanks, Marriam, you twat. 
The run up the rocky steps fail in Philly slays me.
The art museum has a lot of steps, and America has an obesity problem.
"Hate the war, not the soldier." 
Yea I'll hate the person who chose a career in blowing up brown people in the desert because they needed a job all I want. 
Edit: YEA. DOWNVOTE ME YOU LITTLE BASTARDS. DO IIITTTT (that's the point)
So much. 
Overheard lawyers discussing a Catholic cathedral child molestation case. 
My favorite was a group of nurses though. Pouring waters as one says the sentence "so I guy came in for an adult circumcision yesterday..."
Miss the rest of the story, return with drinks just as she's saying "yea, so Grace pulls back the foreskin, yea, he *cums*..."
Never ask a nurse about their day. It was worse than yours. 
Naaa they just planning for the future. 
I, too, have struggled with this - but the reality is change *must* come from consumers. What we want drives the market - though we may feel powerless to stop a thing like climate change, look at how our desires have shaped the food markets of the modern world. 
Hyper processed foods are dying, along with places like mcdonalds, because what we want has changed. 
There's no reason this can't happen with climate change - hold industries that are offenders responsible, stop buying their products, and DO but the products of those making an effort. 
The consumer always feels powerless... but the truth is, the consumer has the *most* power, it just only matters if we all band together. 
 The Name of the Wind.
 All I'll say is It's the best thing I've read since game of thrones and Lord of the rings. 
Shelve it next to them, because it is that good. 
A legitimate sword duel. 
By the time film rolled around, everyone solved their differences with pistols, and swordwork was confined to sport. 
 Rent.
Bottled water. 
Our species has been able to pipe water places since 400 fucking BC, and somehow soda companies convince people to pay for it.
"Oooh but I'm paying for the *convenience*, the *bottle*...
Yea we've had containers even longer than we've had pipes. Have some foresight and bring one. 
The only people that actually need bottled water are the citizens of Flint, Michigan. 
Thank you for your thoughtful response. I agree, this type of thing does happen, and when I first began dating my gf I made sure to suss out all the facts. I grilled her, really. 
How tf is this guy getting away with it?
Are you sure your mom can't work?
Why does *he* say he can't pay?
There are a lot of details that explain even more, but it boils down to his ex wife letting him off the hook because he was going to go to jail for not paying. 
Me? I'd have let him. She dropped it, hoping he'd pay of his own accord, with his off the books pay, and he hasn't. 
His current gf certainly pays for a lot of things for him, but he without a doubt has avoided the responsibility on purpose, not because he's in financial hardship. 
The combustion engine machines everyone drives everywhere all the time. 
It took millions of years to make the fuel, all of us a driving around mini explosions that constantly spew poison into the atmosphere, yet all of us still do it just to go get eggs. 
It'll blow minds someday. 
I appreciate your helpful thoughts, unfortunately we all already went through all of that. 
The court's judgement was "you can't wring blood from a stone" - he appeared broke on paper because he plays for bands, cash under the table. So they ordered he didn't have the money to pay. 
He purposely quit his day job so he wouldn't have to pay. So yea. We're dealing with a class A scumbag, here. 
Best I can do is hope he gives me a reason to deck him in the face, because I've never met someone more deserving of an assbeating in my life. 
Her two younger siblings, whom she cares for because he doesn't, are under 18.
So while I'm not dating a child, I AM dating the offspring of one. 
Her Father, hands down. 
Abandoned the family of three kids to be cared for solo by their mom that can't work due to fiber mialgia (sp?), then purposely quit his job to make cash under the table so he wouldn't have to pay child support.
Gf now handles the burdens of a 4 person household at age 25 while he plays in a band, claiming he has no money to help. His brand new galaxy s8 says otherwise. 
Had to sit across the table from this scumbag and somehow NOT punch him in the face at dinner during (edit) after her sister's graduation.  
Something way better earth than the internal combustion engine. 
What's the difference between jelly and jam?
You can't jelly a cock up someone's ass. 
(Tagline: but there might be jelly up there when you're finished)
 You: What's long, hard and full of seamen?
Victim: Lol a submarine!
You: Nope. An erect penis. 
What I find interesting is that Comey said he had concluded there was no case regarding the Clinton email scandal in July... but he never mentioned, nor did anyone else mention, the reopening of the investigation two days prior to election day. 
Selfies.
Seriously portraits used to be expensive AF and take days to freaking *paint.* Rich families had whole rooms dedicated to portraits, their family's history, while poor folks had to guess.
For most of history, the ability to have a copy of you doing anything cool or even just looking good was a divine freaking luxury. 
I sell wooden swords at a renaissance faire. 
I'm stealing this. 
 What about air duster first?
The power of insects to decay and destroy corpses. 
 Let's see some sources to back up these claims that the U.S. will be harmed by it, please. 
"The saying isn't 'well it's a few bad apples, so maybe don't worry about it,' ... it's 'a few bad apples, spoils the whole bunch' - and we currently have a system in place that shuffles bad apples around between barrels, and does nothing at all to discipline, remove them, or hold them accountable."
--- John Oliver
Game boy emulator on smart phone + original Pokemon + nuzlocke rules = My 20hr flight to China. 
 Nothing wrong with that at all. Some really cool people still don't. 
Community college is a cheap place to try different things *before* you spend thousands. 
This, a million times over. 
A degree is a 4 year, $30,000+ investment. Make sure its a worthwhile one when you could have been working for four years instead, *before* you spend thousands. 
Too many people just go, because it's "What you do." Colleges make a ton of profit. Most leave unsatisfied and in debt. 
Also, never buy fucking textbooks. Google is your textbook. 
It's ok. 
No seriously some of the most awesome people I know *still* have no idea what they "want to do with their life."
Good friend majored in philosophy. Now runs a renaissance faire?
Another buddy majored in engineering, now owns an emu farm. 
Don't let some bs idea that you have to have a perfect path dictate your life. Just do dope stuff. 
 Aliens. 
Totally serious.
Yea surreal is the right word. 
We watched it on tv, sure. But nothing about two massive buildings spewing black smoke and people jumping out, plummeting a hundred stories,  because they'd rather fall than burn to death, felt real.  When they later collapsed and images of mountains of rubble filled the tv for the next half a year, that didn't feel real either. 
I was too young to understand it all, what it meant to adults, at least. It only started to feel real once our volunteer fire departments organized and went to NYC to help. 
"I do not know what I may appear to the world, but to myself I seem to have been only like a boy playing on the seashore, and diverting myself in now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me."
Isaac Newton. He, at least, knew what was up. 
Everything robin Williams ever did, for that matter. 
Whatever room he ever entered became his fun house, no matter what the script said. 
 I'll tell you which bear isn't. Pandas. 
Ok ok they win at cuteness. But they utterly fail at bear. 
Bartender here. 
Most glassware, especially shots, has a line deliberately placed below regular shot level so you think you're getting more than you are and don't complain. 
And yes, sometimes we eat some of your leftover fries when we go to box that shit up. 
What we need is a constitutional amendment that removes money from politics. 
That's the only way. "Congress shall make no law that respects company profit more than the rights of the people."
 This is exactly the problem. Things used to be so bad, people were willing to make *sacrifices* as a means of protest. Not work for months. 
Look at the Montgomery bus boycott, black folks fucking *walked* instead of taking the bus, miles and miles, for *months and months* in solidarity, in order to gain equal rights, and we don't want to lose one paycheck. 
*we could. We all could. The truth is we don't want to badly enough...*
I think the problem is we're comfortable. Our lives, by and large, aren't *that bad.*
Yea, we get frustrated and don't feel represented, but are our livelihoods in danger? Our family's? Not really...
That's no reason not to scream and shout and be irate about the incredible injustices that have been put into law over the past few months, but it *is* a reason folks don't make *sacrifices* to protest such things. 
Before unions, people made *incredible* sacrifices to make their voices heard, striking for months, eating tin can foods, *not working* so that future generations would habe 8 the strength of fair wages. 
So what are we gonna do?? Go to work anyway when a mass protest is staged?? Think "Well i can't miss work for this?" Or are we gonna stand together as one and *actually hit people where it hurts??*
Stop using the internet? Strike from our jobs, in telecommunications? Boycott Comcast? Verizon? Use phone apps ands vpn's instead?
This. 
This is hope the nation was founded. After the first continental congress, British imports dropped 98%. Why? Because they did more than walk around with signs that say "we're angry!"
Protesting is great,  but what does that actually accomplish?
Not going to work for a month, that's some shit people will *notice. *
Good to know I wasn't just tossing off adolescent heart attacks with an "its probably fine" throughout my young life...
Sheesh.
Okokokokok
But where's the *evidence* ?
 The judicial branch still works at least. 
Sign an executive order that goes against the constitution, get that order overturned by the supreme court. 
Until he gets to appoint three justices...
God we're fucked. 
I really, really share that sentiment.
Here's the thing about that sentiment, though - it's a political tactic.
Its exactly what they want. They know the sentiment is 'politicians do whatever the fuck they want,' and the more they do it and we throw our arms up in disbelief, feeling powerless, the more they're going to keep doing it. 
The more we all just assume politics is corrupt garbage we have no power over, the more likely we are to just give up, and *fuck.* *that.*
RESIST.  
Edit: for example in Russia, the prevailing mindset they try to make is there's no resisting Putin. So no one does. 
It's the perfect tactic, convince your opponents there's no point in fighting... 
Never have to fight. 
Don't get tired. This is fucking bullshit, just like the pussy comments, just like the constant lies, just like everything else, and we gotta keep reminding everyone it's bullshit, even if we feel like the last sane people on earth. 
Wait was it via email? I hear that's political suicide, but only via email. 
 Is their a law requiring the use of correct grammar?
 It's just podcasts now, yo. No worries. 
As a modern sword nerd, I secretly hope those personal gunfire shields from star wars will one day be a thing so my skills are suddenly valuable. 
WHO 'WASTED' 6 HOURS IN THE GYM EVERY WEEK HONING HIS GERMAN LONGSWORD TECHNIQUE? NOT SUCH A WASTE NOW, IS IT. 
Also the hardest thing about the zombie apocalypse will be pretending I'm not *stoked* to go behead zombies. 
Never gonna give you up...
I don't remember saying a god damn thing about cake.  
 Yup, I was 19.
No way to tell how it would have turned out. 
The before life is real, though. And only other people who can see thestrals get it. 
 President. 
Way way *waaaay* too much goddamn responsibility. 
 Or someone has. And that's why he chose this meme?
Why does everyone see third world kid as representative of all African nations rather than as a citizen of them, who, you know, fucking understands oppression. 
 Yea. Hence his attitude about it. In this meme. 
Opening the arctic to drilling is against two laws passed by Congress over the years. 
The president is a powerful man, but his orders are subject, amazingly, to the laws enacted by Congress. 
Can you talk more about how the executive branch, ie, the president, is beholden to the law no matter what he gives "as an order?"
I feel like people forget the judicial check on the president all the time. I mean, I don't like Trump's policies any more than the next guy, but he can't just order the arctic open to drilling, or ban a religion, because those things are protected by the law, right?
Does litigation in these cases have any hope of stopping the abuses of power in question, or does it only have the effect of providing reparations?
Ooh. See I thought I was just pointing out backwards logic.
I said it before. I'll say it again. 
It's illegal in many African countries to be gay. Like, death sentence illegal. 
So. Yea. Seemed appropriate to mock their 'oppression ' from the viewpoint of someone who's experienced, you know, actual oppression. 
Its illegal to be gay in many African countries. 
Like, death sentence illegal. 
Seemed appropriate to me. 
Actually buying college textbooks. 
 Every time I see a fat person I think "There's no way in hell they'd survive the zombie apocalypse..."
  Lenin? Well bless his heart.
Every cool kid, to a man / woman, got fat and had kids.
Most of the nerds are now doing sick things. One works for the CIA. Another,  space X. 
SAY WHAT AGAIN 
Strip clubs!
Hello I'm here to pay for blue balls please. 
Climate change...?
*gooch* hairs
The draft. 
There's a fun "equal rights" conversation.
Science is great. I believe you. 
But I also believe in experience, and trust me when I tell you, I've experienced the difference between a whiskey & stout hangover, and a vodka & gin hangover. 
The difference is well known amongst regular drinkers, regardless of my lack of scientific citations. 
Racism & ignorance are still there, sure, but that's really not it. 
From my experience it's just about 'rebellion' and individuality. For having the balls to stand up against the North, rather than the principals at stake - and I don't even think most southerners think of it that way, that's just how I've perceived it.
Rebel flag is the same story, it's a symbol of being country & not letting anyone tell you what to do, forget the fact that it wounds every black person that sees it in a deep and haunting way, much like seeing a Nazi flag flying in Germany would wound a Jewish person, and cause them to be like GUYS, WTF, THIS ISN'T A FLAG CELEBRATING HERITAGE, THINK ABOUT YOUR ACTIONS.
The problem is the rebel flag & rebel attitude is about not listening to authority, so... anyone who tries to point those things out has a real rough time.
Oh and yes, racism is still a huge engrained problem no one wants to admit. But it's clear. 
And the North doesn't ignore or gloss over the messed up way they once treated people? And say it was because "states rights."
I can't speak for doctors in the early 1900s, but Vodka and Gin go down much too easy and provide far less of a hangover due to their makeup (they are distilled, often, 3-5 times, removing a greater portion of the impurities that cause hangovers).  This is why the greater portion of alcoholics are Gin or vodka drinkers.
Bourbon, however, punishes you if you drink it too much, making you realize the damage you've done. 
Source: career bartender. 
 Beauty and the beast. 
If your man is angry and abusive, stick around. He'll *totally* change.
 Sushi 'aficionados' who smother everything in soy / spicy mayo / wasabi. 
The whole point of eating raw fish is to taste the fish, not use it as a vessel to shove mayo in your face. 
I'd like to think *I* was the weird kid and I went on to do... well moderately cool shit compared to the average boring kid from my
Highschool.
I find that I often use the tactic simply because asking questions is a much less standoffish way to have a discussion. 
"I believe x and here is the evidence" when someone believes 'y' is just butting heads. 
Asking "Well why do you believe y?" "Have you heard about z study concluding 98% of the world's experts agree x?"
"Do you think these experts could be mistaken somehow?"
Sure, if that person wants to call you condescending, it's easy. But its actually much more respectful of your intellect, assuming you can reach conclusions on your own, and not be told what to think.
It's also more successful if framed in a way like... 'let's explore this together' not 'let me hold your hand while I reveal the truth to you, oh stupid person.'
Yea exactly this. Using this tactic for a while on my SO made her call me a condescending twat who already assumed he was right, and just wanted to lead her to 'Wisdom.'
Asking questions is fine sometimes. But so is just stating how you feel about something. 
Absolutely. Great managers know how to shut that shit down in a hurry. 
"Well I'm sorry you didn't like the food, but it was prepared correctly. And while you don't have to like it, if you ate it, you are required to pay for it."
Had someone 'prepare to call the cops ' on my boss once. He stood his ground. Cops showed up and escorted the customer off the premises. Boss levied charges of theft & theft of service. 
Didn't hurt that he used to be a lawyer. He could smell 'customer complaining in order to get free shit' a mile away. 
 Oh man, so many. 
Had an alcoholic regular who tipped real bad and constantly complained that I never got him his pint of gray goose fast enough. Class A D bag for sure, dealt with it daily. 
Just last week a lady was real insistent that she wanted hot sake, no matter how many times we explained that we serve it, you know, how its supposed to be served, chilled.  But sure, give the people what they want. Third person she asks decides 'I guess I can microwave it for you?' ... what happens when the server brings it out? Lady complains that it's in the wrong container, and she wants it in the original thin glass carafe. 
Even her husband was like 'what the hell is wrong with you??'
Do you want a carafe to crack and shoot hot glass shards towards your face? Because that's how you get a carafe to crack and shoot hot glass shards at your face.
Thanks for sharing. I wish I could go back in time and smack my young, ignorant face for complaining about not getting a game boy for my birthday when my parents worked so goddamn hard all my life. 
Still years later they get all emotional about all the things they "weren't able to give me."
Truth is they gave me everything I have, and they didn't have to. 
Thanks a ton. The fact that this resonates with you means so much to me. That's why I typed it all up. 
Just. Thanks. 
That anything could be paid for product placements / PR.
I'm futerama fry AF on all of them. 
Sand pony
 Well pot is definitely legal now. 
Lol "Lola" by the kinks. 
Most people know it, have heard it over the years, and assume it's a great love song about a nice lady named Lola.
Lola was a man, however, and the song explicitly states it. 
Its a gay discovery song from the classic rock era, and it seems like no one ever noticed. 
I yam kind of into this. 
It sounds pretty sweet. 
Yes, sorry, I'm in Philly.  Guess I wondered what average places are good enough, like Wal Mart, etc.
I understand your point.  We're currently developing a series of guides for urban areas - take my home city of Philadelphia for example.  There are many areas that have no space for more trees, where trees would be a nuisance.
There are, however, *tons* of unused spaces, and Pennsylvania itself is filled to the brim with land worthy of planting trees on.  Everyone I know is within a 10 minute drive of a place that they could totally plant a tree - they just don't *feel* like they are - and I bet you are, too.
Sure if you're in an ultra metropolis like NYC, or in the desert, it may seem more difficult - but there is flora in every environment that supports humans - and therefore, there is a place to plant plants, if you truly want to.
Every single building has a roof.  A roof is a great place to grow plants - maybe not trees, but crunching the numbers on how many plants it'd take to equal one tree, and viola, three garden boxes on a roof a year, and your carbon footprint is erased.  There are vertical walls filled with plants that are easy to install - in France, it just became illegal to have a roof without either plants or solar panels.
People are on it, it is possible, I promise you.
I just ran the numbers based on the average carbon footprint vs. the average amount of C02 sequestered by a tree in its lifetime - without taking into account deforestation, and other effects of tree loss on the climate.
The focus is on one person taking responsibility for them - too many of us feel hopeless because others don't care, or because those in power don't seem to care, so we don't do anything because it won't make a difference.
Sure, one person won't reverse the effects of climate change by planting two trees - but if everyone focused on what *they can do* it'd make a massive difference, *and* show everyone that people do care.  
 Excellent. Notice how that example is clearly in pursuit of the "redress of a grievance?"
I, the interest group, have a grievance - my work environment is not safe. Government, do something about it. 
That's exactly how it should work, I absolutely agree. I understand many people do not get that this practice is an instrumental part of democracy. What I would contend is that lobbying on behalf of business is a different animal altogether. Most of the time, those involved go through great pains to pretend they have the country's interests at heart, when all that is really at stake is their company's bottom line, money. The obvious factor here is *money.*
"I have a thing that will make me lots of money, please vote this way because, umm... economy? Here's $500,000 for your campaign." This is not in redress of a grievance. 
If you're wondering why I keep bringing up grievances, its because that's what the constitution says... "congress shall make no law restricting the right of the people to peaceable assembly, and to petition the government **for redress of grievances.**
Sure, they can argue that lobbying to remove fcc privacy laws, for example, is in 'redress of a grievance.' But if they can't prove it in front of a judge, then they should be charged. 
Money has driven everything for the last century, and there's nothing wrong with making money... but there is something wrong when laws consistently go to making a buck while people's rights are eroded over and over again. 
 Crowd funding guy here. Currently researching a campaign to do it here in the U.S.. 
I did some simple math and discovered that if the average American planted just 2 trees a year for life, their carbon footprint would be gone in ~40 years, and reversed in 80.
 The campaign focuses on arming the individual to combat change, because I believe our leaders clearly aren't going to do it, big business certainly isn't going to do it, so it's up to us. 
Most of us aren't scientists or engineers... but we can plant trees. 
Apparently we should all keep algae tanks instead? Guess I'll have to research that now. 
Trying to find my original thread, I comment a lot.  
Edit: lol really? Downvotes? How dare I self servingly share my project about planting trees to save the world on a comment about planting trees to save the world. 
Most people make little to no profit at all on crowdfunded projects, and I plan on keeping none of it, if that helps.
I researched to begin a campaign to do just this - plant trees to alleviate climate change - finding that if the average American planted just 2 trees a year for life, their carbon footprint would be erased in ~40years.
It was easy math, but few people seemed interested.
Many on this thread are correct, it's not a permanent solution, since trees are considered a "carbon sink" rather than fixing the whole issue, but for the average person concerned about the climate, it is astonishing & exciting news, because we're not engineers and scientists...
But we can all plant trees. 
I was doubley excited about it because I could easily plant 4, 2 for every climate change denier, and because it feels... great. I'm not waiting on all of the idiot leaders of the world to do something, they've made it clear they won't. So we will. 
I agree 100%.
Not to mention the blatant bending of the original fucking words of the constitution itself: "To petition the government for *redress of grievances.*
Petitioning the government so the law goes your way has fuck all to do with redress of grievances. The constitution doesn't protect lobbying at all. 
Uuuuuuh. Note. *Grievances.*
Wanting the law to go your way so you can make lots of money isn't a fucking *grievance* worth redress. Its a preference.
Lol whut?
 Lol there's "the champagne room" but you have to have a stripper that's down to party / wants to do extra for money. It does happen, everyone has their price. 
I was simply talking about really good lap dances, and easily satisfied fellas. 
In their defense, strippers are professionals. 
Give it to me straight. If someone has gigabytes upon gigabytes of pirated data in music and film over the years, is he now going to be SO in jail...? ^asking for a ^^friend?
Aww look everyone, this guy thinks there's no release! (  Ê– ) 
Same thought. https://www.reddit.com/r/AdviceAnimals/comments/620i22/theyre_seriously_like_supermarket_tabloids_i_dont/
Pennsylvania would give you a flannel and a yuengling lager.
 It happens way more often than everyone thinks. Its on many ladies' bucket lists, too. 
The 15yo with a 19yo boyfriend providing waaay too many answers about anal.  *That's not your job, Renee. There's a professional here to answer those questions.*
GOD DAMMIT
So the only way to best them is to unite and boycott?
What once reliable brand *hasn't* declined horribly?
I feel like every brand on earth has been bought out and maximized for profit. 
In every given day there are several reasons to get pissed, stressed, and be sad. 
And there are several to be happy. 
So why not choose to be happy? 
Waaay late to the party, but my formula is simple. There's a reason to be pissed and angryThere are reasons a reason to be angry and sad every day, 
By the same token, white erase roll. 
Yea, that's right, *roll* it exists and goes on any surface for a fraction of the cost of a real white board. 
Changed my unproductive life. ;)
Fair points all around - but do you believe that poverty in America comes from not working hard enough, or that 'they just need to work harder' is an actual solution?
That some of the hardest working people out there live in abject poverty - it's not about working hard, it's about financial intelligence.  "They need to work harder" is not a solution for poverty.  [America is the 7th hardest working nation in the world](http://money.cnn.com/gallery/news/economy/2013/07/16/10-hardest-working-countries/7.html), and [1 in 5 Children in the US are born into poverty.](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/frontline/article/by-the-numbers-childhood-poverty-in-the-u-s/).
So 1 in 5 children are born into poverty because "that family just doesn't work hard enough?"  Fat chance, says I.  In addition, that article states 47% of those kids are in single mom homes, and I have yet to meet a single mom that could possibly work harder. 
Edit: Wording. 
Yes, money is earned, and that is a common left / right misunderstanding.  I'm not saying rich people are evil, or shouldn't have money, or that there should be some central power distributing wealth evenly - I'm just saying that wealth has no business influencing the laws of an equal society. 
In an equal society, my rights, life and needs under the law are supposed to be even with those of rich corporations - yet, the law, more often than not, goes in favor of their needs, not mine, because of their power and influence.
This is representative democracy, not oligarchy.
When you're out of money, the bank *charges you for it.*
Great, now I have *negative money.*
My roommate and I are broke musicians (he's a bit more serious, more of a hobby for me), so we're those terrible neighbors playing music who didn't have the decency to get a house.
We try to limit our jam sessions to daytime, but one night we're playing well past a time we should, and we hear a knock on the door.
Here it's our across the hall neighbor, tears streaming down her face, who just wanted to say it made her day every time she got to come home & hear us playing some music, and to please feel free to play anytime. 
I was really touched. Came to find out from another neighbor that her late husband played violin, like my roommate, and we'd been filling her with memories of him for months. It's been bittersweet knowledge, but she's always so sweet when we see her. 
I hope she doesn't miss us too badly when we move out. 
That watching porn has fuck all to do with our relationship not being awesome,  And masterbation is like stopping for shitty chicken nuggets when you aren't going to have a meal for a while, not like choosing shitty chicken nuggets over steak. 
Literally.
Literally now literally means figuratively, and people literally use it to mean figuratively all the time, or to emphasize a point.  
I literally want to choke them, but figuratively hyperventilate in rage instead.  
Everyone has two families. The one they're born with, and the one they choose. Love and support is out there beyond those you're blood with, I promise. 
For me it was when I saw a simple chart - world temp *and* world CO2 levels, on marked a timeline.
*Everything* begins an ever steady slope upwards the minute mankind starts burning coal. It takes an ever sharper turn upwards when we start burning oil. 
And did I really think that's a coincidence? Really, it's not caused by man? 
Besides that I realized so much industry has a vested interest in the thing not being real, or they're all screwed, so of course there's a backlash claiming it's not real.
A chart that's not quite as good, for the lazy. https://www.google.com/search?q=world+co2+levels+over+time&oq=world+co&aqs=chrome.2.69i57j69i59l2j0.2987j0j4&client=ms-android-hms-tmobile-us&sourceid=chrome-mobile&ie=UTF-8#imgrc=KO5hLoRslWhZxM:
Decide to do London study abroad, which I can't afford without scholarships. Take a $3,000 gamble that I'll get them and be able to go (that was the deposit), get a free ride. 
Proceed to enjoy London for a semester,  bond over tenacious D with a stranger at an open mic. Make friends. 
Months later I find out he's a film producer. I was studying acting in my study abroad. 
He invites me to go to Cannes film festival and shop scripts with him. 
I do so, it's an awesome introduction to the film business. 
Then we sold our script, 'Goodwill Hunting!'
Jk that's where the luck ran out, didn't sell shit, but got a stellar intro to the film business & became serious drinking buddies with some Argantinians.
Sigh. Good times. 
Fantastic explanation. My issue with lobbying, and I think many people's, isn't the bribery, it's the cost. 
Tons of corporations have a budget dedicated to influencing policies to go their way through lobbying. 
The average Joe doesn't have that luxury. They simply rely on, you know, their *representatives* to actually *represent* what they want. 
Simply put, the money & time requirement means those with lots of money to influence policies get far more power to bend the way the law goes, and *that's not an equal society, it's an oligarchy.*
We have to remove the money. 
Yes. Absolutely. 
Except our country is founded on equality, and money is most certainly not equally distributed, allowing laws to be influenced to a far greater degree by those already at an advantage (ie, the rich).
The result is an unsuccessful, unequal society with an unhappy & oppressed lower class that has no voice in its government. 
Our Constitution was written with the idea that everyone was equal, not that average Joe has no voice in Washington because he can't afford to lobby as much as big oil. 
IDGAF what it was intended to do, lobbying today is people pushing corporate interests, and nothing anyone says on this thread or another will convince the people otherwise, we've had it. We're onto it. We've realized this isn't government by the people anymore, it's government by the rich, for the rich.
Which is great, the rich are people too, and deserve their interests heard... but the average people are busy working, without a budget to send people to Washington to lobby for their interests.  They're just, you know, supposed to DO it, you know, as our *representatives.* Constitution doesn't say 'we're all equal unless you have money,' it says we're all equal.
The only way to make our country actually equal is to take money out of politics.
Remove money, and trace money, that's how it should be enforced. 
Our Declaration of independence states that everyone is equal, not that average Joe has no voice in Washington because he can't afford as much lobbying as big oil. 
Money's influence on politics should be illegal. Period. Amend the constitution to make it so, and the good will be separated from the bad.
If a lobbyist is suggesting a course that makes his company more money, they need to be investigated.
This is government by the people, for the people, not government by the rich so the rich can continue making money at the expense of everyone else, the very planet we live on.
There is a way to divide the good from the bad. Remove money, and trace the money. 
Our Declaration of independence states that everyone is equal, not that average Joe has no voice in Washington because he can't afford as much lobbying as big oil. 
Money's influence on politics should be illegal. Period. Amend the constitution to make it so, and the good will be separated from the bad.
If a lobbyist is suggesting a course that makes his company more money, they need to be investigated.
This is government by the people, for the people, not government by the rich so the rich can continue making money at the expense of everyone else, the very planet we live on.
Lot of complicated explanations on here. 
It's playing a video game in a book. 
The DM writes the book, & its descriptions (or you can buy a story & the dm is more like a referee), but the players are the actors in it, making choices. Everything is up to the imagination, within the guidelines provided by the rule books.  Those are the game mechanics behind every video game that you never think about- only difference is in D&D you have to, using pen & paper to fugure out if you succeed. 
Most people find that kind of tedious, but once you get it, it's worth it, because there is no limit to what you can imagine within the system.
Been playing for over a decade, still can't get enough.  
Edit: but if you want to get into it, head to a book store or find a .pdf of an older version (d&d 3.5 is available free I think) and give the players handbook a look. Tells you all the basics in a few first chapters. 
That's all the pen & paper mechanics behind it, the hard stuff. Once that's out of the way, it's aaaall adventure.
The Moon landing hoax. 
Yea buzz Aldrin once punched a guy for saying it was, but dude *how effed up and interesting would the world be if it* #was! 
Russia and The US had a fake pissing contest to get to the moon first, and The US just figured out how to fake it first?? Because... Hollywood. 
Hilarious. 
###thanksdonald 
Thank you. 
Yea speak in money, rather than in science, that's the language conservatives understand. 
Except, poor bill and the dems assume that conservatives don't get it, rather than, they totally get it and are deliberately firing holes in it in order to continue making money.  
Edit: 
That's why the real answer is to make the people accept the science. 
Poor Bill. Us geeks and nerds never were good at standing up to such bullshit bullying and intensity.  It breaks my heart.
That's what we really need. A nerd who's used to standing up to assholes.
I would kill to have a pint with that crazy son of a bitch. By all Accounts he loved to drink, and had a great sense of humor. 
Ben Franklin was an immensely successful scientist, politician and printer. 
He also *looooved* to bang old broads. He once wrote to put a basket over their head, because "the cunt was the last part of a woman to age."
Used also used to get naked in public (a practice he called 'air bathing'), drink often, and probably sent his son out to touch the key (whom he disliked a great deal) during his famous kite and key experiment because he knew that shit was dangerous. 
I would kill to have a pint with that crazy son of a bitch. By all accounts he had a great sense of humor. 
It's a magnetic alien hellrock!! Quick, call the guy from ancient aliens!!
We, quite literally, have the collective knowledge, consciousness, & stupidity of the *entirety* of humankind at our fingertips. At all times. 
Back in my day, when you had a disagreement, you had to call grandma and ask her to *look it up in the fucking encyclopedia.*
And most of us use it when we're bored taking a shit. 
Most certainly we take it for granted. We can connect to pretty much anyone on the planet immediately. 
If they have a penis. 
Seems shallow if you really think about love being universal and stuff. But I attraction matters, right?
Fossil fuel industry. 
The stuff takes *millions* of years to create, has the potential to destroy mankind, *does not grow back for millions of years,* yet we burn it by the gallon just to go get a burger. 
And eeeeeveryone is in denial about it just to make a buck, and because, convenience. 
Most of history. 
I give tours with free tours by foot, best history thing in town, pay what you want!
Jessica L. Justice. 
6'4" blond chick that clearly worked out, used to come into my bar.
I assume she fought crime as a day job. 
For example, Check out all the work I put into my blog, 100weeks100movies.com.  I even had a front page post in that blog's infancy.  It was exciting, motivating, and I thought I was onto something.
As time went on, though, and the obstacles started to mount (how do I keep spam accounts out of my forum again...?) coupled with what was a really lackluster income and fanbase (50,000 hits only converted into $18 in ad revenue, really?), it quickly became too much to stay motivated.  Six more entries in with virtually no one seeming to be reading or caring and I subconsciously threw in the towel.
Its the same for my screenwriting.  I write what I believe to be a fantastic idea, even draft II, III - I send them out, receive feedback, rewrite, send them out again.
By draft 8, when no one else gets excited any more, or seems to care, or even so much as compliment the piece very much, I feel my motivation to grind it out, perfect it, really waning.  
Instead I get excited about the *next* piece, play that out draft over draft until *that* one dies before it has been perfected and I move on to yet the *next* thing.
Looking back on a string of failures today I noticed that pattern - both getting excited about new ideas (therefore letting old ones die even though they're good ideas I was once crazy about) and a lackluster response totally killing my motivation.
How does a guy keep doing it for himself, and stay focused on the one thing?
Trying to get a bartending job.
I get it. Dudes come to your sports bar. Dudes want eye candy behind the bar. 
But we have a name for parties that are all dudes hitting on one girl. It's called a sausage fest.
And sometimes I want a drink that doesn't suck.
Lol I didn't do the other scene, I was simply offered it. 
Lol oh I did plenty to make it awkward. 
Oh it happened. You don't have a rather attractive nurse fiddling with your situation and NOT have your dick be like 'this means sex now, right?'
Everyone left the room for a few, regrouped, went right back to it in a few. 
Again, somehow my attitude was 'THIS IS HILARIOUS' instead of wanting to die. 
Pretty sure the nurse wanted to die tho. Lesson tho, dicks do what they want. 
Been a few years, so I guess it's finally safe to talk about this one. 
Only did nudity once, 'cause I needed the money, and yes, it was *ridiculous*.  My best buddy still makes me tell the story at parties. It was a 2k paycheck to basically be a 'model' for nurse training. 
I know what you're thinking, and no, it wasn't porn. 
They needed a real human to model a catheter procedure. Yes, they used my junk, no, they didn't do the *real* procedure. They switched to a stunt cock after getting to the point of, uh. You know. *insertion.* I named the stunt cock Marty. We were buds. 
So I'm on my way in to this job, telling myself 'it's cool u/justice_man, this is a good thing! You're doing your craft to better human knowledge. Yea. Acting.' (Don't worry I didn't believe it. )
Then I sit down and sign the paperwork, which feels less like 'here's a job and the promised pay' and more like 'aaaaand you're ok with your dick being out in the world forever, right? Cool sign here.'
My friends in the biz were zero help. I'm all 'if I get famous no one will care, right? Right??' They're like 'ARE YOU FUCKING KIDDING, U/JUSTICE_MAN ?? *EVERYONE* WILL CARE!! That shit will be the main event at Bachelorette parties, what's wrong with you??'
Groan. Gotta do what you gotta do? Still not sure why I just went ahead and did it, guess it was too late. 
Once I actually got to doing the job, it was...
Well it was actually a *great* fucking time. First of all, they treated me like a king, there was one guy who's job it was *just* to get me little fruity snacks, drinks, and make sure I was comfortable. The nurse was hilariously attractive. They had a giant monitor that was trained *exclusively on my junk at all times.* The director would come up and chat with me while my junk was not only out, but also taking up 50% of the nearest wall surface, all the while just trying to play it like it wasn't the most awkward experience of his life. 
Somehow the most give no fucks, bemused, laid back attitude about it all just descended upon me and I was about to lose it laughing for pretty much the entire day.
 I think it was because I know so much about movie magic, I've been on the sets with dozens of guys running around like clockwork making amazing film...
Except now the whole crew were dedicated to making my dick look fucking *great.*
Think of a great movie scene, the framing, the color - I like to think of that scene from the first transformers where Megan Fox leans over the car, and the entire audience's jaws hit the floor. It was one guy's job *just* to get the car, another's to make the hood look great, another's to fugure out what time of day to be out there so the lighting looked best - one to get the right baby oil for her skin, another on makeup, costume - you get the picture. 
*That's* the kind of effort they're giving this shoot, and it had me just *dying* the entire time. They're trying to eliminate 'shaft shadows,' at one point they have the nurse use clear tape to tape my junk to the right so it'll stay still for the shot, they've got some poor intern in there hollywooding a bounce board so the left side gets even light. 
Omg. Best worst spot in my life. Had a great time I'll never forget, 10/10 would not do again.  
Edit: Two follow ups - firstly, not only did I run into the nurse again, I ran into the first AD. Both times we do this little dance of... hmm... where do I know you from??
OH YEA. I SAW YOUR DICK ON A WALL SIZE MONITOR FOR TWO DAYS OF SHOOTING. How could I forget. 
Second, it's aaaall gravy. It aaall turned out fine. The director called me up some months later and was like 'well, the client didn't like the footage, so we're going to have to scrap it and reshoot. When are you available next...?'
I'm not. 
Then I did my 'u/justice_man just got paid 2k to learn a lesson about nudity with zero mothafuckin' consequences fuck yeeeaaa' dance. 
I'm sure someone on the Internet will find it and destroy me with it someday though. Worth it.
10/10 still wouldn't do again though.
Edit 2: Lol no guys, I didn't bang the hot nurse. Had I been single when I ran into her again, who knows. I've always had a thing for nurses. Yes, it made shooting awkward. 
Lol my poor gf still hasn't heard this story...
Got offered a role in an LGBTQ indie. Shot a scene in Philly, happy with it, director mentions another cool scene they might need me for. Neat. Pack up, go home, pat myself on the back for doing my craft on behalf of my LGBTQ friends, looking forward to said next cool scene. 
It was not a cool scene. 
It was a scene in which my character was giving the main character a bathroom blowjob.  Not a real one! They insisted, a simulated one!
Here's the thing. I've done gay roles before, even kissed a guy for roles, it's whatever, it's acting. I'm man pretty (I guess?) and it's been common in my career. Would probably have been happy to do it had they not pulled some bullshit slow con on me and just been up front. They tried to slow reel me in the night before shooting. 
The fact that they were being so weird about it made me assume on set they'd be like LOL JK IT'S ACTUALLY PORN HEEEEERE'S THE DICK. 
Not to mention the character's entire purpose was 'look good give out blowjob', with zero other depth. Had many a long conversation with my actress friends about it, they were surprisingly sympathetic (been there, u/justice_man, trust me).
Meanwhile my dudes in the business thought it was the funniest shit they'd heard all year. 
"Yea bro, that's how you get famous, what? What's his name did it with the pie." *shrug.*
"Missed your shot to the top dude, for sure lolololol."
Thanks fellas. 
Needless to say any time a 'sex act' is mentioned I'm reeeeal careful now.
...Just sitting here reading all of these, patting myself on the back for noticing women are people...
Perhaps twas a ploy!!
He payed that homeless guy to show up. Kindness to the homeless totes a strategy that lands you in sack. 
Hehe I agree so so much. Bartender here, had a guy snap his fingers to get my attention once. The *look on his date's face.*
She called me over and made him apologize to me. Made my night. 
I'm sure he didn't get a second date. xD 
I couldn't agree more, regardless of gender. 
The second anyone *tells* me what to do, I'm out the door faster than you can say 'relationship.' 
My best buddy 's wife does this constantly. You couldn't pay me enough to be in the same room as her when that's going on. So much nope.  
'No, you're gonna stay here until I finish the laundry.'
Fucking, *excuse me?*
Jurassic Park III.
A floppy suburban Dad and his vapid wife wouldn't have even made it through the plane crash, let alone running around a dinosaur infested jungle yelling for their son.
Five minutes in and I'm just *praying* some monster dinosaur will just gulp them all (except doctor grant & the kid) down whole like a fat 5th grader gulps down gushers.
I'm still upset about that movie. 
R/askthesmith
R/whatisthislump
This. This was the hardest thing for me when I was dealing with loss.
All anyone wanted to do was pretend everything was ok, that 'God welcomed her,' that the Lord protects all of his sheep and all of that garbage. 
Spent 5 minutes talking about her. I vowed never. Never ever at my funeral. 
God doesn't take wonderful, intelligent, promising 19 year olds in car accidents. Humans and chances do, and sitting around heaping delusions on one and other so you can all feel better is *reeeeal* negligent of her life, her memory, and of anyone's feelings that isn't Christian. It's weak, it's pathetic, it's negligent of obvious Facts, but, you know, death is scary, so, GAWD. I was fuming.
She was far from Christian herself. 
Forget the fact that they wouldn't let me speak at her funeral because they got wind that I was an atheist.
All I wanted to do was express just how wonderful she was. 
We can't change how other people are, all we can do is continue to build a future ruled by reason rather than superstition.
What is one simple thing a layperson can learn to do from your experience?
For example I'm a science nerd, and I always find myself explaining to miserable cold people that their pulse quickening in the cold is responsible for their misery. If they remain calm, don't cringe up and breathe deep in the cold, they'll fare much better. 
Is that true?
Dude they thought they could justify it because the kid was being an asshole.
Ruining Santa magic is far more ok than a stranger adult to child face slap, tho. 
But I can hear many a conservative uncle of mine grunting 'kid deserved it.' 
They've proven that drawing/art skills can totally be taught!
Sucking at something is just the first step to being good at something. 
It's simple, poor people are undereducated and respond emotionally to arguments. 
I was in an odd position this past election, coming from a poor small town, but having now traveled the world & gotten higher education. 
It was sad to go home and chat with locals I grew up with, hear them talk in illogical emotional circles, and in short see all of the ways in which they totally fell for the pile of lies that is the most classic example of a rich uncaring  asshole convincing them he's on their side.
This is actually a thing. 
Crews behind the star wars universe built everything out of mismatched old appliance parts. Psychologists think this affects the subconscious to create that simultaneous feeling that something is ancient, familiar - and at the same time fantastical.
It was in Time magazine when episode VII came out. 
D'you guys think whales beach themselves because it's the equivalent of them jumping off of a building? :/
I always just answered these questionnaires like a Lawful Good Paladin. 
Seems to have worked out for me. 
"Do you ever have bad thoughts?"
"NOPE BAD THOUGHTS ARE FOR BAD GUYS."
Yep sticking with Hondas. 
Most customizable, parts saturated car market out there. 
Oh yea, definitely made some cool focused characters. 
Half orc barbarian 5/ fighter 3. Frenzy + great weapon master + reckless attack is a pretty lethal combo. (Take a -5 to hit, but get +10 damage, w/ the minus 5 being no big deal when you get advantage on every attack).
Plus he gets crits on 19-20 and double damage dice as a half orc, plus an extra attack. The key the beating this guy is getting him exhausted by fleeing his frenzy. 
Also made a polearm guy who took mobile, and polearm master - that way he can hit, retreat, and then get an attack of opportunity every time the opponent closes on him.
Made a dwarf that I like, but I don't know that he'll do that well. Just stacked a fighter tank build, 20con, shield, plate mail, 108 hp at lvl 8.
The fighter 3 / rogue 5 is a good combo too. Battle master gets a feint attack, which gives him his sneak attack. So he's a swashbuckley, cool sellsword type dude. 
Oh and I just finished a less serious character. A gnome bard who took a bag of tricks as his magic item. His plan is to run around yanking critters out of the bag and using bardic inspiration on them and shooting spells. 
May not win, but it'll be reeeal funny. 
Ha!
Oh yea that's a fun loophole I didn't realize. Rare items typically cost under 5k. Hm.
I suppose it's 5k to spend on non magical equipment, and choose any one uncommon in addition. 
Yea there are chances for things like a cage match or various terrain changes. 
She'd be super effed in a cage match. 
Hmm. 
Good point, there are builds that can handle her, but there will be many that can't. 
And I'll have a lot of angry players if this one chick just keeps back peddling & shooting them with arrows. 
I've spent an *embarrassing* amount of time and energy creating world maps for dungeons & dragons over the years. 
https://imgur.com/a/X27ds
World creation was always my favorite part of writing fantasy, and though they were always kind of a private nerd pride thing for me, one day I looked around at my collection and just became super proud at all the work, creativity and dedication. :)
All just so my friends and I could drink mountain dew and roll dice. xD 
Edit: In hind sight I should retake most of the pictures of these maps - the phone I had at the time's camera lens was frustratingly sun damaged. 
Guess I'm always anxious not water marking them and providing clear scans will result in someone stealing / selling them somewhere. Silly, really.   
So far the character strategies I've employed are these:
Barbarian / Ranger.  Bow user, took mobility feat, now moves at 50' a round and can dash as a bonus action while raging.  Super hard to chase down.
Fighter / Rogue.  Uses feint maneuver to get sneak attack.
Vengeance Paladin / Warlock.  Uses fear & disabling magic to gain the upper hand.
Halfling Berserker, because that's just funny.
Druid / Barbarian.  Rage + wild shape bear - also to heal after changing out of wild shape.
Yea I mean the end all plan is a movement and designated places to do so.  Go out to a random field, a park, an open plot of land that's not necessarily your own, just plant some trees.
I appreciate the simple practical difficulties, but it's not terribly hard, and the planet needs it, *so very badly*
Tons of places nearby to plant trees.  
I mean the end all plan would be to make this thing a movement, and have designated places for people.
Or just guerrilla tree plant all over, because, environment.
Sigh. Look all r/atheism is going to tell you is 'she's crazy, you're right, forget about her.'
Obviously you love the woman or you wouldn't have married her. It's not that simple. Faith is strange and foreign to us rational thinkers, the angle isn't to treat it as insane, the angle is to treat it as rare and special - provided it *doesn't force anyone else to believe in the same way.*
Faith is great. Forcing other people to agree with it is not. That kind of ideal is cut from the same cloth as radical Islam, pray the gay away camps, and the like. It isn't healthy, for kids and for anyone else - it becomes an identity and a perpetual cycle of guilt & self loathing. 
Responsible parenting can totally include exposing kids to religion. Maybe your kids will be totally into faith, maybe they'll have that special ability to believe without seeing - but maybe they won't. And if they don't, forcing them to will be extremely detrimental to their mental health, plain and simple. 
If you and your wife respect one and other's world views (and respect is paramount in a relationship), then she'll need to be open to the possibility that one day, her kids might not share hers. That's the thing about kids, they're one day their own people.
So do bible study, tell them about prayer, but you're absolutely right to be against *forcing them to.*
If she wants them to be good Christians regardless of the hundreds of other religions in the world, biblical fallacies, contradictions and nasty examples of it in the world, she's got an uphill battle. 
And if she wants to force it down their throats and expects them not to run screaming the other way... she's going to have a bad time. 
I'm wrong a lot. It's a combo of what I call 'puppy brain,' which means I get excited & remember stuff, which unfortunately includes utter bullshit, and a stubborn streak.
I argued for hours once that all objects fall at the same pace, because, that one scientist did that experiment at the leaning tower of pisa, and a bowling ball fell at the same pace as an eraser, and he proved something great, that gravity acts on all objects the same! Heavy objects don't fall any faster than light ones! It was a famous experiment, I tell you!
They'd all taken physics, and they tried to tell me about, you know, air resistance. And the many other fallacies in my argument. 
Turns out I'd remembered it from a bastardization of the real experiment in a kid's book I read in like 5th grade called 'Sideways Stories at Wayside School.' 
Man, that Miss Jewl was a crazy one. 
Told people I'd never get gold at anything.
I... feel. This makes me feel so strange. Like I should be doing more. 
I felt extremely unchallenged by my University. 
That said, I recently visited Georgetown and marveled at the level of studious behavior I saw there. My school was nothing like that. 
I would have chosen a more challenging school, but the mine gave me a sweet financial deal?
Anyway be glad you're going to a real university that challenges you academically and prepares you for a challenging life, I guess is what I'm trying to say? Instead of one that goes 'yaay money!' *here are some shitty professors that failed in their careers and are therefore are cheap for Us to hire gl byeee*
Silver lining? Being challenged is a good thing. :)
Late to the party but I'll share this story anyway. It's how I get new players to be amazed at D&D.
Tl;dr: action movie level climax to a ten session dragon debacle, all by chance rolls of the dice. 
Party is around lvl 10, they have a *really* cool Zeppelin they're in love with. They've paid for a top notch crew, they've outfitted the thing with spikes and ballistas, it's like a fucking death hedgehog in the skies - it had become their lair. They knew their first mate by name, they all sang shanties with the crew, they loved the thing to death. One day they park it to check out some caverns, and they get Gandalfed into the underdark.
5 sessions & 6mos later they've fought their way out, only to find their beloved zeppelin has been hijacked. 
Track it down, start fighting their way back on board through sky pirates, when, WOAH the big twist: the captain was a dragon in human form!!
Boss battle! 
That was supposed to be it- cool sky dragon fight, to get their ship back, with some danger to it,  continue with main quest line. 
That was very much *not* it. 
All of the players immediately freak the fuck out about the danger to the ship. Is it full of hot air?? It'll explode with one breath weapon!! How could I *dare* put their beloved zeppelin in danger? No dragon was going to fire breath weapon *their* beloved hedgehog of the skies, oh no. 
They proceeded to run, culminating in the wizard plane shifting the entire ship to another world. Forget the fact that they already outfitted the thing with flame resistant stuff, it could have taken 3 or 4 fire breaths at least. Totally got away... with part of the dragon's hoard on board, because, sky dragon pirates! Win!
Except, what's the number one thing about dragons?
Don't take their shit without killing them, right??
So the dragon uses all of its resources to try to track them wherever they go, to which their response is always to plane shift away. This cat and mouse game continues for several sessions. 
Meanwhile, the players proceed to go full bilbo with the cup mode, start selling off this treasure, upgrading their equipment, declaring victory. 
Except, this dragon is *still alive.* And it gets *real angry* when it's treasure starts popping up everywhere. It has resources man! It has magic enough to track them *and* it's treasure down. The players are having a grand old time, popping into the material plane, selling some treasure, popping back out. 
Meanwhile, my hands are tied as a DM. It's out of my control at this point, that dragon is *obviously* going to ravage every single city they sold the treasure to. No question. 
Cities are being leveled. Heroes & armies are mustering to meet this dragon threat. Leaders are scrambling. Wizard councils are going 'WTF IS GOING ON?!?' ... I dunno man some ship brought this treasure...? 'Well who the fuck are *these* guys?' 
The dragon is mustering it's allies, too. Those sky pirates were githyanki, man, they've got a dragon pact, they're buddies!
Word finally gets back to them when they pop back in to sell treasure and the guys in this city give them the ... *wild eyed recognition* YOU!!
*You.*
The players then realize, oh... maybe we should go kill this dragon. 
So they track down its lair, decide to go to it's house instead of continuing this cat and mouse game. 
And by a fluke of the dice, dragon is out hunting at the time. Kill its minions. Ooh, more treasure. 
*They then take the* REST *of its treasure,* and you guessed it, *they don't kill the dragon.*
They run away once more. 
Now this dragon has vowed war. It's fury shakes mountains, boils seas, and even the God of theives looks down and goes "fuck, these guys have some balls."
It declares war. Githyanki (other dimension warrior bad guys) full on invade the regular world, dragon hatchlings & full warrior houses build Gates to their dimension, start enslaving & conquering entire kingdoms, and this dragon is a tireless inferno of fury. 
Now the players continue this cat and mouse game as it keeps showing up positively ready to set the atmosphere on fire with the temperature of its rage,  and they keep running away because *GODS FORBID IT FUCKING GETS A BREATH WEAPON OFF ON THEIR BELOVED FUCKING ZEPPELIN.*
Things finally come to a head one day when they park their ship, disembark & go into an elven city- then the dragon shows up. (I've been rolling its chances of being nearby when they reappear, and to track them down this whole time.)
Ok, show time, the ship is safe of the edge of the city, the dragon is here, they have elven allies in this platform city on the river. 
What proceeds is the most epic boss fight I've ever had the pleasure of dming, all by chance. The elves are peppering it with arrows from their rope bridges and tree citadels, the trees are ablaze with fire, the dragon is swooping down to boil the river with fire, creating a mist to hide its movements, at one point the fighter uses his sword to chop a tree and nat20's to have it fall on the dragon (yea that's right, he hit the dragon with a tree).
The dragon finally crashes to the ground, clinging to life, in the river. The players see with their spots that she has reverted back into human form, and is trying to get away. With 8hp left, the fighter screams "Nooooo!!!" And dives into the river after her. 
He reaches her, under water,  but can't attack yet. She casts a spell - he feels a tug to another world.  He has the option to resist the spell. He refuses, accepting the consequences. 
She and he are teleported to another world. He full attacks her, kills her, as globes of now gravity-less river water float away into the abyss...
Yeeea but whatta Ya do for toilets... that's the real question...
The thing I find most interesting about this discussion is how aware we Americans are that their government does this shit, and how "lul, yea we're dicks" we are about it. 
You know... maybe *that's* where true calmness comes from - *experience. *
Between loving to read, knowing history, traveling quite a bit and experiencing tragedy... Wondering if you're going to get your Christmas shopping done on time doesn't really phase you anymore.  
I probably repeat this exact paragraph to my rather high stress girlfriend twice a week. 
I'm glad I'm not the only one who sees things in this way. It seems to help her a lot. :)
I have the added "bonus" of having seen the death of someone close to me in my late teens. 
Not a bonus at all, but it does make you immune to sweating the small things. The true problems in your life are things that never crossed your poor worried mind, and they blindside you after work on some random  Tuesday. 
Getting worried, no matter what about, is pretty much 100% useless. 
\_(ãƒ„)_/
I'll have an ale of the ginger kind with some cherry juice. *fucker*
My favorite is the 'ready for bed but still in full makeup with perfect hair' look. 
I once tried to start a project / kick starter to do this!! I got very little support/ interest. 
I crunched the numbers on how many trees the average human would have to plant to entirely erase their carbon footprint, and it came out to ~4/year!
The idea stemmed from dissatisfaction with government action - obviously THEY'RE not going to fix this, so it's up to us. 
Heck I can plant 8 trees a year, 4 for me and 4 for a climate change denier. 
Let me see if I can find my original post... 
Edit: Found it:
https://www.reddit.com/r/NoStupidQuestions/comments/3pna43/how_many_trees_would_the_average_person_have_to/cwaanec
>Check this out. R/theydidthemath helped me get here, but they made it way more complicated than it needed to be.
Check this out. The Average tree sequesters 1 ton of Co2 in 40 years.
The average human produces 4 tons of Co2 in a year.
Therefore, if you plant just 4 trees every year, that's 4 tons in 40 years. Your carbon impact is gone 40 years later.
Can confirm. Work them alot.
Have yet to have a year in which I didn't get laid there. 
To be fair, many of us are super upset / worried about the Time Warner take over of Nat Geo, and fully expected non scientific, faith based BS to start coming out of it sooner rather than later.
It was and still is heart breaking to have a climate change denier & creationist owning one of the world's pre-eminent popular science publications. 
That doesn't lessen the impact of the incredible lesson we just saw an example of, though. :)
To be fair, many of us are super upset / worried about the Time Warner take over of Nat Geo, and fully expected non scientific, faith based BS to start coming out of it sooner rather than later.
It was and still is heart breaking to have a climate change denier & creationist owning one of the world's pre-eminent popular science publications. 
That doesn't lessen the impact of the incredible lesson we just saw an example of, though. :)
All things nerdy, man. 
I got rocks thrown at me for thinking comics and lord of the Rings were cool. 
Nowadays you're a loser if you're *not* up on the latest episode of Game of Thrones. 
I read up on it extensively before I posted this, and before I made the choice to switch banks. Partially my feathers are still ruffled from the bailout, and many of us get pretty riled up when violent tactics are used against peaceful protesters, because,  y'know,  Constitution.
The pipeline is mostly finished, and passes through a Reservation, where the tribes have a right to their land. They protested, fearful of pollution, and also probably because many tribes are entitled to $$$ for the resources others extract from their lands.
Many accuse the tribal leaders of not telling the army corps where was ok in the first place, still others say the tribes have experienced some borderline lethal tactics, and indigenous peoples have been oppressed enough.  Sure, oil pipelines go everywhere. Sure, a lot of people are dreadlock having slacktivists about the whole thing, never doing anything but 'being disgusted on Facebook' about it.
But the bottom line is the U.S. Constitution says people have a right to peaceable assembly. To freedom of speech, so they can protest until the world ends, no matter what interaction they had prior -It's *their* land - and they have a right to do so without being blasted by water cannons in 20 degree weather.
Occupy Wall Street tried very hard to get people to switch to credit unions years ago. I'm just encouraging the drop in the bucket economics that will help, that is easy, that people can do.
If you don't support that kind of behavior, those kinds of investments, change banks.
The food industry has changed a ton in the past 10 years, because people learned what the big companies were up to and stopped buying McDonald's. The same thing needs to happen with banking, plain and simple, people just need to be educated.
I read up on it extensively before I posted this, and before I made the choice to switch banks.
I'm part native American, as many of us are. Sure, they may not have paid attention. Sure, oil pipelines go everywhere. Sure, a lot of people are dreadlock having slacktivists about the whole thing, never doing anything but 'being disgusted on Facebook' about it. 
But the bottom line is the U.S. Constitution says people have a right to peaceable assembly. To freedom of speech, so they can protest until the world ends, no matter what interaction they had prior - and they have a right to do so without being blasted by water cannons in 20 degree weather.
Occupy Wall Street tried very hard to get people to switch to credit unions years ago. I'm just encouraging the drop in the bucket economics that will help, that is easy, that people can do. 
Listen. I respect what you're saying, and it needs to be said. There are many, many vaguebook posting dreadlock having slacktivists out there who will, indeed, never do anything but 'be disgusted' on social media. 
But here's what I'm saying - Every drop in the bucket counts, and thinking otherwise is extremely harmful, on every issue, social justice to climate change. The average working American isn't going to quit their job, move to D.C. & dedicate their life to making real change, it simply won't happen, and it shouldn't need to. We're busy pursuing happiness. 
In the pursuit of our daily lives, we can, and should, make even the tiniest change to remove support for companies that have practices we disagree with. Boycotts were central to the American Revolution. McDonald's has been dying slow because people are aware of it's negative health impacts, practices. The food industry, as an example, has changed drastically in the past 10 years because of what people support, what people want. 
You know what? Saying "I won't change the world by recycling this bottle, it's up to the big companies, so f*** it" 
Or
"I won't change the world by switching banks, they have BILLIONS of dollars, so f*** it"
THAT'S just as much a lazy, excuse not to care, bullshit choice, too, IMO.
    
\_(ãƒ„)_/  
Edit: Wording dumb.  
Edit 2: wtf? Really? Downvotes??
Because first class seats are there either way, so you might as well make someone's day?
If they're not sold, the airline makes $0 on them. 
If you get a low budget upgrade, the airline makes $50.
*shruggy guy I don't know how to make*
Link is broken
Jees, as a guy who just started his novel, I find that level of incompetence in my competition rather encouraging.
Alcohol was clearly involved. 
>I think we ought to own them,  but am equal amount of knowledge and training ought to go into it. 
This a thousand times. The second amendment,  everyone loves to forget,  says "congress shall make no law restricting the right to bear arms *as part of a well related militia.*"
Read, as part of a **well regulated** Militia.  
2nd amendment =/= any asshole can own a gun.
Women don't want to date douchebags. They want to date men who have a spine. 
Mom smokes the dankest weed. 
No I'm not kidding. 
Did the same at the Turkey Hill I used to work for. 
Fuck waste, and fuck policy. Long live the human heart. 
>America has a bad rap for food because of McDonald's
True - but more specifically because of *industrialized* food. Had a British buddy bite into a hotel croissant once and say "good Lord mate, what's rung with this croissant?"
So I tried it... it was a normal American hotel croissant, so I pretty much said lol nothing's wrong with this croissant... Except *everything* is wrong with this croissant... Because it was frozen and shipped here from Idaho.
I wear my late wake up time as a badge of honor. A badge that says I'm not an unhappy sheep person crammed in a cubicle making someone else richer. A joyous human who lololols at the clock when waking up at 10am, promptly congratulates himself on making the life choices he has - life choices that lead to sleeping in, and achieving happiness, rather than a fat paycheck, or an unending chase of "success."
"What time did *you* get up this morning, u/justiceman ?"
"Lololol 10am."
"I already had 5 hours of work in by then. *smug look.*"
"Lol sounds pretty terrible."
*goes back to sleep*
Cabin control unit.
Wasn't terribly difficult.
Oh yea, I get it & respect it. DIY still feels great.
Took me 40 minutes and one bad pinch/blood blister from needlenose pliers.
It was a cabin control unit. Pull old unit + cables, swap modules, install new unit, connect cables.
Connecting cables was deff more of a bitch than expected. I can imagine what else goes into auto repair.
Probably when that recruiter told my 6'4" buddy he could *totally* fly planes in the navy. :(
Thank you for taking the time to answer. We did a single line through the mistake (tho I'm not sure the bank that notarized initialed it), signed and did an affidavit of the mistake.
I hope that will suffice?
Well.  Let me share some of my expertise.
I was trained by a man named America's best bartender by the *Rob Report* in 2006 at a whiskey bar with over 100 varieties in house.  I'm not starting from scratch, though I appreciate the careful attention to possible errors, and am clearly way off when it comes to single malts - though, forgive me, this is a common error and even a misconception that is fostered on purpose by distillers.
>For example, bourbon is not specific to Kentucky (as initially implied, though later softened)
The article states:
>Just as Scotch 'must' hail from Scotland, so too, 'must' Bourbon come from the United States of America - more specifically, it is associated with Kentucky - though folks aren't quite as strict about its origin as they are about Scotch.  When it comes down to it Bourbon can be made anywhere in the United States, though true Whiskey heads will tell you the best comes from Kentucky.
I find nothing wrong with the above statement.  It clearly defines bourbon's basics.
>Also, bourbon being "often filtered through charcoal after aging" is completely wrong.
Incorrect.  I have a bottle of heaven hill right in front of me that boldly says "Mellow & Smooth.  Charcoal Filtered" on the side.  Heaven Hill is certainly bourbon.  *Many* other bourbons proudly state so on their bottle, I know this well, as I worked at a Bourbon bar for years.
>Charring or toasting of oak barrels is common to virtually all whisky production worldwide.
That may be possible, yet only bourbon requires it in its legal definition:  
>The Federal Standards of Identity for Distilled Spirits (27 C.F.R. 5) state that bourbon made for U.S. consumption[18] must be:
>Produced in the United States, Made from a grain mixture that is at least 51% corn, *Aged in new, charred oak barrels,* Distilled to no more than 160 (U.S.) proof (80% alcohol by volume), Entered into the barrel for aging at no more than 125 proof (62.5% alcohol by volume), Bottled (like other whiskeys) at 80 proof or more (40% alcohol by volume).
Scotch has no such requirement of charred oak.  Though some distilleries may practice this, it is *absolutely* unique to bourbon's history & production.  Every single bourbon *must* be done this way, whereas Scotch is extremely varied - sherry cask, rum cask, charred oak, not new casks, and so forth.  You mean to say *all* of them are charred, toasted, too?
I appreciate the attention to detail, but please, if we're not actual experts, there is no point sharing pseudo information.  A post correcting my incorrect post with incorrect information is not very encouraging.
Edit: Do you mean to say the fact that the barrels are *New* is much more important than the fact that they are charred, because many distillers do the latter but not the former?
Correction made.  
We really meant one malt, in retrospect.  A much better way to describe it, obviously why it is the designation.
There is a better definition of single malt than a batch of whiskey aged to perfection in a single barreling, rather than blended from several of various ages & styles.  "Single barrel" sounds like one massive barrel, when that's obviously not the case.
There are two king styles of maturing Whiskey - in 'One Barrel,' or blended from several.  A full batch of single malt whiskey may take up several maturation casks, but at the end of the day, it is a "single barrel" whiskey or "single malt" when it goes from but one set of maturation casks into the bottle (barring finishing, of course, in sherry barrels or the like).
That's pretty tough to describe, and we can understand the confusing / criticism.  There are several casks, but one 'ageing' or malt.  A blended, however, comes from both several casks and several different styles & agings, including pure grain whiskey.
We suppose, after thinking about it, that that must be why the definition is one "malt" - that is, one grain mash - whatever happens in the ageing process, the final product is one 'single malt'   - that is, all from the same batch of malt, rather than blended from  two or more of a different grain mash.
Thank you for your patience with our stupid things.  ;)
Thanks for giving us a read & corrections.
Still have a great deal to learn - though I feel we nailed 90% of that article.
Always said he didn't GAF Scott a Grammy.
Drugs
Pfft whatever. Cockroach deserves it. It's a cockroach.
Catch someone a fish, feed them once.
Teach someone to fish, feed them for a lifetime.
Lack of Bathroom consideration is the single clearest way to tell the owners of said bathroom don't give the slightest fuck about anyone.
1ply toilet paper? The company is run by Satan.
Whiskey.
Much tougher to drink and enjoy than wine at first, but when you taste a 38yo scotch and have acquired the palate for it...
Huh.
So maybe I should go take care of those wisdom teeth that have been in the back of my face for the past 5 years?
Never caused any problems. Bled a little coming in. My teeth are all still straight and dandy.
China has more *planes* in their armed forces than the US army has *men.*
Something isn't right here.
R/threadkillers
Similar science - in your house / apt - run a few bottles / cans under the faucet, wrap them in a wet paper towel & put them in the back of the fridge by the fan - cold in minutes.
I really hope someone says blowjobs.
Doesn't matter. Everyone's already in love with your brain.
*The Name of the Wind* and *Wise Man's Fear* by Patrick Rothfuss.
I'm utterly convinced it will be the next Lord of the Rings / Game of Thrones. It's incredible.
In Philadelphia there's a memorial at Washington's house (the president's house) where his slave quarters once were.
When they discovered it, they were going to cover it up, But the community came together to say "that's effed up" ... So it became a memorial to the men and women who were slaves there, along with a narrative about how Philly lead the abolitionist movement.
There are not enough memorials like that.
Real estate practices.
Guy a relative worked for was a real estate genius. We'll call him Bill. One of the richest men in the area. How did Bill make his riches?
At first, by buying properties, fixing them up, renting & selling. Moral. Legal. Wonderful. Bill really worked hard in those years.
Until one day Bill had a genius idea. See, Bill was doing well enough now that he could buy a few houses - so he started buying ok houses on ok blocks.
Then Bill made a totally legal choice to purposely rent them to the most garbage tenants he could get his hands on. Dealers. Violent ppl. Addicts. You name it. And oh, the neighbors were upset. Not with Bill - they were upset that "the neighborhood seems to be going downhill fast." They start to scramble to sell & move. Guess who's there to buy those houses? Bill.
Pretty soon, he owns a large chunk of the houses on the block, which he got for dirt cheap, because the "neighborhood went bad." He's deeply invested now, but, like a gentleman, Bill lets it hit rock bottom... (During which he, like a gentleman, allows his properties to be used for section 8 housing. What a good business man Bill is, and thank you, government, he says, for paying my mortgage).
 But then, Bill proceeds to fix up this "bad neighbourhood." One house at a time, after which he gets rid of all the garbage tenants for young urban professionals at a handy price.
Takes about 5 years a neighborhood if you're lucky.
I highly recommend you be like Bill - If you're 100% pure evil and don't mind deliberately ass screwing hard working families out of the beautiful homes they saved their entire young lives for.
Probably the time he told us he was attacked by coyotes & survived by punching them all out.
Fuck yes, girl you tell them.
And girls don't only date assholes. They date men that have a fucking *spine.* You can be a  incredibly nice guy and have a spine.
You're bald? Own it. Jason Statham does.
You're short? So is Tom Cruise.
You're ugly? So is John Malchovich. None of them have any trouble getting women, because women want men who have a *spine.*
Wow. The slow break I made from my old pals from high school makes perfect sense now. Our friendship was a constant state of defense of our stories & opinions from degradation or one-up-manship - and he who got upset by that "was unable to take a joke."
At some point, I moved beyond this. At some point, it began to annoy me, and something began to feel unlike friendship, and more like competition. A conversation about science felt more like a group trying to prove how smart they are & how stupid *you* are, not engage in discussion. A story meant to entertain, to share a neat tale of success was poked full of holes, compared to other tales, abd called self serving.
At some point I recognized that friends are meant to build one and other up, not tear one and other down, and I cut them out of my life. Friendship isn't survival of the fittest, that's what the world is for. Friendship is giving and sharing, not competing, and social interaction doesn't have to be, either.
And last year a dad was shot in the chest by a crossbow bolt on father's day.
HBO knows what it's doing.
Dark matter.
Lysistrata, the first anti war play from ancient Greece.
All of the women of Athens ally with the women of Sparta to go on a sex strike from their husbands until they agree to a cease fire.
Dick jokes. Boner jokes. Double entendres. Thousands of years old, could have been written yesterday.
There's even a joke about there being no "do it yourself" kits left at the leather market.
Too much makeup.
Fuck that.
Every intellectual woman I've ever talked to is smart enough to realize sex is fun and honesty about your wants and needs is as sexy as deep conversation.
Girl did this to me once at my buddy's bachelor party, because she was upset I wasn't spending time with her.
Everyone promptly assumed she was the stripper.
10 for hotness. 10 for insanity, too, unfortunately.
Watch adventure time.
"My brother has his sword, King Robert has his warhammer and I have my mind...and a mind needs books as a sword needs a whetstone if it is to keep its edge. That's why I read so much Jon Snow."
"The Room"
It just seems so obvious. We've all known big oil is corrupt as hell for decades. What's so different now, unless I'm missing something, none of these emails are admissible as evidence in court, because it was a leak, correct?
It was a fantastic ELI5, but I'm still kinda left asking... What's going to change?
Edit: It seems they may be admissible in court after all - Informants are a different story.
You can see it weekly at every open Mic where they're vying for better slots and honing their craft.
It's mostly in a friendly competition manner, but every now and then it does turn nasty.
Always, however, extremely entertaining. Nothing is quite like performers rising to a occasion in front of other performers.
Seems pretty simple. Universities shouldn't be assholes and should spread more work over a larger workforce that *needs hired...* where's the regulation on this...?
Tell me about it.
I've got four novels in note form, yet I'm still laboring through the uphill swamp that is draft VII of a 120 page screenplay.
I know better than to start on the novels if I can't sell a movie.
Been a bartender for years.
You could never, ever, pay me enough to manage. I make three times the money with half of the headaches slinging drinks.
Blows my mind that anybody ever takes the job.
Always pee before you leave the bar.
"I hope, Cecily, I shall not offend you if I state quite frankly and openly that you seem to be, to me, in every way the visible personification of absolute perfection."
Played Algernon in the importance of Being Earnest. Fuck that line, it will be forever burned into my memory, thank you for your beautiful words, Oscar Wilde, you demonstrative twat.
Save the library of Alexandria.
Wine, yes, also scotch.
Like... scotch well older than most people with graduate degrees.
Drank a scotch worth more than my car once at a my ex's parents. My dad was a plumber. You can imagine how that worked out for us.
How in the world did this get down voted. It was nominated for a regional Emmy for Christ's sake, wtf...
http://i.imgur.com/cgvuunh.jpg
http://i.imgur.com/cgvuunh.jpg
Lol guy trying *real* hard to get the job...
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xbC-KR4DVvs&feature=youtu.be
Hey man, you should apply too.  It's real.  Don't let your beer dreams be beer dreams.
https://www.thrillist.com/news/nation/get-paid-for-drinking-beer-world-of-beer-drink-it-summer-intern-2016
Almost lost a gf raging about the perverse injustice that is college textbook price.
WHATEVER IT'S 2009!!!
Here come the *men in black...*
*cha-cha*
This is truly endemic of capitalism in general - not that there are any perfect alternatives - but profit *always* takes the front seat to progress in a capitalist society. Cars. Gasoline. Electricity. Internet. History is rife with examples, and the sad thing is, it's not corruption at all - it's just good business.
Breaking bad.
I do cool flair tricks at my bar all the time. 95% of the time, no one notices, since it's packed and they're busy chatting or watching sports.
I do it to spice up my own night, too, keep it entertaining... Still super disappointing when I really nail a trick and look up to notice... Well. That one was just for me.
Once did a ten glass set of rainbow shots for a group on a birthday. Only one person was watching because they were all too hammered to hold their attention one place for more than 3 seconds. 
These things happen. I'm a slave to my trade. Hahaha.
Clearly because it was originally settled by the ancient Dwemer.
Brother did it before he hit 20. (He's fine)
I now live in Philly and laugh my entire hammered cab ride home every time. 
*GUYS I CAN GET DRUNK ANYWHERE, ALL OF YOU NEED TO MOVE HERE*
John Oliver just crushed the shit out of Donald Drumph on last week tonight.
Put your mind at ease and give it a watch.
Car guys
Wow. Thank you so much for your level headed response.
>I'm not sure disclosing my trans past or the more unexpected facts about my body is really that different than the things my partners have had to disclose to me. We all got shit in our past we're afraid people are gonna judge us for.
This is going to stick with me. One of the central beliefs I've acquired through travel and interaction with all the world's people is that there are far fewer things that make us different from one and other than make us the same. Just like any other human on the dating scene, the trouble is opening up.
What we're really asking with this story is "can love conquer all, even a trans state?" Of course it can, and it should. Who someone is should be the chief reason to love them.
>Do you mean telling a love interest that you are thinking of transitioning, that you are in the middle of transition, or that you had transitioned once upon a time? 
Good question. The other artists and I chose to have our trans character in the middle of MTF. Her story is that she was born and treated mostly as a male as a child, but felt female, discovering why when she developed breasts at puberty. 
She has since identified as female, though she had no operations, retaining her male parts until totally sure that's her path.
It is at that point she finds herself in a romance with an average straight guy who has no idea, and struggles deeply with when and how to tell him, and avoids intimacy.
The details feel authentic to us. But who are we to voice this without investigating real stories?
Again, thank you so much for your thoughtful answers.
I'm sorry I never thanked you for your kind and thoughtful response. This, and more stories like it, are the kinds of stories absent from the mainstream media right now. More people need to know about and understand the *people*, on a human level.
First time is all you need for a forever life of exiled Caribbean luxury.
Michael Corleone, The Godfather.
Edit: oh, and obviously batman.
Repost.
Not that I mind.
Utter obsessive love and nerdiness about a given subject.
Just bring up Latin derivatives until you've been doing it for a full run on sentence ^and ^are ^totally ^still ^going ^^until ^^you ^^get ^^embarrassed ^^and ^^^clam ^^^up...
I might fall in love with you.
Edit: formatting
Pink eye anyone?
I say this often. I first saw death at 19, and it was morbid AF, but boy did it make me realize not to sweat the small stuff.
Who gives a fuck whether your SO left the toilet seat up or down, they could get hit by a bus tomorrow.
Don't take shit so seriously. Enjoy yourself.
Breaking.  Bad.
"I did it for me. I liked it. I was good at it. I was really -- I was really alive."
The ability to divide the intellect from the instinct.
Think of how much grief comes from failure to overcome base pleasures like greed and laziness and lust.
Not saying eliminate it, because then roller coasters would be lame. You know what I'm sayin'
The roof.
Bears outside my window.
I blame watching so much ninja turtles as a child.
Cowabunga dude.
Indeed I concur!
Indubitably I am in concurrence with the above statement!
"Untenable" just sounds so intelligent.
Prithmatic Thpraaaay!!
Magic Missile!!!
Where are the scumbag hats on every one of them.
Not really.
Imagine how much money say, $5,000 is to a high school kid?
Enough to last years and years and years.
Imagine how much a middling English family should leave their orphaned boy if they suddenly dropped dead.
Ok it's way less than $5,000 Lily and James musta been ballin' AF.
"Guys, women are going braless now. Dudes. Dudes, ok, don't fuck this up."
---GQ magazine.
Exactly. My bio professor routinely explained black bears thrive in climates where both their size and the vegetation were most suited to survival by running away and climbing.
Grizzlies are larger and the trees in their climate are more weak. They survived by killing the shit out of whatever tried to kill them instead.
Edit: aka don't charge a grizzly.
Sword nerd here. Many Japanese officer's swords were mass produced, but there is a rare chance it is a highly ranked enough officer or old enough family to be part of a daisho, or ancestral sword pairing, aka, an authentic handmade katana that is literally priceless and by law is not allowed to leave Japan.
Still a cool find regardless, what you're looking for are hand chiseled symbols near the hilt, or especially beneath it, on the extended metal section of the sword called the tang.
Should this sword be authentic, a daisho is not just a cool word, and rare. Japanese spiritual belief holds that the soul of every single ancestor that possessed the sword, through the generations, now resides within it. Returning it to the family is not just the right thing to do, not doing it is much like making a family's mausoleum a tourist attraction.
Also many sword nerds more learned than myself could tell you via a picture of the sword's edge, based on its character, wether it was handmade.
You know.  I don't know what I expected, but a litany of people lambasting my bicycling habits and saying I deserve my near death because I don't follow traffic laws wasn't it.
Besides that, uh, *drugs.*
Caffeine. Cocaine. Opium. Alcohol. All enhance our abilities beyond that which we're capable of at a baseline, albeit sometimes at a price - we just don't think of it that way, as we're used to it today m
Today I was traveling through a green light. Someone turned across, ignored me, didn't see me, whatever.
I slammed on the brakes, went over the handlebars, landed face first to see this truck's tires pass half a foot in front of my head.
Imagine yourself on a naked set of two wheels next to a 2 ton truck, hoping they notice you, then promptly go find a broom, turn it upside down, and use it to go fuck yourself. <3
Also: look at the shape of the parked cars, and the trash level on the street.
No litter > litter > trash > full bags > broken bottles > needles, gtfo
Thank you, I just did ask r/asktransgender.  So silly... how could I have failed to notice an entire community.  Of course Caitlyn Jenner, sorry.  :(
The screenplay is a dark comedy short wherein a straight male has to reconcile his attraction to/care for someone he didn't realize was transgender.
With all due respect, I don't remember asking any average straight people to share their opinion on whether they believe transexuals are a real thing.
Really? You just surprise then with anatomy they don't expect?
Playing Diablo II in a room full of friends. They're urging tactics, stay calm, me, I'm Feelin' cocky, big Diablo makes his appearance. I'm playing the Barbarian, my jam is melee.
His line is "Not even death can save you from me!!" To which I respond by running in yelling "Not even death can save you from this sweet dick kicki--- *u/justiceman has been slain by Diablo...*"
Just immediate lightning inferno to the face, I was dead before I finished the sentence. We all had to pause laughing for like 10 minutes.
*sigh* ... So many good times playing that game.
Also, you can get sticky dry erase "roll" that goes right on your wall, no problem. Have an entire idea wall next to my desk that would be hundreds if it were a whiteboard that size.
Christopher Columbus
This is an interesting philosophy discussion. You're correct, of course. Yet one might argue the earth itself doesn't exist on purpose.
If you go back far enough no one has ever existed on purpose.
No one exists on purpose. Nobody belongs anywhere. Everybody dies.
If you're paddling down the street and all of the wheels fall off of your canoe, how many pancakes does it take to fill up a doghouse?
Said to me by a guy on acid.
Just her neck, I'm into the undead.
Haha that's actually a real lesson. I remember in my acting class I had a romance scene with a woman I thought was hilarious and awesome, but always had her hair up.
Then on the day of our scene she let it down and she had this incredible mane of elbow length black hair. It was like a totally different person.
Plus, carry breathmints for that after lunch or a coffee funk.
I've found being "fresh to death breath" guy is awfully attractive, as is helpful sharing.
Thank you. Solid advice. I did a WGA registry.
Also tampering with the mail in any way is a massive capital offense - a law carried over from when it was *the* most crucial form of communication.
Dude. Do not. Fuck. With the mail.
Edit: *fine* guys, *federal* offense. Whatever not wanting to execute dumb teenagers.
*DON'T MAKE ME SAD, YOU WON'T LIKE ME WHEN I'M SAD.*
... I don't like me when I'm sad...
*sniff*
In a tree.
Edit: yes both.
As I learned this past Christmas - actual good butter for your cookies.
40% fat vegetable oil based margarine just *doesn't fucking cut it* unless you want your cookies to look like choc chip puddles.
That's actually a luxury. Unique carbonated mineral water from the hills of Italy. 
Aquafina is pretend.
Came here to post this. Bottled water. I get positively irate that so many people spend extra money on that ruse.
Humankind has been able to *pipe water places* since the friggin' *aquaduct* was invented. It's perfectly fine water everywhere in the first world, and somehow we think some big ass soda plant's roach infested factory produced *bottled* water is more clean?!? More pure?!? Because it's labeled "spring water?" (Pretty sure nestle has been caught using, you guessed it, tap water, I'll post the article if I find it)
Then people say "well, I'm paying for the convenience." WHAT GODDAMN CONVENIENCE?!? THE CONVENIENCE OF A *CONTAINER?!?* THAT'S CALLED "POTTERY" AND WE INVENTED IT LONG BEFORE THE GODDAMN AQUADUCT!!! 
Bring. A permanent bottle. With you.
Tl;dr Bottled water is the greatest hustle that companies have ever pulled and if you buy it you're a fool.
Edit: Formatting
Bottled water. I get positively *irate* that so many people spend extra money on that ruse.
Humankind has been able to *pipe water places* since the friggin' *aquaduct* was invented. It's perfectly fine water everywhere in the first world, and somehow we think some big ass soda plant's roach infested factory produced *bottled* water is *more* clean?!? More pure?!? Because it's labeled "spring water?" (Pretty sure nestle has been caught using, you guessed it, tap water, I'll post the article if I find it)
Then people say "well, I'm paying for the convenience." WHAT GODDAMN CONVENIENCE?!? THE CONVENIENCE OF A CONTAINER?!? THAT'S CALLED "POTTERY" AND WE INVENTED IT LONG BEFORE THE GODDAMN AQUADUCT!!! 
Bring. A permanent bottle. With you.
Tl;dr Bottled water is the greatest hustle that companies have ever pulled and if you buy it you're a fool.
It's like hearing about what your house looks like from the outside all your life, and then finally stepping outside of it to look. There's nothing like it.
Also people love to give you all kinds of reasons why you'll die or get "taken" if you go to x country. They're *real* silly. Don't listen. Not speaking the language? Also barely an issue. Just point.
Guy I've worked with for years in the restaurant business in Philly. Just a brilliantly giving soul, it never ends, he's like the giving tree, and his boss just shits on him, through all of his incredible giving.
Example. I once went in drunk as a skunk hours after the kitchen had closed, moaning about how hungry I was. He personally went back into the kitchen and made me nachos, delicious, nachos, mind you.
When people's phones break, screens, computers, he takes them, offers to fix them at cost, as a kindness, asks for nothing in return. He's done this for total strangers that come into the restaurant.
When my friend was diagnosed with cancer, had no medical insurance, he personally started the guy a go fund me, sharing it to all of his family, friends, made him thousands, including a $5k sum from a rich benefactor that was his personal friend. He kept none of it.
He once made me a wager that ultimately helped me to lose 40lbs - by doing an ultra low carb diet with me, working out / running together 3x/wk. The wager was if I didn't get down to 180, where I once felt healthy, I had to pay him $100. If I made it, he would pay me $100. I was there, along with his help, in 3 months, and I was so grateful I bought him a $50 bottle of scotch and told him forget the wager.
Besides that, just an altogether stand-up, charming guy. The guy who always pays for drinks, always shows up with a bottle of wine, always offers a kind word. I honestly think sometimes, when in a socially or emotionally tough situation, "what would ______ do?"
He would do the kindest, most giving and charming thing, in the given situation, I guarantee it.
Overall, there aren't enough people in the world like him, and the world is far too unkind to him. I try to tell him this as often as possible. It will come back to him someday.
Back in my day you had to download for three *days* to get a porn. *And you couldn't get phone calls the entire time.*
Almost any pro sport.
Meth
I disagree. Less pelvic fat = less mass around the base of the penis.
End result is less mass in the pelvis, more exposed mass in the penis. You could make the argument that your dick doesn't actually get bigger if you really want to.
But changing that last line to "appear" bigger just isn't as satisfying.
>Television shows stay on the air because they are successful, not because they are good.
Exactly. Look at reality television. Even the people that watch it and *love* it *know* it's garbage... But it still gets tons and tons of viewers... Which is why MTV stopped showing music videos... History channel & discovery died reality tv and ancient aliens deaths...
It's interesting how behind we ~~seem~~ are compared to many many other developed nations. Here's the thing, for a thousand miles in every direction from any point in most of the U.S, barring the south, *Everyone speaks English.* We always seem to forget that.
That's changing of course, and the world is more global than ever, but we had no reason for most of our history to be any good at foreign language, unlike Europe.
Uhhh, reeverdarche.
Me too.
I'm the only person I know that paid off their student loans before 30. I'm also the only one who took finance class in high school.
Coincidence?!?
Who said I was an atheist?
Meh. That's the internet. 500 upvotes... Only *comments* are the angry people having a bad day. xD
Interesting where the commenters' minds jumped to. Says more about them than it does about me. I could be Buddhist, and I most certainly shave my neck. 
What if I told you... Not Christian =/= neck bearded atheist.
Took a girl to the junkyard to smash things once. Not for everyone, but WE had a blast.
Plus I got a real kick out of withholding the details and being like "Here, put these safety goggles on"
Pfft. Sometimes you're doin' the fuckin, other times you're gettin' fucked.
Tim knows what's up.
Not a bathroom but similar. Bar I work at loooves jenga. Writes fun things on the blocks. Mostly nonsense, the occasional "take off ur shuurt, lul" and yes, numbers.
We're a big party bar, so keep in mind, people get kinda bombed there. About a month ago, we got an irate call from a Father because his 13 year old daughter was getting calls from drunk people at our bar. Yea. Turns out one of the dad's friends thought it'd be *REAL* funny to write hers on a block.
Dad didn't think so. Neither did my boss, had us comb the bar blacking out all the numbers with a sharpie.
*I* thought it was fucking *hilarious.*
The prevailing view is, unfortunately, that "a man provides... A woman is provided for."
But I'll say this. The last time I was in a fantastic relationship, my Gf provided.  She gave the encouragement I needed to finish writing, believe it was good. She provided me with editing, and feedback. She was an extremely giving person.
Being provided with what you need, even something that simple... It's the greatest feeling in the world, and we're programmed not to let it happen to us. We're to do it, and... That's not equality.
Meeting on equal footing, us vs. the world is what I look for most in an SO. The best love I've found has been that way. Us vs. The world.
Why?
So we can go out and has all of the fun YO.
Maybe it's a long shot but she just didn't get what you were saying? Sometimes I'm oblivious AF when women hit on me. Ok all of the time.
When your dick betrays you and turns into a sprinkler half way through your piss session.
Thanks penis, I didn't want to wear these jeans to work today anyway.
Also Tolkien himself was hugely inspired by *actual* mythology. Elves and dwarves, for example, hail from Norse mythology, as do rings of great power.
So it goes for other writers and tales.
And during the attack...
BZZZYEEEAaroowww WOOM WOOM BSHHHKKK BSSSHKKKT RETTTTT
Also it's little consolation but 95% of the alcohol there isn't flammable enough to catch fire. Needs to be higher than 100 proof, most stuff is around 80.
That's why 151 has that "weird" top.
Edit: For the non proof system users, flammable = more than 50% alcohol, which is usually not much. Most are about 40% - 45%.
Also paranoid AF walking around with four shifts worth of cash.
DON'T EVEN LOOK AT ME MOTHERFUCKER. WHAT.
This is brutally exacerbated by the fact that corporations have so much capital with which to lobby for legislation that the chances of any laws being passed that *close* these loopholes is slim to none.
Always piss before you leave the bar.
Anything made of leather.
Thanks for replying, btw.  We're only luck away from not getting noticed at all. I appreciate you, human.
Thx
You're out drunk at 3:40am on a Monday I guess?
Funny. I don't feel like I'm fucking up that much. I'm a writer or whatever. We sposed' b all fukkd up.
But like I've written good things once. Love Me.
Butt lik. Whut about us murricans n Canadians.
Edit: n' mehicans.
Does she suck? I've yet to meet a Karen that didn't suck.
YEEEEEAAAA I LOOK ATCHO KIT KAT CAKE FA RILL
Yeeeeahhh dawg thx fo Karen. 
Yo. But like. You think anyone else b Karen?
Aww thanks! Like a few hoomans.
Edit: you know what. Most hoomans care about their fello hoomans. 'Tis true.
Aww thanks buddy!
Maybe I'm reading too much into this, but it reminds me of people who shout loudly that "because Rupert Murdoch owns x, it's just an outlet for his propaganda!! The news just propagates *his* agenda!!"
Well. That's quite an insult to the integrity of the *thousands* of journalists in their employ.
Sure, a lot of people stand for some bullshit at their job, but "everyone's just paid off to lie?" Come on.
Lol reminds me of the theory that jar jar binks is a Sith Lord.
No no guys. He's just a shitty character who's shitty behavior was shitily not thought through by the human filmmakers who make human mistakes.
Buzz Aldrin once punched a "the moon landing was a hoax" conspiracy theorist in the face.
So... It's a good thing?
Finding your own fun for zero dollars, like "the floor is lava" or the"How many trees can I climb in this park before I get yelled at by a rent a cop" game.
Christopher Columbus. But I think the world has mostly noticed that now.
Gandalf has said some pretty badass shit.
Many people fail at lighting. It's not hard - The subject of your photo must be *opposite* the best source of light. 
I see many groups of people line up in front of windows, or with lights shining at the person holding the phone or camera... The results are often grainy, dark, bad photos.  Set up the photo opposite the windows! Turn off lights that face the camera! Bang. Way better quality.  Also, natural light is always better then artificial light, unless you have thousands of dollars worth of lighting equipment.
Example: next time you take a selfie, try one with no lights on, facing a window. Your eyes will shine. Even better on a rainy day, with even light.
I get *irate* when people just chuck their hazard lights on and stop traffic *when there is a parking spot right nearby.* And oh, if you're there for more than two minutes, OH, I'm seeing red.
Really dude?? REALLY?? You *needed* to back up three blocks worth of traffic so you could run into Dunkin' Donuts 'real quick???' You couldn't just take an extra *one* minute to park instead of sitting there, backing up traffic, and taking an extra *10* minutes from the scores of people trying to drive by you?!?
YOUR CONVENIENCE JUST ROBBED 15x THAT AMOUNT OF CONVENIENCE FROM THE PEOPLE BEHIND YOU, YOU SELFISH, SELFISH PRICK!!
See. 100mph just thinking about it.
I agree with what most people are saying. Twitter is easy to hate, because people talk about it all the goddamn time.
At its bare bones, what it really is, is instant sharing of ultra simple bits of info... And you can connect with thousands of people via those *ideas alone.*
If you try, you can fill up your feed with fascinating info you really care about, and create a community around anything, instantly.
It's pretty awesome, in every sense of the word. But I totally get hating it.
StumbleUpon is still pretty awesome.
"How old do you think I am?"
This is a terrible idea. Let's piss the Arab world off more, shall we?
A townie who will kick your ASS at pool, who may or may not also be Vietnam veteran.
Start dancing poorly. It just feels like it has to be the thing.
Bartender here. I'm working on the book, but I think it's been written.
A sad realization I had recently kinda has me down... I noticed for the past 8 years since I've started working, my Christmas shopping list has been huge. I'd give gifts to around 30 people each year that weren't immediate family. My boss. Co-workers. Friends, old friends. Even my bartenders in my neighborhood.  Birthdays are similar.
In all of that time, I only remember receiving two or three gifts in return, from that group. I... It's whatever, I didn't give in order to get stuff back... But when I think about how much thought I put into the ones I gave, how I catered each one to each friend, how excited I was to give it to them, to see their surprise and enjoyment of the thing I'd gotten them... How sometimes a thing just fits someone I know so well I simply *must* get it for them... Well. It sure bummed me out to realize so few of them had that kind of excitement about getting *me* something. :(
Assuming we remain able to fly over it, contemplate it, and see it on maps, but can't interact with it or find it anywhere... Clearly it would mean a massive glitch in the matrix.
If we couldn't find China it'd prove *this is all just a simulation...*
Focus on your partner rather than yourself, that's always been a secret that worked great for me.
Now, have I forgotten that secret and had to guiltily apologize and vow to do better on round two? Hell yea. You feel like shit, but, hey, most women are willing to forgive the disappointment - it's kind of a compliment, after all.
But, yea, something about concentrating on *their* pleasure instead of "holyshitomgthisissohot I'm gonna !!!... Oops..." And being in your own head has always worked wonders for me. Pretty soon, you're listening and responding to how she's feeling, getting a rush when *she's* getting a rush, since you're concentrating on her heat instead of your own. Before you know it, you're right there with her when she's on top of the mountain. Yea. The big, sexy good sex mountain, because, metaphors. 
Hope that helps.
Lol too bad they'd never get it if it was.
Lol shit just imagine Louis C.K. trying to do a stand up set for an alien congress... That was just for us, guys.
Our sweet sense of Humor.
Too bad those assholes would never get it.
Pfft. Obviously. Ass cancer is way less photogenic.
Just like we all make fun of scientology...
Good thing I won't be around in 300 years to see if humanity has learned anything...
That guy is ignorant as *fuck* ... That's the oldest brewery on earth. It's the beer that spawned craft beers even *trying to do that style.*
That's the danger of loving something for the idea of it, rather than actually loving *it.* Most beer lovers I know, true beer *lovers,* are excited to drink *any* beer. Truly excited for it.
Edit: oops I read "weihenstephaner" instead of "warsteiner" ... Still. Fuck that guy.
Magic, the Gathering.
It's almost impossible to play casually. Anyone can spend hundreds to make a deck incredible, and then they treat you like they just dunked in your face when you lose.
Na, dude. I just didn't spend $400 on banned cards.
At tournaments it's a legit strategy to not shower the month leading up to it, so as to "stink out" your opponent. So, yea, I don't do those, either.
Only hope was in draft tournaments, (all players on equal footing due to drawing/building decks as part of it) ... Then the hardcore fans ruined that, too, as they would just take great cards for their *other* decks, and blame luck and that when they lost.
HOLY SHIT THERE'S A BALL FONDLERS MOVIE
Oooooorrr THE U.S. AUTHORITIES have doctored the *DOCTORING* of the incident in the wake of Paris islamaphobia so as to not undermine our views of ... School authority. YEA.
I'll be in my bunker with my tin foil hat on.
BALL FONDLERS
Power banks. Cost $12. Carries a full, portable extra charge for your phone.
 Saves your ass without an outlet. Saves you from arguing with the bartender about him charging your phone. Astounds me more people don't have them.
OH SHIT THE OPPORTUNITIES
Moses' soft, wrinkled foreskin. Morgan Freeman's reasonably sized black dick. Bacon flavored condoms. The Olsen twins drowning in a dumpster full of semen. Actual bacon condoms. A sensual massage from former president Bill Clinton. The face where erections go to die. A pillowcase full of sex rats. The horrifying corkscrew dick of the American Mallard duck. Swedish hamster anal. Rabid chihuahuas humping children at playgrounds. Jennifer's big black dick. The cookie monster's massive stash of feederist porn. The bronze encased left testicle of lance Armstrong.
"A dog's cold wet nose on your ass during sex"
Done.
>3. You're so poor that tipping is an expense you can't afford.
I get it. Who hasn't gotten a bill and been like DAAAMN. I also get that this response is mostly a lol filled fuck you. Also. Most servers make plenty, and that's a fact.
But me? I make $2.83/hr before tips. Sure. You're poor. But you gave my rich ass upper tax bracket restaurant owner $58 for your meal, so if you're not too poor for that, you're not too poor to tip the goddamn appropriate amount for your fellow poor ass boy slinging entrees for a living. You already spent the money. The tip is, real answer, the most dickhead place to save money.
You wanna save money keep your poor ass at home & make spaghetti <3
Also more and more often there are fresh farmed versions of the same as the US gets more on board with locally sourced produce.
In Philly we have Reading terminal market. Same or lower price on veggies, all locally farmed and fresh.
I'm American, I've never heard this.  Yet *this* is now by far my favourite thing Americans say.
Y'all'd've realized it if y'all'd heard yourselves a talking.
You bet your sweet non American dick that shit is the TITS
By the same token, it is incomprehensible that we burn ancient treasure millions of years in the making just to go to the grocery store.
Fossil fuels are not renewable.
 The amount of chemical energy contained in them is utterly amazing. Yet we burn this finite resource like it's as plentiful as air.
"How old are you?"
If you're a woman asking me, the only correct answer is "older than you."
It was Thanksgiving. I was just a kid. I shared the opinion that we (my family) must be poor, because we didn't go on cruises or to Disney world for vacation.
My grandpa, may he rest in peace, says to me gently "you ever go to bed without dinner?"
"...No."
"How about without heat in the winter time?"
"No, Grandpa."
And he said, I'll never forget it, "Well I've known cold, and I've known hunger... And when you've known those, then you'll know what it's like to be poor."
That's a perspective I'm forever grateful for, that I'll never forget.
My mother later told me what *his* Thanksgiving meal was as a kid. One can of tomato soup.
There were 7 people in his family.
Forgetting to look right instead of left while crossing the street in the UK.
Lived there for a year as an American. Saved the life of everyone that came to visit me at least once.
Fuckin' drunk Pennsylvanians...
Wait is this seriously real? 10,000 people a year via a snail that could be prevented for .80p???
That can't be real. I could fix that for 8,000 pounds, says math.
Edit: 10,000 ppl a year die via snakebites, tho there are many anti-venoms out there.  I just... What are the details, is this instant snail death wtf... I'm looking it up...
This. I'll never, ever forget the island party we had one time on a river. Everything was going awesome, until one guy gets too drunk, decides the girl texting him from a bar nearby sounds better than staying here. We spend the next hour struggling to convince him he's way too drunk to kayak over there, and even if he were stone sober and it were blazing daylight instead of night, it would take every once of his wit to *walk* it without drowning.
His buddies ended up tying him up. 
The next day we walked across, and the only thing that made it even remotely possible was our tubes. He couldn't stop singing our praises.
I don't.
It's kind of surprising how often that seems to happen. This is far from the first time I've heard such a story.
This happens surprisingly often.
"I don't mean to sound racist, but ... *insert racist sentiment here*"
"A few light taps upon the pane made him turn to the window. It had begun to snow again. He watched sleepily the flakes, silver and dark, falling obliquely against the lamplight. The time had come for him to set out on his journey westward. Yes, the newspapers were right: snow was general all over Ireland. It was falling on every part of the dark central plain, on the treeless hills, falling softly on the Bog of Allen and, farther westward, softly falling into the dark mutinous Shannon waves. It was falling, too, upon every part of the lonely churchyard on the hill where Michael Furey lay buried. It lay thickly drifted on the crooked crosses and headstones, on the spears of the little gate, on the barren thorns. His soul swooned softly as he heard the snow falling faintly through the universe and faintly falling, like the descent of their last end, upon all the living and the dead."
James Joyce's *The Dead*
Woodcarving.
Tried my hand at it months ago, was actually kind of good at it... But my hobby quota is totally full already...
Glowy shit yo.
"uses of the word fuck" just sounded clinical as fuck.  But thanks for the downvote.
Fuck.
This. I work exclusively to pay for my travel addiction.
Someone hire me to travel for a living, please.
Why dogs are better than cats, and cat owners delude themselves into thinking their cats actually love them.
Hate me all you want, reddit, if I'm getting paid $100 an hour, I'm going for the throat. xD
Women get to use their looks as bartenders, waitresses and strippers. Sure, they've got to deal with a few sleezes, but as a *male* bartender, I actually have to cultivate personality to get people into my bar. Ugh.
"Waterboarding at Guantanamo bay."
*sounds* fabulous if you like... Don't focus on what either of those things actually *refer* to.
Susan didn't tell you that, did she...
I'm good at mental math simply because I do it every day (bartender w/an old school cash register at a bar).
I all but scream math answers at people in my daily life before they can pull out a calculator because I know they'll think I'm a a goddamn prodigy.
Commit a few well placed quotes to memory and everyone thinks you're a genius.
Hehe my grandpa moved to a desert, so he cut our grass every time he visited.
Grass is always greener...? On the...?
Same with "risk." 
I almost never have a spare 8 hours to hate my friends.
Good point. I try my best to research context in order to experience them as audiences then did. Perhaps once I've seen more older movies I will have a deeper appreciation.
Perhaps someday I will go back with a better understanding of "bringing up baby" and have more positive experience.
I'll never forget one of my profs blowing our class' collective minds explaining the context of "a doll's house" after we had utterly failed to understand it's significance. I strive to give everything a chance.
You mean it's not because every American man immediately called their buddy a pussy when they saw him driving a French car?
Fuck, *this thread* Jesus...
Username checks out
These people ruined fedoras for me and Bruno Mars.
Starks.
Ned Stark.
Hehe I hear that was their goal.
Not letting you down. But being mistaken for actual bare naked ladies and getting seen because of it.
"Hit a dragon with a giant redwood tree once."
I can identify. My situation certainly hasn't been easy, bless the poor women that have tried to love me anyway, but they just... Don't hold a candle. And they always say 'well you can't beat the dead for love' and 'you can't compare, that's not fair' but the simple fact is it's not like that, and I don't know why this is all pouring out of me now, maybe because her birthday was recent and she's been on my mind but... The simple fact is she was God damn incredible, by anyone's standards, not just mine. She was a linguist, and an actress, fluent in four languages (Spanish, German, Turkish and English) and she was goddamn *stupid* beautiful, fiery strawberry red blonde hair in Irish curls...(I'll dig up a picture, maybe...). She made me laugh more than anyone I've ever met, she got me gifts that reminded her of me, just because. She was voted both "class clown" *and* "most uninhibited" by her high school graduating class. She wasn't perfect, she skipped class way too much and even failed classes, sometimes, which was ridiculous considering how much of a genius she obviously was... But. I felt like the luckiest man alive that I somehow convinced her to be with me, yet, unbelievably she felt the same way about me, my music, my writing, my upbringing, that she was lucky to know me, let alone discover love with me and have it reciprocated. She was one in a million. One of a kind. So supportive of me, to the point of inspiration. She was probably the one. Her best friend confided that she had said as much about me.
>sometimes the 'best' thing to do in these situations is just too much to bear.
That hit close to home. Wew. I've tried to do the 'best' thing. The poor women that have tried to love me since her, they're all beautiful, wonderful people... But there's nothing they can do.  I'll never love anyone like her, no way. Even if I share my entire life with someone, care deeply for them, it'll never feel like they're my other half. My other half died in a hospital in York Pennsylvania on May 5th, 2007, and the world is a darker place without her.
I'd out "Jack of all trades" the *shit* out of 100 random people. I dunno how to define it, I guess as "being 'above average' at the largest amount of unrelated shit."
A near perfect fake Scottish accent. Won a writing award once. Can play Didjiridoo. Trained to fight with Swords. Can do a solid moonwalk. The list goes on.
All of this would be boasting if they weren't the only things I'd ever accomplished in each category.
Lol oh yea, good ol' drunk / loud bar sign language. Including the "I'd like another" glass tap, the "another round!" revolvy finger, and the "a shot of ---" shot glass mime.
You all do it, and it's glorious.
Edit: oh yes, and the classic "when you get a sec?" one fingered head nod + eye contact. Almost as recognisable as the "check please"
As soon as I did it I tried to go right back to "in a relationship with ---"
But then it was just "in a relationship" because ... Y'kno. She couldn't confirm it again. *That* was hard... But I'd done it. I guess it was a "rip the bandaid off" sort of choice.
I didn't make it "single" for years and years.
I'm going to call it now and say he's someone's child out of wedlock.  Bastards are all the rage these days.
Hey I could be right..
Took me almost 2yrs to switch my Facebook status from "in a relationship with ____" to "single" when my girlfriend died in a car accident.
You're not alone.
Dude in Philly we love stuffing all kinds of ridiculous things into breakfast foods, I hope other people do this.
Cheesecake stuffed French toast might be the closest thing to orgasms that isn't. Peanut butter layered pancakes... Same ballpark 
Ugh had an SO ruin alarms for me by doing that.  After a while my super sweet brain decided those noises that were meant to wake me up were obviously just pretend, since I never did.
To this day I have to switch my alarm up every few weeks.
>I just want to grab dinner and goof around with someone.
Username checks out.
Playing dumb.  To make strides in some fabled world where men think that's commendable. No, I don't find it attractive, and any man who does can kindly take a large foreign object, lube it up nicely, find a private corner and go fuck himself.
Naa. Just plant them wherever it's ok to do so.
Sure there are a lot of practical considerations, the point is that it's much more doable than ever I would have thought.
Also, my entry on Pulp Fiction for anyone interested:
http://100weeks100movies.com/1/post/2015/10/95-pulp-fiction-is-innovation-in-storytelling.html
I always just focus on relaxing. *i can't sleep I can't sleep I can't sleep* doesn't help. As soon as I start thinking *that,* I stop and focus on taking calm deep breaths. Before I know it I'm out.
A sweet, warm fuzzy robe for winter.
World's best garment.
Still WAY better than my ex's I'm sure.
Crushing it.
Rich compared to the globe. I read it in reddit TIL a week or so ago.
Ok let's check those figures one by one. 1 tree sequesters 1 ton of Co2 in 40 years. Correct?
Ok. I figured it out. Our miscommunication happens at 80 years. You're correct if we stop out calculations at the death of our average human at 80 years. I, however, am calculating from the time of tree planting. In our human's final year of life, he plants his last two trees. 80 years after his death, those final two trees have finished their 4 tons. A net total years of 160.
You were looking at final totals. I was looking at in the moment totals.
Forget your cute graph just look at the numbers
Are you just trolling me, or do you really not see the simple math here?
The numbers are. Avg carbon output of a human, 4tons/yr. 1tree sequesters 1ton every 40yrs. Two trees, in 80 years, sequester 4 tons. Therefore erasing one year's worth of carbon emissions of the average human in 80 years.
According to the numbers we've found two trees will in 80 years.
Check this out.  R/theydidthemath helped me get here, but they made it way more complicated than it needed to be.
Check this out.  [The Average tree sequesters 1 ton of Co2 in 40 years] (http://www.americanforests.org/discover-forests/tree-facts/).
The average human produces [4 tons of Co2 in a year](http://www.eoearth.org/view/article/150926/).
Therefore, if you plant just 4 trees every year, that's 4 tons in 40 years.  Your carbon impact is gone 40 years later.
Edit:  It's pretty damn simple.  If the average human plants four trees a year for life, they have no impact on global warming whatsoever in 40 years.  The problem is Americans produce an average of 20 tons per year. :/  20 trees a year is a little more tough.
Check this out.  [The Average tree sequesters 1 ton of Co2 in 40 years] (http://www.americanforests.org/discover-forests/tree-facts/).
The average human produces [4 tons of Co2 in a year](http://www.eoearth.org/view/article/150926/).
Therefore, if you plant just 4 trees every year, that's 4 tons in 40 years.  Your carbon impact is gone 40 years later.  r/theydidthemath helped me get there, but they made it way more complicated than it needed to be, just like folks did here.
Edit:  It's pretty damn simple.  If the average human plants four trees a year for life, they have no impact on global warming whatsoever in 40 years.
I should have just done the Math myself from the goddamn beginning.  All we're doing is misunderstanding each other.
Doesn't this mean if the average human plants 2 trees a year for life and lives to be 80, they'll have effectively erased their carbon impact?
1 tree = 1 ton in 40yrs -> 2 tons in 80 years. 2 trees = 4 tons in 80 years.
Therefore planting 2 trees per year neutralizes (in many years of course) the average carbon footprint of 4 tons a year.  Granted, it takes 80 years for each pair of trees to do so.  But still.
Shockingly doable.
Edit: PM me to help with a kickstarter to achieve this.
That's... Actually doable. I could plant three trees a week.
How fantastically encouraging.
*stiiiill* tryna get that Oscar...
Yea but like... J.j. Abrams...
That is *genius*
Start a kickstarter and get them made yourself. ... I'd back you.
Climate change total apocalyptic upheaval in about 25 years.
Dude some of the *coolest* people I've ever met didn't know what they wanted to do with their lives. 
I couldn't say what it is I want to do with my life besides be happy.
Aha!! I *knew* there was a math sub. Just couldn't find it, thank you.
Oh. I just saw a maze that can't be solved.
Those poor kids, wtf...
Oh... I just saw a maze that isn't solvable...
Those poor kids...
My magic missile never misses...
Aaall da bitches...
"The fool thinks himself wise... But the wise man knows himself to be a fool"
"The fool thinks himself wise... But the wise man knows himself to be a fool"
Edit a word.
Grew up watching Westerns. Probably watched 5 for every non western I viewed as a kid, but I'm open to discussion.
Racism *certainly* underpins the entire thing, but such a trait is treated as *far* from heroic. Indeed, the entire film is something of a cautionary tale against such hatred, in wasting one's life on revenge.  I would argue that the very essence of Ethan's racism lends sympathy to the American Indians in the film, since his hatred is so... Poignant and morally questionable.
But a debate like this could go on all week. Suffice to say we got different things from the movie.
Thank you. Correcting now.
Great job.
Any vampire.
Edit: wasn't being punny, children, vampires are perfect examples of "civilized" villains who are often literally bloodthirsty. Indeed, so much so that it is an obstacle for them.
Vampires often must curb their desires for blood for a variety of reasons... To maintain their cover in society and avoid persecution by locals, to keep themselves in check, to not wipe out their crop of blood that keeps them alive... Excellent example, but thanks for the downvotes.
Everyone gets so pissed when we call ourselves "Americans."
"What Jerks!  There's South America, Middle America, we're *all* 'Americans'
Yea, except Brazilians have the luxury of calling themselves *Brazilians* ... You know what sounds stupid as fuck? United Statesian. That's what.
That's why we call ourselves Americans guys, it was the easiest shit to say.
Edit: HOLY BAWLLZ AMERICA I BEEN GUILDED... Thank you thank you... And to think this was just some stand up I once wrote down and never performed!! :D
Everything, really.
I guess I lost someone young, so most the little things never bothered me much. Getting a B. Someone's jealous ex. Wether people "like you" or not. If your pic got any likes.
Nothing deserves that level of seriousness except God damn enjoying yourself, you could get hit by a bus tomorrow.
Exactly.  10th anniversary list here:  http://www.afi.com/100years/movies10.aspx
Original list:  http://www.afi.com/100Years/movies.aspx
The list you're thinking of [10th anniversary]:  http://www.afi.com/100Years/movies10.aspx
Also *Vertigo* is right here, #61:  http://100weeks100movies.com/the-movies.html#Vertigo
IMDB = the popular vote.
AFI = the professional vote
Shawshank was included in the 10th anniversary edition, it was made too recently when the list came out.
Thanks so much for your thoughts.
By universal, I mean most viewers should be able to understand and be deeply affected by them, no matter who they are and where they're from, not that each and every audience member must love and find it inoffensive.  
"Universally inoffensive" was never mentioned.  
universal
yoonÉ™vÉ™rsÉ™l/Submit
adjective
1.  of, affecting, or done by all people or things in the world or in a particular group; applicable to all cases.
You know how you sometimes see a guy drive by in an awesome corvette and think... Hey f that guy... That's how vandals feel about everything.
It's a rage at the world. I lived in a rough Philly neighborhood for about three years. If you had nice things, they got messed up, simple as that.
I came home one day and this kid was just punching my bike. No reason. Just rights, lefts, kicks. It was there, not inside and safe, and worth more than $80, so *fuck that bike.*
You'd resent anything nice, too, if all you've ever known is awful third hand or stolen shit. 
*dude there's seriously only one serious answer to this thread*
Probably get buried, but had a friend who died suddenly in a car accident years ago. Not funny at all, but *she* was one of the funniest people I knew.
The news had been broken to all of us, understandably we were all a wreck at college. Still are sometimes. We go outside, and we're trying to keep it together. Our other buddy is going on about how she's with us, through everything, she'll always be with us, look how beautiful it is today, she's all around us, even now."
At that exact moment, a bird took humongous shit on his arm.
Every single one of us must have laughed for ten minutes. *She* would have thought that was god damn *hilarious.*  ... Most appropriate inappropriate laughter I can ever remember.
Probably get buried, but my best buddy got a cancer diagnosis. Testicular. *and* he's got a sense of humor.
He spent the next hour making nut jokes. Called people. Gave news. Followed with nut jokes. (Hey bud, how you been? So I have nut cancer, they said my balls were too big to be allowed so they're taking one. Don't worry I'll still have more nuts than you. Peace.) 
Went to the restaurant we work at. Broke the news. Proceeded to troll everyone.
"Why are you here working?"
"It's my cancer day, ok, I do what I want."
"Dude can you clear table 5?"
"Only if I can carry all the plates in my big swollensack skin.  DO IT YOURSELF I HAVE CANCER. *fake cry*"
Everyone, through laughter, "that's not funny."
Entire summer into fall has been an exercise in inappropriate laughter. Had the mass removed about a month ago, and he's doing just fine (except the medical bills, no insurance... :( )
Still crushes me now and then.
"Dude you should get some cancer, I been crushin' it in the pity pussy department."
*through laughter* god damn it I hate you.
Communism Isn't the answer. Respect for your fellow man is.
The *actual* United nations you mean? Rather than the United nations' elite that have managed to get elected, sitting around talking about how they can make more money?
Absolutely. I've been rolling this around in my brain for a while, trying to make sense of it, and that's the answer - hating down.
The greatest source of woe has *always been* upward, from war to greed. Even in the circles of the wealthy, *they're* taught to hate down, hate down on the "lazy" middle classes (the beneficiaries of taxes), and the government, that try to take from them, rather than see workers as their fellow man. It helps their business.
It's shitty for your fellow man, but that's capitalism, it's just good business. Protect your bottom line, do whatever you can to minimize your greatest expense... Taxes.
Until business profit becomes less important than our fellow man, it may never change. What can we *do about it??* 
Absolutely. I've been rolling this around in my brain for a while, trying to make sense of it, and that's the answer - hating down.
The greatest source of woe has *always been* upward, from war to greed. Even in the circles of the wealthy, *they're* taught to hate down, hate down on the "lazy" middle classes (the beneficiaries of taxes), and the government, that try to take from them, rather than see workers as their fellow man. It helps their business.
It's shitty for your fellow man, but that's capitalism, it's just good business. Protect your bottom line, do whatever you can to minimize your greatest expense... Taxes.
Until business profit becomes less important than our fellow man, it may never change. What can we *do about it??* 
Edit: guys I'm not saying communism is the answer, that's the type of idiot misinformation that continues to divide us. Capitalism is still the best system - it just requires respect for your fellow man.
How do you mis pronounce *the main character's name the entire movie*
Dude I have a theory about this, maybe it's an excuse, but back in the day, people really did make some great changes. American revolution, protesting Vietnam... But like... None of them had netflix.
Seriously think about it, wtf did ben Franklin have to do besides tinker with shit and invent electricity? Read and drink. Maybe go out whoring. Sit on some sweet committees.
If he had the option of pizza in 20 minutes and Rick & Morty on demand, maybe we'd all still be reading by gaslights. All I'm saying.
You're really making me wish I hadn't been so level headed about the guy that jumped me a month ago.
Defended myself, got a black eye, went on with my life. Young dumb guy mad his ex found solace in a not idiot. Should have pressed charges.
The point at which I started to worry was the *before* work part.  You need a drink after work? Fine. Almost every day? ... Mmm... Maybe think about a new job.
Need a drink to *go* to work?? Maybe think about your life choices.
HAHA.
The tent was pitched. The circus was a huge hit. But the man never flew out of the canon.
Hehe.  Next day euphoria in that situation *is* pretty awesome.  It was like the first time I got laid all over again.
Dude that *happened.*
Haha dude I thought it was a trap!!
"Oh you're going to bed, you're not gonna... *try to hook up with this girl that ISN'T MEEEE?!?!?* *Pulls out meat cleaver, chops off dick.*
Most wait staff I know are in the zone.  They're not paying attention to stuff like that, they're just doing their job as efficiently as possible.  I would not have minded... sure it's a *little* odd to just point at your glass.  But we get it.  Once or twice, meh.  If you literally never say words to me and just point at things, sure, I'm going to think you're a dick, but I'll never give you stank face.  That's just throwing money away.
Edit:  You can point/wave at your glass politely *or* rudely, really.  That weird restaurant / bar sign language is totally real.
My motto as a bartender.  The struggle is real.
"Excuse me miss..." *smile* "could we... maybe...?"
Then tip <15% for being a shitty waitress.  Use your words, even bad wait staff aren't your pet.
"Who's the fella owns this shithole?"
No. Differing opinions are welcome as long as they're founded in evidence and support. :)
The wild bunch is even higher ranking on the 100weeks100movies list! 
I can't wait to get to it.
The academy disagrees (2 Oscars, 39 nominations), but you're welcome to your opinion. :)
Had a threesome once that was so out of the blue it still blows my mind.  All I did was throw a party, be myself, get drunk and decide I was going to bed. A girl I used to hook up with, who was still my awesome close friend, was there, along with this girl I had hooked up with a handful of times.  That's usually a terrible recipe. A recipe for 90s movie scenarios where they team up and ruin my life.
They teamed up alright.
One comes into my room, and i'm thinking... Guilt guilt guilt... Didn't want this to happen because, hey I'm actually a pretty nice guy, I don't wanna be wreckless with hearts and shit, when the other chick is here.
Then she comes in *too,* and I'm thinking... THIS IS IT, THIS IS WHERE THEY DUMP THEIR DRINKS ON YOU AND BOUNCE. Nope.
Both start cuddling and giggling with me. I *wish* it *was* a 90s movie, so people could have seen my reaction as I went, in typical ignorant guy time, from "oh FUCK" to... "Oh... Wtf...?" To... "Oh *fuuuucckk they're both bi how did I forget thaaaat...*
They started making out, and shit went down exactly like a porno. Perfect threesome. They were into each other, no awkward third wheel, I was... Drunk enough to *never finish* somehow so I looked like a total stud when sober me would have lasted like two seconds because they were both like 9s...
Apparently I left the room at one point and went out into the still going party with my arms raised up like fucking Rocky, silently walked through, and went back to it.
As you can probably tell it's the most active account in my spank bank.
Edit: the best part was, that awkward pre-threesome giggly small talk I always hate in porn was *totally there,* while I was trying to figure out wtf was going on.
"Oh, you're going to bed?"
"Uh... Yea..."
"Oh... We don't want you to go to bed..."
"Lol whut?"
Edit:  #2  Formatting.
Ooooh man this guy snapped at me one time on a date (I'm a bartender). Yea like, with his fingers?
You should have seen the lightning and venom fire from his date's eyes. It was beautiful.
Came here to say this.  
That sinking feeling when you've worked up the nerve, and approached someone you think is really attractive... As you slowly realize 'wow... You just... *suck.* You suck *so bad.*
Well defend your point of view with evidence / examples and I'm happy to listen.
(OP & shameless owner of the blog here)
Shitty *writing* too. The writing is *so crucial* and it often gets overlooked. 
"Anaken you're breaking ma hurrrtt. You're going down a path I can't follow."
Even Natalie Portman couldn't make *that* sound good.
"It's over Anaken. I have the high ground."
Even Ewan Magregor's *face* when he's saying that line is like *I can't believe I'm saying that line, is that REALLY the line???"
"Who's the fella owns this shithole?" ... Five seconds after walking into a saloon filled with people plotting how to hunt you down and kill you?!?
No one can utter that line without sounding like they've got an 8 foot dick and steel bowling balls for nuts, *nobody.*
   
Even Natalie Portman.
Edit:  But seriously, that's like rule #1 of writing, people don't say shit like "Uhhurr you're breaking my heart!"  When their heart is getting broken, only ten year olds and soap opera writers write dialogue like that.
True.
It's proven on the list.
Lol yea. Because it was so good.
Edit: lol you want me to repost it and fix that?
Mmm. For me it's so different. It's not conversation that lacks, it's like... Respect we've lost. We've always had this weirdly contentious, one upping friendship, and I've come to realize that's not a good friendship. Or maybe it is. I don't know. A lot of the best entertainer duos had a great time poking fun at each other.
I can't do it anymore, though, because I can't avoid dropping into nasty truths like... Least I actually went to college... And or chose to do something with my life.. it doesn't work anymore, because I just... The guy can't take care of himself, pay his bills on time, or do anything but live paycheck to paycheck... And there's nothing I can say to the guy, I'm his friend, not his mom, you know?
>of course it's going to vary depending on location.
Can confirm. Grew up in an extremely rural Pennsylvania town, and my high school experience was pretty different, honestly, there was something in the water. I can't imagine a Hollywood depiction come close. The jocks were the comedians, the only sport we ever won was track because our throwers were farm boy ogres. The band members were the ones winning state competitions and getting pregnant. A lot of friend crews didn't even have a label, they were just known for the one crazy thing that happened, that everybody thought was awesome.  Like the kid who's party had a guy get drunk and smash things with an axe, or the kid who wore a neon suit to prom. Can honestly say it was a blast, and surprisingly full of really different people with no love lost between them.
But again, there was something weird in the water where I grew up.  I don't think I've ever seen quite a bunch of talented weirdos as went to my high school. Our valedictorian now works for the CIA. Our salutatorian (sp?) now owns an emu farm. My senior class won a state debate title and four regional writing awards, including one national one. There was no reason for this, it's a one horse town no one knows or cares about.
Somehow I know every high school in the states has a similar wild card dynamic, whether they know it or not. There's something weird everywhere, just in my hometown it flourished because there wasn't shit else to do.
Edit: just remembered this actual quote from my friend Jamie: "dude that was the most homosexual party I've ever been to. And I've been to gay parties."
It was our regular jam - mattress jousting in the top of my buddy Joe's barn in our underwear. To this day none of us turned out to be gay.
Could have just been a schizophrenic. 
> here is the thing, we are all dying. Ever second that goes by is one second closer to it. So today, tomorrow, next week, next year....all of those moments are way more valuable than you realize. You don't understand how short life is until you can see the end.
This hit home. I try to never forget it. The most serious gf I ever had died in a car accident 7 years ago. Today would have been her birthday. She would have been 27.
Tomorrow isn't promised to any of us, anytime I see a thread like this I'm just overwhelmed with the desire to scream that out to everyone in it, especially the ones that *haven't* encountered death, that *don't* have cancer.
You could still die tomorrow. So live your life today.
Power banks.
All it is is a portable extra battery for your phone, charge it, then use it to charge you phone while you're out.  Saves my ass *constantly.* $12. Much better option than of hoping all of these random establishments have an outlet to spare while I'm out, & dragging my charger out with me.
Edit: clarification.
The watcher in the water / tentacle beast thing from Lord of the rings.
Honestly *what the fuck is that thing and goddamn it why is it there??*
Edit: Formatting
Indeed. Another TIL: Sydney Poitier was star struck in the first scene with them!  After all, it *was* Hepburn and Tracy. He could not do the scene in the study for the life of him.
They ended up doing it in close up, with two chairs instead of a actors, so he could get through it.
Seriously Hepburn is my new personal hero after reading more in depth about her.
*global* poverty. *global.*
American poverty?
Hm. I guess the question then is more specific to the mechanisms of a combustion engine... why does it have to *keep exploding* in order to function properly - aka, stop and go at the responsive pace demanded of a consumer?
Hm.  I guess the question then is more specific to the mechanisms of a combustion engine... why does it have to *keep exploding* in order to function properly - aka, stop and go at the responsive pace demanded of a consumer.
TIL to get on tinder at 2:30am
>people compete(d) for resources (especially reproductive privilege) inside of their tribes, which means that the evolution of intelligence has happend in large parts due to inter-human competition.  
I find this fascinating. What was true two million years ago remains true today... *We're* by far the most dangerous creature we come across. :/
" It is not God who kills the children. Not fate that butchers them or destiny that feeds them to the dogs. Its us. Only us."
Helen Keller and the Wheelchair Jews.
Cheesburger Pool Party.  Real band in London, saw it on a poster.
Latest one up, here:
http://100weeks100movies.com/1/post/2015/09/99-guess-whos-coming-to-dinner-analysis-as-relevant-as-ever-50-years-later.html
Definitely B.  I tried to keep your thoughts in mind with the latest write up on #99 - Guess Who's Coming to Dinner?
http://100weeks100movies.com/1/post/2015/09/99-guess-whos-coming-to-dinner-analysis-as-relevant-as-ever-50-years-later.html
I gotta play devil's advocate here and say I'm sure it'll never make it to market, since tire companies would lose so much money if you never needed to replace tires.
What's up, capitalism.
Thank you!
It's good to get positive feedback on the quality of content. Good content is step one. Lol now to get traffic...
Updated to include the 10th anniversary changes:  
http://100weeks100movies.com/the-movies.html?m
It has and will always be the man that refuses to believe his SO is cheating on him.
Friend met this woman in Spain. Beautiful poison. Married her, she's always out with guys she's "close to" because "dude it's a different culture, that's how it is in Spain, man." Disaster.
Finally tried to bang *me,* told him all about it, he wanted to fight me. Still doesn't believe it, I guess next time I'll have to record it, the idiot.
Still married to her. She comes into my bar all the time with other guys. We've given up, his denial is miles thick.
Ugh, that's how you get people so mad, you get French revolution style mass guillotine-ings of the "elite." 
What a revolting piece of shit.
Aaaahh, thank you.  That *is* an important distinction.  I got into hot water once on reddit for not catering to foreign films.  I was under the impression that the Oscars are kind of definitive in the film world, as is Hollywood as the standard.  The Oscars *sort of* are, and Hollywood *sort of* is... but there are plenty of other cultures out there that have made masterpieces worth our attention.
At the end of the day, I have a pretty strong dislike for distinctions based on nation.  We're all people.
Thank you!  The 10th anniversary list did throw me a bit, some choices I can't imagine the list without (*Saving Private Ryan* is almost *the* definitive War movie) and others seem odd (all of a sudden there's a movie about Swing Dancing?  Just because it's an important aspect of history doesn't mean it's a great movie).
Yet, I'm sure I may eat my words when I watch them, I have so for on the top 100 list.
Yea I've heard of the Sight & Sound list, perhaps I should investigate that one.  250 is a bit more complete, though daunting.
Sounds like I'll see how this goes, and move into that which *isn't* on the AFI list, from the Sight & Sound list, after.
I guess, in hindsight, the reason I *didn't* do 1st person is because putting "I think this" and "I think that" in there a lot somehow makes it seem... juvenile.  Petty.  "This is my cute little opinion blog about movies, hehe, I'd write it in my journal first, but I built a website instead, aren't I cute?"
I suppose the real solution is to write in first person, and avoid using "I" often, just as journalists and magazine writers do.  Keep it in active voice - that solves both of those problems, I think - but I still thank you for bringing it to my attention.
Move on to another list!  Or.  I dunno.  Retire with my .06c I've made on website advertising?  hahaha...
The first plan is to do the 10th Anniversary changes, which is another 20 weeks, and by the time I'm done, the 20th Anniversary will be out as well, so that's another 20 weeks.
After that I may do top genre lists... top foreign films... the IMDB top list... who knows.
Totally!  I try to stick to every Sunday as our viewing day, every Thursday as a new post day.  I'm still getting a lot of services up and running (aka an email list), but if you twitter, I post movie facts as I find them and our new analysis' when I finish them.
As for other lists, yes, this was the most established - I plan on addressing the 10th anniversary list changes after I'm done the original list, and then, of course, there'll be the 20th anniversary.  After that, perhaps foreign films, or the top 20 "genre" films of each.
Edit:  Duh, my twitter handle is https://twitter.com/100wks100movies or @100wks100movies
Thanks! Context is *so* important.
Hopefully I can get the Netflix generation interested in this thing.
Very cool, thank you.
It is definitely part of my plan to use sites like that to help build a community.  IMDB, even amazon reviews.  Hopefully I can find the time to share reviews on there & help people find out about my project.
Thanks so much, fantastic thoughts, all around.  I am fortunate to have fresh eyes on widely regarded masterpieces.  I am also both fortunate (and unfortunate) to never have been to film school.  Film makers are still magicians to me.
>But you have to be willing to say "Casablanca is a piece of shit." That's interesting.
I will remember those words well.  *That* is wisdom.
Thank you, I'm not familiar!  I will look into it.  The more the merrier, I say.  I am mostly concerned with the younger "Netflix" generation, because it is so difficult to put classic films on the radar when there are so many excellent choices in modern TV that are more easily accessible.
Thank you!  I have *not* yet addressed the 10th anniversary - I *have* discussed it with some colleagues, though, and the conclusion I came to is that the 10th anniversary is definitely worth some attention.  I think what we're going to do is keep it rolling through until the end, then tackle the 10th anniversary additions - which I heartily agree with.  Saving Private Ryan and the Fellowship of the Ring are both in my personal favorites for sure.
Thanks for bringing this to my attention!
Edit: updated to include 10th anniversary changes.
Wow, thanks so much for this well thought out and *extremely* useful response!  I will take each of these things into account.
The "why the American Film Institute" question is a great one.  One I'm not sure I can answer - I chose it as one of the more professional, "group committee" choices.  IMDB is the popular vote, and film goers do not necessarily know what makes great films, whereas employees of the film institute ought to.
Perhaps it was simply ignorance of the other options.
I will take a look at our mobile appearance, and reconsider the voice we're going for.  I hope to one day have a team, and give the impression that it's not just me, blog owner guy, and *my* opinion (because I do hold discussion groups and the like).  Unfortunately, right now, it *is* just me, so perhaps it is best to just own my opinion and put it in first person.
Considered from a purely financial standpoint... Yea, it can be a terrible, terrible purchase.
I chose the school that gave me a killer financial deal... 3yrs graduated, loans are already paid off.
Don't ignore finances when choosing your school, for sure. :(
Edit: just 4yrs in the work force is worth $60,000 - $100,000. Imagine how much more of a leg up so many people would have.
Oh MAN I just bought a motorcycle today.
I uh. Took it around the block. Then promptly freaked out and dumped it when cops came flying up behind me.
It was a great deal, but *MAN* am I am long ways away from being a competent rider. Wooo.
I don't know if I'll ever get it out of second gear.
I might have just done it today. Bought a motorcycle.
It was a killer deal, 700cc 1984 bike, under 50,000 miles, in a desert climate all its life, no rust, clean as a whistle, 1.2k. Couldn't help myself.
Problem? I... Haven't ridden a motorcycle since my brother's 170cc dirt bike... Almost 10 years ago... So I spent most of today staring down at it, thinking "wtf did I just do," revving the engine, scared to death to even take it out of neutral, let alone the parking lot.
Finally worked up the nerve to take it around the block. Cops got a call, came flying up behind me. I panicked trying to get out of their way, almost flipped it over backwards giving it too much throttle, dumped the bike.
I've... Got a major learning curve to handle. Too bad that includes a serious threat to my life.
BUT FACKIN YOLORITE.
(Oh god I hope I don't die I'm never driving it more than 15mph...)
Edit: Lol really? Downvotes? The possibility that I might die because of my shitty impulse purchase isn't shitty and impulsive enough?
"Pfft... I'd rather smoke a dick than a cigarette."
Said by my very straight self as a teenager. 
I still don't smoke. But my buds have never let me live it down hahaha.
"Only when the last tree has been cut down, and the last river has dried to a trickle will man finally realize that you cannot eat money, and reciting old proverbs makes you sound like a twat"
Swordsmaster.
How useless in today's society all of my sword training is... How I've been called a weirdo and judged for my sweet, sweet sword collection... And *Oh the zombies I would crush in an apocalypse situation*, OH. 
Everyone in my *neighborhood* would be knocking down my door, OH SAVE ME U/justice_man, we all know you have a massive weird collection of swords!!
Would I turn away the masses for their ungrateful words in the PRE society? Nay. I would save them all, handing out weapons like the zombie killin' candy man. And after it's all done, I'll train them *all* to be master swordsmen & swordswomen, and we'd do like... Really well until we met people with guns...
:(
National geographic.
It breaks my heart that it's been bought by 21st century Fox, utterly breaks it... Not in a "hippie, URGHH I HATE RUPERT MURDOCH EFF THA MACHINE *MAN*" kinda way, but in a deeply serious, a pillar of science and global unity has fallen, kinda way.
My family has had a lifetime subscription since 1985. Throughout that time, it has been a bastion of fair, beautiful, global concern raising photographic journalism. The society itself has given millions in grants to scientists around the globe, a shining example of one of the greatest non profit enterprises out there.
And now it is owned by a climate change denier, and will become a for profit venture. I cannot imagine the commercialized, MTV version of that magazine, I simply *cannot.* I refuse to.
*and tip your goddamn bartender, he makes $2 an hour*
Forget to Tip. Your service industry. People.
Most make $2 an hour. *you pay their paycheck.* 
Seriously, everyone dreads European customers in the restaurant biz, not only do they sometimes to tip zero, but they almost *never* tip well. 1 in 5 tips an acceptable amount they probably thought was a lot.
Oh man. It never really leaves you... Self doubt. Lack of self esteem... Because we all make mistakes. It can be healthy, to a degree. Keeps you from going full douche. I wouldn't say I've "gotten over it," but I *have* learned confidence in spite of it.
Even talents didn't work... I used to think I was special because I could play guitar. Then YouTube showed me an Asian kid that could play with his feet, upside down.
I'll tell you what *did* work, though.
Not giving a *fuuuucckk*
Seriously it sounds so stupid, but it's truly the key to confidence and self esteem. "Uhhurr I'm not as talented as *that* guy..." Who gives a *fuck* maybe his dick is smaller than yours.
"Oh no, what if I totally fail at this girl I'm gonna ask out..."
Uh, you'll both probably forget about it in weeks, stop giving a fuck, it's *fine* dude. This world is a big ass place full of exciting things. No one cares as much about your flaws as you do. So just stop it. The best you can be is *awesome,* I promise you.
Suggest you "Take a break" first. It's an adult thing to do, take some time apart, re-assess. It allows your SO a softer landing, in some ways, if you do end up fully breaking it off, and also allows you both to really think about who you are apart vs. Together.
It allows them to get a little used to it before it's reality. Yourself, too, because you might surprise yourself once you're alone again - taking a break helps *you* not backslide, later, too.
Edit: oh, misunderstood. I read 'breakING up with your SO easier.'
One of those power banks for my phone. Find myself bringing it everywhere.
Not a *huge* deal if it dies when I'm out somewhere... But what if *this* time was the time I missed that booty call...
Ok ok wawa's coffee IS better...
You repost quotes by famous hockey players?
*hot ouch damn* that's awesome.
TL;Dr:  "Fuck the H8ers, yo"
---Franky D
Such wisdom from genitalia
DON'T DO IT MAN, DON'T START THE SHEETZ WAWA WAR.
oh god everyone take cover.
EDIT: ok fine now you all have forced me to come out on the sheetz side of the war.
They have sandwich machines so you can order your sandwich while pumping your gas... Then it's DONE when you get in the store. Whatcha got, wawa? Fucking hoagiegimmickfest??? GUYS YOU SAVE .40c A HOAGIE...
Idiots...
SHEETZ IS THE ONE TRUE PENNSYLVANIA CONVENIENCE STORE WHO'S WITH ME!!!
Edit 2: ok, now I've got to write a political treatise on sheetz vs. Wawa.
1) I grew up in central PA, and accept my bias toward sheetz - HOWEVER - I have lived in Philadelphia the last 7 years, where there is ONLY wawa, and I do appreciate it.  
2) Wawa coffee is superior.
3) Wawa "healthy" options are stronger.  
That is where their strength ends.  
Sheetz:  
1) prices your food choice as you order, rather than register surprise.  
2) has loads of amazing fried food. WAWA HAS NO FRIED FOOD.  
3) A jubilee of delicious and varied sauces compared to wawa.  
4) Twice the choice for breads, including wraps, pretzel rolls, and pita.  
5) Sheetz meats are higher quality, hands down. Compare the shredded mess that is a wawa chicken sub to the chunky deliciousness of sheetz.  
I submit for your consideration that I have never gotten the shits from sheetz. Cannot say the same for wawa, especially where wawa chicken is concerned.
Friend of mine dated a girl who said she'd drop the business of porn to be with him, AND she only did "soft stuff."
Neither thing turned out to be true, but the best line he gave me out of it was "it *is* kinda nice to be able to Google your ex gf."
Olga
Wasn't there a computer AI character in *the time machine* that literally remembered everything, even after society had crumbled?
Thousands and thousands of years... It remembered it all, against its will. O_o
Coldplay's live version of "see you soon"
Yea there's a light at the end of the tunnel. I have a plan rather than just "keep head above water" ... Entertainment and art is still a business.
HAHAHA.
Got me. Got me right in the belly laughs.
Lol well I was TRYING to use the FRUIT metaphor.
But yea. Totally.
LADIES I'M NOT JUST AN OBJECT OK.
Jk I'm just an object, use me and I'll write you a song.
Exactly. White sugar, white bread, pasta. Cut it, you'd be amazed.
The first week or two you'd kill a man for a pretzel, but after your body adjusts, you're healthy and treats are even more awesome when eaten sparingly.
Mmm. What a great point. 
I've been thinking about that a lot lately, it's like in the arts, all of us are unsatisfied and unsuccessful, we're "failures" unless we're world famous millionaires, so eventually we let the fact that we're not brad Pitt or Steven Spielberg kill us.
Screw all that noise, man. Just do your thing, enjoy your thing. Forget about everyone else, if you're not doing it for you, why do it at all?  Success isn't being a millionaire... It's awesome gigs as often as you can get em, a good bartending job when you can't, and always trying to get better, says I.
Course that's easy to say when I don't have a partner in life desiring stability.
Still doing it ten years later, here. Chicks still dig it, but they don't *really* dig it. It's... Like being an exotic fruit. It's interesting, and talked about, and exciting for a while.  
Fun to try, but they'd rather just have oranges in their home, because, they don't bruise and uh. They're always around.
I lost 20lbs with the most simple, simple changes. So many habits that were just *unnecessary.*
I used to go into work and make myself a mocha coffee every day. Nice layer of choc syrup. Delicious. SO BAD TO DO EVERY DAY.
2wks of forcing myself to drink coffee w/just a dash of cream, and I didn't even notice it, and now it's even more special when I DO have a mocha.
Similar with those delicious white bread egg sandwiches I used to make. Slather with mayo. Awful cheap ass white bread.  
Ditched the bread, added veggies and healthy spices, plate of scrambled deliciousness instead... So much better for me. Simple habit changes. I can't even eat white bread anymore. The whole bottom of the food pyramid is just a carb load of weigh you down.
Edit: It's not just the number, either, 20lbs, I *feel so much better all around.* WOOOO ENERGY.
Starting martial arts training.
Got attacked by a girl's jealous ex the other day, walked away with far too many lumps from an angry drunk guy.
Vowed to train, not to win fights, not to beat anyone up... But because you can never predict anyone else's irrationality, you can only protect yourself.  Were I trained, I could have diffused the situation easily.
Start JKD on Tuesday.
Had a teacher that used to blast an air horn when people fell asleep in his class.
Absolutely. It's instinctual as well, mankind sharing food with one and other goes back millennia, connecting us in safety and communal trust on a subconscious level.  
It's giving. The most simple form of good. :)
Dude WHAT the *hell*... Who are you and where did this come from?
This is a manifesto on strength and compassion.
Can confirm. Bucket of stir fry in my freezer at all times.
DO IT YOU SAVE SO MUCH MONEY
How is this possible, but we haven't replaced power plants by harnessing this kind of solar power?
Drinking copiously and stuffing fried things in my face.
Not necessarily in that order, or at the same time.
Repair people... They are definitely not for fixing things.
Stuffed animal throw
Placebo effect
Lol so two thirds of you guys are assholes... 
Something we've known in the restaurant business all along.
Selling products with sex.
You know. There are only two types of blow jobs in my experience. Successful and unsuccessful.
If they're successful, they're rooted enjoyed.
Edit: fuck it not changing it
Wait, number of farts sniped...
Fart detection ratio?
Amount of orgasms given.
Aaaalways lower than you think, but a  man needs goals.
Lol Du Hast
Respectfully said, and accurate.
Thanks for the tip.  ^_^
America is movies.  Hollywood is movies.  We are the best filmmakers, hands down, we pioneered the blockbuster, one of our biggest exports is entertainment, culture.
Are there great foreign films?  Of course.  Were there great foreign films in history?  Certainly.  Are there thriving cultures of filmmaking in countries other than America?  Yes.
Uhhh, also, Hitchcock is on that list many times, a Brit.  But... just as the NBA is the world's premier basketball league, and people come from around the world to play in it, so is Hollywood Earth's place for film.
Yes, these are the best 100 *American* films of all time... but... it's hardly a distinction worth making.  America *is* filmmaking.
Maybe 1/4.  That's why this project appealed to me.  I think the guy said on twitter that he's starting it in earnest in September.
[OP] Don't get me wrong, it's not necessarily a *bad* thing, films being books first.  It's just surprising and important to recognize that, yea, book adaptations into movies have been happening forever... some are  garbage made for profit, others are masterpieces... but it's not unique to today's film world, and it's not necessarily "ripping things off."
Yea.  Today I learned that.
True fact.
Hm.  Still surprising & cool for my generation in their 20s who care about film to discover it... we get so annoyed to discover "it was a book first" sometimes - well, they've been doing it since film began, so... it's important to realize it's not a bad thing, exactly, it just must be done well.
Profit profit profit, rather than franchising I think, though I agree.  I get annoyed at it for sure.   There's a huge difference between bringing a story like *Jaws* to audiences for the first time in a masterpiece of film, and, say, slapping some writers & stars onto a book movie, making it solidly mediocre, and profiting because it's a book already and it's not risky.
Edit:  Still, it was interesting to discover as a man in my 20s that wasn't around when *Jaws* was a novel & had no idea... we get so annoyed at it today... well... they did the same thing then... at least it was Spielberg.
Thanks so much, friend!  Messaging now!
Hm.  Not a bad distinction.
I suppose it surprised the hell out of me that a masterpiece like *Jaws* was a book first.  Who knew?  Most folks, I think, assumed it was just a genius film... it has totally eclipsed the book.
Yea that's why I love their comment in this blog "Well, if something feels cheap, wrong, or unoriginal about telling stories that have been told before, tell that to the directors of over half of the greatest films of all time."  
Entertainment is such an interesting business... everyone consumes it, everyone has an opinion about it... yet most have no idea the dynamics at play.
There's a strange... Wisdom you get from knowledge of death. There's reason rowling had that bit about thestrals in Harry potter. You're... Just a different person. Seek out others that can see thestrals in your life, they've been some of the most solid rocks for me in mine. Others can be there for you... But comfort really only came for me from people that understood.
  "I wish it need not have happened in my time."
"So do all who live to see such times... But that is not for them to decide. All that we must decide is what to do with the time that is given to us"
"FUCK THE KING" -Sandor Clegane
The stars are far brighter
Than gems without measure,
The moon is far whiter
Than silver in treasure:
The fire is more shining
On hearth in the gloaming
Than gold won by mining,
So why go a-roaming?
"Hate to break it to ya Morty, but what most people call "love" is just a chemical reaction that compels humans to breed. It hits hard, Morty, and then it slowly fades, leaving you stranded in a failing marriage. I did it, your parents did it. Break the cycle Morty, rise above. Focus on science."
Lol the only alcoholics I ran into in Edinburgh when I was visiting were Englishmen on stag doos.
End of titanic, when Rose dies warm in her bed, photos surrounding her, and then is the last to return to the ship in the afterlife... every time.
IDGAF about the nude scene, IDGAF about the horror of the thousands in the water, or even the "I'll never let go, Jack." 
It takes a lifetime lived fully for someone's sake, because theirs was taken early, and then being reunited with them in the afterlife to get me.  
Edit: Yes, I'm a grown ass man.
Saw a beautiful sunset on my phone for the first two minutes.  
Certainly got me. :(
Watched the love of my life die with her hand in mine in the hospital.  I too, was 19. :(
It's been 8 years. It never gets easy. But it gets more and more bearable. My heart bleeds for you. It's like carrying a brick in your pocket. At first it's always there, banging against you, always, in your daily life. You try to make it a day without crying, then a week, then a month. Eventually you get used to the weight, though... But it never leaves you. You can't quite jump as high - but you're forever gifted the wisdom to know the difference between petty bullshit and that which actually, truly matters in this short, short life we live.
The hardest part, I think, was being in college. Everyone socializing, learning about themselves, partying, becoming who they were going to be, skipping class... Then there was me, plagued by the darkest of dark moods, wondering in the middle of the party what it all means.
And no, I've still never loved anyone else.
I actually gave up on walking dead.  Started reading the graphic novel series, and... Well I didn't care about the show's version of events anymore. At all.
The graphic novel is darker, harder, and deeper - and it has graduated to where a zombie apocalypse scenario should - right out the other end into post apocalyptic distopia. It's nothing short of awesome.
Beauty and the Beast.  
Beautiful, one of my favorites, especially the Disney movie... But if you think about it, the Beast has some real anger problems. And Belle runs away, and... Comes back... Because... "He'll change."
Stay with your man if he's violent, because, it'll get better. He'll turn into a Prince, or change.
"Hate to break it to ya Morty, but what most people call 'love' is just a chemical reaction that compels humans to breed. It hits hard, Morty, and then it slowly fades, leaving you in a failing marriage. I did it, your parents did it. Break the cycle Morty, rise above. Focus on Science."
"Hate to break it to ya Morty, but what most people call 'love' is just a chemical reaction that compels humans to breed. It hits hard, Morty, and then it slowly fades, leaving you in a failing marriage. I did it, your parents did it. Break the cycle Morty, rise above. Focus on Science."
"Hate to break it to ya Morty, but what most people call 'love' is just a chemical reaction that compels humans to breed. It hits hard, Morty, and then it slowly fades, leaving you in a failing marriage. I did it, your parents did it. Break the cycle Morty, rise above. Focus on Science."
Fascinating antics that could occur *if* multiple universes actually exist.  
Then it just right hooks you with some of the most incredibly deep shit you've ever seen.  
"Morty, no offense, But a drawing of me you made when you were 8 isn't gonna make me feel like less of an accident." 
"That's my grave, OK??"
"Wait, what?"
"On one of Rick & I's adventures, we basically destroyed the *whole world.* So we bailed on that reality, and came to this one... Because... In this one, the world wasn't destroyed, and in this one, we were dead.  So.. we came here, we buried ourselves, and... And we took their place. And every morning summer, I eat breakfast 20 yards away from my own rotting corpse!!"
"So you're not my brother?"
"I'm even better than your brother. I'm a version of your brother you can trust when he says 'don't run.' ... Nobody exists on purpose, nobody belongs anywhere, everybody's going to die... Come watch TV."
That's just one of many.
Services like these, too, take the power out of the hands of the elite and return it to regular folks - especially for artists. Once upon a time, person with great idea went to rich person or bank. Rich person or bank profited off of said idea, or shot said idea down, or worse, stole it. Big record companies... Film studios - the vast majority of profit disappeared to them, not altogether unfairly as they had ponied up the capital to make it happen.
With crowd funding we all come together on equal footing to make an idea happen, and it's fucking beautiful.
Peed in a guitar.
"William Wallace is seven feet tall!"
"Aye I've heard. He kills men by the hundreds. And if he were here, he'd consume the English with fireballs from his eyes, and bolts of lightning from his arse. I *am* William Wallace, and I see a whole army of my countrymen, here in defiance of tyranny.  You've come to fight as free men, and free men you are. What will you do with that freedom?? *WILL YOU FIGHT??*  
"No. We will run, and we will live."
"Aye, fight, and you may die. Run, and you'll live... At least a *while...* and dying in your beds many years from now, would you be willing to trade all the days, from this day to that, for one chance, *just one chance* to come back here and tell the English that they may take our *lives,* but they'll NEVER TAKE... OUR *FREEDOM!!!*  
*Alba ga bragh*
This. Also contributes, Scientifically speaking, to men generally holding their liquor better. Muscle absorbs blood, fat does not. More blood = more blood alcohol capacity.
Posted again, but I don't care, it got buried. Was having this very conversation last week. I live blocks from one of the first federal prisons in the United states - Eastern State Penitentiary. They have a profound exhibit within it detailing the rise of privatized prisons and the incarceration rate. 
The problem is the same one plaguing much of The U.S. - profit becoming more important than humanity. Here's the fact that blew my mind: guys, prisons make federal money PER inmate. That's right, guys, Prison is a money maker. Privatize your prison, keep plenty of prisoners in it, keep the neighborhoods producing prisoners undereducated and impoverished. Profit.
So why are there so many incarcerated in the US prison system? $$$$$$$$$
Orange is the new black has been criticised a bit this season for "slowing down" - but they're getting to the meat of what the tale is about. Prison privatisation. 
Breaking bad gently brought our attention to the ridiculousness of our health care situation. Orange could do the same. 
Edit: Wording. Formatting.
Was having this very conversation last week. I live blocks from one of the first federal prisons in the United states - Eastern State Penitentiary. They have a profound exhibit within it detailing the rise of privatized prisons and the incarceration rate.  
The problem is the same one plaguing much of The U.S. - profit becoming more important than humanity. Here's the fact that blew my mind: *guys, prisons make federal money PER inmate.* That's right, guys, Prison is a money maker.  Privatize your prison, keep plenty of prisoners in it, keep the neighborhoods producing prisoners undereducated and impoverished. Profit.
So why are there so many incarcerated in the US prison system? $$$$$$$$$
Orange is the new black has been criticised a bit this season for "slowing down" - but they're getting to the meat of what the tale is about. Prison privatisation.  
Breaking bad gently brought our attention to the ridiculousness of our health care situation. Orange could do the same.  
Edit: Wording. Formatting.
Don't forget, too, the fruitlessness of debating such things at all with theists - religion relies on faith. Faith is believing without seeing. There is no point debating facts with those that do not require them at all - see, they *think* they do. They think the bible is "facts." Yet we know the truth - it is one, rather narrow way to look at the world, written thousands of years ago.  Actual facts, science knows to be derived from *evidence.*
 The problem, of course, is that in challenging those facts, you shake the very core of those people, their communities, all they've known. No amount of facts can help someone see the truth if the truth requires them to face mortality in a way they're not ready for.  
The most freeing moment for any atheist I've known is the moment at which they recognize death will come for them, then they'll probably rot in the ground, and *they are totally ok with it.*  it is an incredible thing to do, it takes great strength... Strength many, many religious people do not have. Still it is one of the best things I've ever come to grips with.  I'm free.
Absolutely. Some find it dry, hard to pay attention to. His eloquence and simple love for science and life?  Well. I could listen forever.  
*life is a way for the cosmos to know itself* ... Still Gives me chills.  And oh, His speech at the end of the series, on the voyager, and the photo...  
Edit: Grammar.
The room.  
So bad, it's the most entertaining thing I've watched all year.
Bartender here, Philly - large med school population, so I've heard some good ones. Never ask a nurse about their day, it was worse than yours.  
One instance will always stand out. Three young ladies, sitting at the end of my bar, right by the taps, great, fun, funny - all nurses. I'm pouring some beers for a table when I hear the sentence "so this guy comes in for an adult circumcision last week..."
I hold in my laughter & 100 questions, knowing I'll be back in a second to ask her all about it & have a laugh -I go deliver the beers, and return to catch the very end of the story, which is forever burned into my memory verbatim:  
"Yea, So, nurse Jackie pulls back the foreskin, yea, he *cums.*"
Edit: Added a word
Dddrrrruuuummmmm reddit durr
This a thousand times. College has become such a racket, from $160 text books to $45,000 semesters - most kids have no concept of what the hell $45,000 a semester even *is.*  
It's a BMW every semester. Why oh *why* would you *pay* that for four years when you could be *making* it for four years instead??? Experience is the best teacher anyway!  
Even the best colleges are kind of a hustle. Guys, celebrities most often *never actually went to that college, they were given an honorary degree.*  Yea. So you'd think someone awesome went there, and then go there.
*then you're creating two ply, just buy fucking two ply*
I dunno I think it's only "stranger danger" that keeps it that way. The general attitude is "ughh, internet meetup, anonymous, weird, unsafe.".  
It's no less safe than meeting *anyone* for the first time, just don't be an idiot.
TIL the internet has killed a lot of things
I will tell my parents to do so - they were just visiting for the day and brought it along as a curiosity.
Lol yea man I filled up a bunch of tiny bottles with different colored M&Ms and tic tacs just to fux with the internetz lolz.
Hm. Quite a theory, I like it.
Thanks so much for all of the info folks! We're already miles ahead of where we were!  
Some points of clarification:  
1) All the bottles are sealed - so while some of their contents are dangerous, we weren't fool enough to handle anything.  
2) The general consensus is the chemicals aren't dangerous by now anyway, as they've broken down.  
3) We *had* discovered Wompole & co. Online, some of their history, and their tonic bottles are everywhere on the web.  We had not found any other info on a kit like this.  
So. As of now we're not 100%, but the consensus is it's a sample kit for the wompole pharmaceutical company. Will follow up with some museums & historical societies.  
Thank you so much, r/whatisthisthing!!  
Edit:  Oh and we've narrowed it down to 1900-1908.
Edit II:  [UPDATE]  So we've submitted a few appraisal requests to some antiques auctions to see what they say, and contacting some museums as well.  Will keep updated.
[UPDATE II]: Most museums and auction houses won't touch it, as some of the chemicals are now highly illegal - they're unable to purchase or sell them - though it can be donated for a tax break.
I agree. Law enforcement isn't interested in what's illegal for it being illegal's sake, an antique is an antique.
Well thank you so much, the limit of your knowledge is far beyond ours. :)
Should have clarified, not much room in text - yes we did discover the wompole co, but no info on this kit. Only info on tonics, large bottles.
Of course. Better views of the labels, hmm.
Oh yes, thank you, we read that article. No information on what this thing is, tho, is there?  
Best we can do is conjecture. Apologize - should have clarified that we did find info on wompole & co. :)
Any info on solving this mystery would be great.  Online research hasn't revealed much other than Wompole antique bottles.  :)
Always piss before you leave the bar.
Alcohol and like, a lot of alcohol.  
And food.
Thou shalt not sleep with thy bros ex until a "reasonable" amount of time has passed.    
The length that constitutes a "reasonable" amount of time is as unwritten as every other unwritten bro rule.  
For some bros, forever is not unreasonable.
Yea, thanks, phone alarm clock, for doing that math for me.
Lol everyone gets so excited about mars. Guys we can't breathe there. Even a little.
How about that time my good roommate left, and the roommate he replaced himself with turned out to be a heroin addict.  
It's cool tho, he wasn't serious addict "since he only snorted it."
Last straw was when I caught him using my razor. Posted on reddit about it, actually. Was rough times... I hope he got his act together. He was actually a really cool guy when he wasn't utterly drug addled... Which I only witnessed a few times... :(
Yeeeea obamacare = money for the private sector care. Just like every god damn thing in America.
Here's to hoping we stop letting money dictate all of our policies before it's too late LOLOLOL YEEARITE
>it's impossible to get through the hours of cringe-inducing filler, and unnecessary reference after reference to the LOTR films, as Peter Jackson dances on the rotting corpse of a masterpiece of literature.
Couldn't have said it better myself.  The original story is so excellent, so compelling, and the destruction of it is a perfect example of everything that is wrong with Hollywood.  
It was nothing more than a play at a ton of money everyone already knew they were going to make based on the success of Lord of the Rings.  It was garbage, pop film making - it was flashy, overly CGI'd, needlessly adjusted in plot, and *totally successful monetarily.*  
Lord of the Rings, by comparison, spent 10 years in development.  *10 years.*  It is nothing short of a masterpiece.
*Her*
The viewing world has vastly underestimated the power of that movie - It's just a "movie where a guy falls in love with a computer" - but the film industry has not.  
*Her* delves deeply into the philosophy and psychology of human love, need, want, loneliness... and technology's potential solutions for those deepest of human issues... solutions that are right around the corner, and may or may not be healthy... or morally correct...  
It forces us come face to face with them, consider them, in the most human way possible - with a love story.  I could rant for an hour about the implications of that movie, how crucial it is at this juncture in human history - how *important* it is, how obvious it seems to me that it *must* become a classic - but I'll spare you.  Just watch it for yourself.  
Edit:  Couldn't help adding more.
I wish I had a before picture, because it was terrible.  I was fat.  I had acne.  I used gel until my hair was a rock.  I needed braces but my family couldn't afford them.  I was pale from being inside all of the time, gaming.  Even my attitude sucked.  
Then, one summer I just like... transformed - got my first job, working outside, got taller, lost weight, got a tan, let my hair grow long, stopped gelling it.  Came back, but never understood.  Attention from girls.  Lead roles in plays.  Solos.  Outwardly, I no longer appeared to be a loser... but I was the same fat nerdy loner inside, and I still am - but I have more sex, which is nice.  
Still have a really hard time taking any compliments, or even believing all of the signs of "pretty people things" are anything more than luck.
That's a great idea.  
I gotta say, I've taken the brunt of this assumption before:  
>I have a hard time not judging hot people as shallow sports idiots.  
I've been a dungeon master since age 16, but I look like I just got done with a lacrosse game... sometimes I can't even start a conversation at a bar because... well girls just assume I'm after one thing.  
It's... strangely lonely being attractive, in a way.  I like your idea, though.  
P.S. I used to crush an animorphs book in like one day. :P
Oh MAN I'm like... the male version of you.  Thank god for theater - it was the first thing that made me any real friends.  I remember being *astounded* at getting cheers, and like, *woos* like - hey that's an attractive person woos.  Blew my mind.  One summer away letting my hair grow long, getting taller, losing weight from being outside working, getting a tan - it was like I transformed, and I had no idea.  I was still just a nerd who thought Bill Nye & Shakespeare were awesome.  
It was like... growing up a fat awkward nerd kid made it never sink in - then when you get into the pro world of theater & acting & get rejected constantly, so, no help there.  There are all of these signs pointing to the fact that I must be kinda attractive for a guy, but the hell if I'll ever believe it - especially because of feeling like a narcissistic piece of shit - I get this overwhelming feeling of guilt anytime I dare to think I'm hot or talented.  My friends take it upon themselves to "keep my ego in check" - and I get it, I have thick skin, I'm easy to make fun of, hell, that's what friends do, I even join them often in laughing at myself... but if they only knew how painfully aware I am of *every single flaw I have* perhaps they wouldn't be so intense.  God, I even like... used to insult or disagree with people that complimented me.  Don't do it, it's bad for me... ugh what a dick move.  
We're all just fat kids inside... fat kids who need a compliment now and then.  The world beats you up enough man, your friends shouldn't help.  
In short, I've found not much has changed, either.  I went from a fat awkward nerd highschooler with a lot of doubts to a reasonably attractive adult with a lot of doubts... but I have more sex, so... that's nice.
Came to this thread to get downvoted and told I'm not hot.
All of the reasons you know you're hot are reasons for people to hate you.  Strangers are kind to you... but your friends... your friends, less so - or so I've noticed.  They certainly enjoy making fun of you still.  
How have *I* changed?  Well.  I went from a fat child loner & loser with a lot of self doubts to a reasonably attractive adult loner with a lot of self doubts... but I have more sex, so that's nice.
>I'm not saying attraction doesn't matter, but if my face is the only thing they are interested in, interacting with them will not be very enjoyable.  
This, so hard.  It took me a long time to accept that I'm a reasonably attractive guy, but part of it was friends telling me "I could do better" than the girl I was with on several occasions - first of all, that's rude as hell, second - I don't give a fuck what she looks like if she's *awesome.*  
Ugh.  I just hate that cave man mentality - it's the same reason a girl can't just sit at my bar alone without being swarmed like the last chopper out of 'nam, it's painful to watch - and no one really *says anything.*  There words float through the air, but the whole time they're just trying to think of the "right" thing to say to "land" this girl.  How about you talk to her like she's a goddamn person, man??  
I guess it's hard to feel bad for hot people... but it's gotta be hard sifting through who likes you for you.
Lol fishing for photos, I KNOW YOUR GAME
On semester abroad in London - barely made it there for want of scholarship money.  Spend the whole semester with few friends. Met a producer at an open Mic via a fluke - somehow he likes my scripts enough to ask me to join his company at Cannes.  
AT Cannes, reveling in *wtf is my 19yo amateur screenwriter ass doing here* thoughts, order a beer.  
Now, we're at the American film tent, having a great time. The beer reaches my hand, I look up at the guy handing it to me - it's my buddy Sam from improv class.  We must have spluttered 'wtf' at each other for ten minutes.
Aw welcome to Philly bro. Get your cheesesteak at Jim's.
This thread should be required reading for anyone purchasing a handgun for defense.
So the next step is perhaps to start giving legal offices around his area a ring to see if they have record of dealings with him?  I thought wills were supposed to be read upon a death record happening, and all family members informed and the will read at time of death?  
It is possible all of that normal execution has been halted while the organization responsible for handling his body's donation to science takes care of what it needs to take care of - but in that case, his wife ought to have mentioned it.  We have got to get our facts straight, though - I'll have to have another convo with my Mother concerning what, exactly, his 3rd wife's excuse is.
You can't choose your classes? Your major? You're in jail of higher education and you can't go to any other college?
Look I get it. Change isn't easy. But fuck man, sounds like you're on a path to misery that will only get worse unless you get out early. What's it gonna be like down the road when your JOB is something you hate?
Mmmmm I understand what you're saying, but even the cheapest colleges on earth have plenty of options.
This is going to sound like some Zen bullshit, but maybe that's too simple a view. There is no "right" or "wrong" girls, majors, so forth. There's only what did and didn't happen.
My point is all of us look at what we *didn't* do with a rose colored lens. No doubt if we *did* do the thing in question, we'd have many a negative thing to say about it. Since we didn't, we imagine it so much better.
An example from my own life is the same - this school or that school. I chose a lesser education, and regretted it for some time... That is until I met someone that had gone to said *other* school and reminded me THAT school was $50k a semester. Meanwhile I'm 3yrs graduated from that "lesser" school, and I have paid all of my loans off, I'm debt free.
You see what I mean? No doubt I'd be moaning about "how badly I'm in debt" today had I made the *other* choice... And I moaned all the while in school that I should have gone to the other one, and dude, fuck all of that noise. There's only what happened and what didn't. Forget what "should have been," it's a concept that's bullshit anyway.  
Edit:  Wow this blew up a little.  Thanks for all of the kind words and thoughts on the subject guys and gals!  I especially like the tale of the farmer and the horses.
Making the mistake of listening to people when they say "you can't do that."
Yes I can. I can, and I will.
I don't know if you know this but uhh. You're actually in control of your life? So like. You can start studying something you're actually interested in like. Today?
The bands.
First, I would find a public computer - watch craigslist carefully for anything simple labor, cash, no questions asked, and write to as many as possible. I no longer have any contacts, but I still have work ethic, physical ability and the ability to write & be personable / not sound like a maniac on CL.  Also check for anything free - a guitar?  Now I can play for change.  A sofa?  Can resell. A lawnmower? Can now cut grass for cash.  
My first priority would be getting enough for money for a gym membership - can shower there for a fraction of the money. Cleanliness means jobliness. On a good cash day, stay at a hostel. On a bad one, the street. Save up enough money to get a set of good clothes for job interviews - from a thrift shop. Use a kinkos to print resumes etc.  
Second priority would be the cheapest pay as you go phone there is. Need to be able to be reached to get a job.
Turn no job interview down, work crazy hard at any of them.
Check this comment out - tons of simple things a person can do to make a difference. :).  
http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/36g06t/what_is_an_action_the_average_person_can_take_to/crdqd5i
Plus, friggin huge tax breaks I hear, by then classifying your home or business as a "farm."  Eff the police.
Your usage of the username CuntWizard makes me totally believe everything you say.
I hear you can get some sweet tax breaks, tho, by then qualifying your home or business as a "farm." Do it, because, eff the police, yo.  Return on dat investment.
I hear you can get some sweet tax breaks, too, by then qualifying your home or business as a "farm."  Do it, because, eff the police, yo.
*sigh* ... well.  As I said in a couple other posts, I think focusing on the positive is key to making any sort of change.  I can't make anyone give a fuck about bees, or change the fact that a bunch of people are laughing about not giving a fuck about bees - nor can I change the fact that the post concerning the environment is not the top comment... but *I* can give a fuck about bees - if I ever start a CSA, make sure I have bees.  When people break out the RAID I can educate them.  Same with this thing on the environment.
There are also fully electric versions - and their range, because they are so much smaller than an electric car, is actually larger.  
You'd have to be sure your electricity came from a green source, as said [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/36g06t/what_is_an_action_the_average_person_can_take_to/crdnp83), but hey.  
Or use a bicycle, stay in shape, and have a total 0.
Ugh.  Too true.  The top post is on bees.  The top askreddit thread is how can we save the bees... and it's mostly full of people joking about not giving a fuck about bees.
Many people still do not take public transit, and that can make a huge difference.  We can still drive when needed - just drive to the nearest park & ride or bus stop, and ride public transit into a place of work.  It can often be even less stressful letting someone else deal with driving while you relax and read or listen to music.  It's often faster than driving, and less expensive due to gasoline costs.
Since deregulation of the power market in the U.S., hundreds of 100% renewable power companies have arisen, and most large companies have green plans if a 100% renewable company isn't available.  
They are only slightly more expensive, usually, but it does provide a certain peace of mind to know that as I type this, the energy to do so came from a place that burned 0 fossil fuels.  
That's a simple easy change.  Give your power company a ring, switch it online, or research other options in your neighborhood - I bet there are a ton.
Well, I just tried to askreddit (for the third time now) the following question, it keeps getting auto removed:  
Environmentalists of Reddit, what is a simple change the average Joe can make to do their part in alleviating climate change?  
They said:  
Hi there, your post has been removed for one of the following reasons:
Rule 1: You may not have a story in your title. You must post a clear and direct question, and only the question, in your title.Questions about you or your specific personal situation are not appropriate for Askreddit. Additionally, any answers to the question, including your own, should go in the comments as a reply to your own post.
Rule 2: Questions about you or your specific personal situation are not appropriate for Askreddit. Try /r/Self, /r/Advice, or /r/NeedAdvice. If you have questions regarding reddit try /r/help.
Finally got it to work.  Already got a downvote.  I wonder if its a "climate change" bot auto downvoting anything that says "climate change."
Here:  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/36g06t/what_is_an_action_the_average_person_can_take_to/
Starting a dedicated green technology / cause company.
I wrote up a business plan... notes on how to raise a movement that focused not on what the giant industries and governments *weren't* doing, but rather, on what the individual *could* do, one day a week.
I think the problem is not that people do not care, it is that they see no action they can take.  I hoped to provide that action.  Plant trees with me once a week.  Check out how you can change your power company to one that is 100% green, no fossil fuels (man does it feel good to know these words are typed using energy that caused 0 carbon emissions, I can tell you).  Check out this Algae lamp that supposedly draws more carbon *out* of the air in a year than a tree does in it's lifetime, and imagine if I could raise enough money to mass produce them, and get them in people's homes.  Fresh air!  Light from 100% green sources!
Check out this business plan I drew up to help the restaurants in Philadelphia recycle... because none of them do... because there is no recycling service that runs *every* day... If I could raise money to do it, it would be rather simple and easy!
All of it focused on not being a doom prophesying jerk, but a positive, self-responsible agent for the green movement.
>What if we arn't supposed to stop it? As morbid and unattractive as it sounds, what if, just like every other process in the known universe, the earth is supposed to reset?<
Great questions.  It's worth taking a look at the Degrasse Tyson video I posted, or better yet, watch the full episode of Cosmos [Episode 11 - A World Set Free] on Netflix, wherein he goes into past extinctions vs. what we are looking at today.  It's by and far not the final treatise on climate change, but it is as modern and simple a summation as I can think of - an hour of well explained popular science.
My personal answer to that question is there is no "supposed to" - there is only what can and cannot be done.  Similar to the India & rice example, there was no question in the eyes of the Scientists involved - there was no "should we alter this rice," there was only "we *must* alter this rice, or millions will die."  I feel the same about climate change - and, to be sure, 99% of Scientists uniformly believe that not only is climate change real, it is caused by human activity.  So, again, there is no "supposed to" there is only *must.*  We have set the world on the path to mass extinction, it is up to us to reverse it.  The Earth will probably reset itself, according to Tyson's examples... but mankind will not likely survive it.
> but what do you propose we do?  ... Just what in the gods fuck are we supposed to actually do about it? I am serious with this question... Don't give the same bullshit answer that so many give with the same garbage we have listened to over the last two decades (we get it, drive Prius' and install solar panels on our roofs). I'm talking about, what SERIOUS, world altering change needs to take place to stop this apparent global collapse from taking place?<
An extremely fair question that would take hours to answer.  Apologize for wall of text.  I will provide what I know simply.  There are many, many solutions, few of them at first apparent because utilizing fossil fuels is so ingrained, as is our way of life using them.  I will post a thread asking reddit to answer that call/question.
Here is what I know.  One change you can make, today, is in your power company.  You can call them right now and ask what green plans they have, due to the recent [deregulation][http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/shows/blackout/regulation/primer.html] of the power industry.  Most often, such plans are marginally more expensive, but it is worth the peace of mind, I find, to know that as I sit here typing away on my laptop using energy, that that energy was created 100% without burning fossil fuels.  In addition, there are more and more new companies propping up that offer 100% green energy every day, again, since deregulation.
Another project I have been researching, and hope to kickstart in the next year, is what I call "the Fedge fund."  Read about fedges [here.][http://www.inspirationgreen.com/living-willow-hedges.html]  ---It is a living fence.  I hope to raise money to replace metal fences for homeowners and businesses with these versions, which remove carbon from the air.
Researching are working tirelessly on algae as a solution, on improving solar technology, and I am researching how many trees the average human would have to plant to erase their *personal* carbon emissions - why?  Because I believe the key to solving this is to focus not on what we *can't* do, or what giant industries and full countries *aren't* doing... but rather, to focus on what the individual *can* do.  We cannot be responsible for thousands of others who choose not to recycle. drive giant SUV's, or insist coal power is "totally clean and provides jobs," nor do we solve anything by yelling at them in judgement.  We can only lead by example.  We can only be responsible for ourselves.  
Tl;Dr:  Watch episode 11 of Cosmos on netflix for the best popular Science explanation of climate change, and focus on what you can do - like change your power provider and take public transit, rather than what everyone else isn't doing.
I cannot get angry and downvote... I totally agree. Well said.
Hard to believe from my post, but central to my philosophy on climate change is to act rather than bitch. We can't all drop everything and freak out. But if there were a way for us to volunteer once a week... Make a change in power companies... Simple ways to act, and we were aware of them, we could do more.
The point is, I suppose, going back to the origin of this thread, that the next generation will be the one to face the greatest challenges of climate change.
Edit: something you can probably do, today, is switch to a new electricity provider that is renewable exclusive. I did, and man does it feel wonderful to know the majority of my electricity is generated carbon emission free. Especially during those long skyrim sessions.
Bees!!
The distinction here I suppose is that people do care. They certainly do. They just feel unable to help, and hopeless that anyone else will.
I truly have considered, many times, quitting my job and dedicating the remainder of my life to fighting climate change. There are tons of things each and every one of us can do, we just remain unaware and hopeless - or, understandably, we wait for others to take the lead, especially the government.
No one will do it for us. We must. I'm done work late tonight. Will return then.
Edit:  Have returned to answer questions, start discussions, and keep failing repeatedly to askreddit what we can do - posts keep getting removed.  "Can try again in 3 minutes."  Doing so.  
Hey it actually worked this time.  Already got a downvote.  [Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/36g06t/what_is_an_action_the_average_person_can_take_to/)
The fact that climate change is not the #1 answer in and of itself reveals why, without a doubt, *it* will be the most intense challenge the human race has ever faced, forget the "next generation."
Yes, we're all tired of the prophecy of gloom and doom and temperatures rising etc etc etc but for fucks sake there's a reason every scientist on earth is screaming that we *have to do something, and now.*
Don't get me wrong, I love discovering some of the lesser known facts that have popped up on this thread (helium is going to run out, really?), but when we mention the challenges of the future... All of my thought is bent on only one.
There is hope. Once upon a time, scientists knew most of India would starve in the next 20 years. Scientists engineered a wetland rice, and saved millions from that fate. Scientists are working on the many faced demon of climate change... But the populace remains far... Far too undereducated, unaware, and unconcerned about a problem of such incredible magnitude. I don't blame them. It is rather horrifying.
Edit: Some facts from Neil Degrasse Tyson in only five minutes- Neil deGrasse Tyson "Cosmos" on Climate Change DE: https://youtu.be/KJhbQIlu4mk
Edit #2: Big surprise, no one cares.
Edit #3: Ahh! Pleasant surprise, many people DO care!
Edit #4:  Askreddit thread:  What is an action the average person can take to alleviate climate change?  [Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/36g06t/what_is_an_action_the_average_person_can_take_to/)
A person cockblocking / twatswatting cuz *they* aren't getting sexy times. :(
Edit: wording
Dungeons and dragons used to be.
But today it gives me the biggest diplomacy check on the block.
I hear there's a guy who'll pay top dollar for the demonstration of that kind of preemination ability.
One thing that helps me sleep at night is label such "travesty" as pop film.  Sure, it makes money, people go see it, but just as Justin beiber's garbage will fall away in the music world under the stress of time - compared to classics, Grammy winners, so too will most of the money making, short term pop films of our days...
In 20 years, millions of fans will far more likely still be talking about and watching masterpieces like Lord of the Rings or even low grossing "artsie" films like boyhood or birdman, and thousands of the Paul blarts will fall by the wayside.
Some of the truest masterpieces in my personal opinion are ones that manage to walk that family, large audience line and still be profound... Touching... Action packed. Forrest Gump. Star Wars. Yes, even James Cameron's Titanic.
Dude you're really not missing much. Beards are all the rage right now, but I'm gonna go out on a wild limb here in front of all and say beards fucking suck.
Wait. Lemme rephrase. *beards* are awesome, *having* a beard fucking sucks. It's itchy. Every single thing you eat latches on for a secret ride that you only discover twenty minutes later after everyone has been made uncomfortable by it. It gets caught in shit. It's hot.
YEA THAT'S RIGHT WORLD I'VE DARED TO SAY IT. I'm a hairy manly man who could grow a fantastic beard and I choose not to because *having a beard sucks.*
How about that time my boss lol'd about how our other co-worker got preggers, then they all went out to get hammered and do blow since she decided not to keep I the baby.
Except. Then she felt guilty and decided to keep it. 
"Lol yea it's pretty fucked up, right u/justice_man?? I just stared at him. He likes to just make shit up... I hope he just made that up...
All those bad roommate things? Yea he did those... *and* he got addicted to heroin halfway through our lease.
Thanks for letting me room with *that* guy "mutual friends." When I found drug face using my razor it was the last fucking straw...
Well it sounds like, according to your description, it was a... Well perhaps it's highly likely that... I think it's obvious that you invented a time machine and went forward in time to watch Paul Blart Mall Cop 2.
Could have sworn it was Paul blart mall cop 2...
It's the new too manliness. I once had "friends" who's #1 hobby was making every joke possible about their fellow buds - dead dads, non working dicks - nothing was sacred - then we'd all and pat ourselves on the back for being "strong enough" to joke about it.
Fuck that man.  Real men can admit when they're hurting - and look to their real friends to lift them up when they need it, not put them down. Took me way too long to realize.
The world beats you up enough. Your friends don't need to, too.
I hate that men can make any bar totally uncomfortable for ladies to be in.
Lol tell your favorite doctorate candidate to bounce out a limerick off of the dome sometime.
They can't. Elizabethans could and did. You can doubt it all you want I guess. It *is* sort of hard to believe. But do your research and you'll see. :)
Well. In any case the point that was made to me when studying the Elizabethan era was that the level of entertainment we have today was not there - but print was. The heroic celebrities of the day were the poets. Like so many that can play a few songs on guitar today, many then could turn a language that would make our heads spin today.
Hahaha when did I say they *didn't* make dick jokes?
Aww thanks guyorgirl.
Memory & linguistics skills.
Elizabethans were brilliant linguists, turning out complex poetry, limericks and puns for simple entertainment as easy as we make dick jokes today.
The ancients had incredible memories - holding large chunks of text and speech in their heads using complex memorizing techniques - indeed, the ancient Greeks worried that *writing* would make all lazy, as they would no longer need to cultivate this incredible skill.
Just as short math skill has disappeared in the face of the calculator, so too, did long memorization in the face of the pen.
Edit 1: lol guys. I never said they *didn't* make dick jokes. I said they turned a complex linguistic phrase as easily as *we* make dick jokes today.
Edit 2: Sure, not everyone was a brilliant, linguist, but by and large folks then were a great deal better at it than we are now. The level of entertainment we have today was not there - but *print* was. The heroic celebrities of the day were the poets, even for those who didn't read. Like the many of us in 2015 that can pull out a guitar at a party and play a few songs, many *then* could turn language that would make our heads spin today.
Holy shit, 9yrs?
Yo have we landed on mars?
Correct. Us humans with dicks love sloppy blow jobs.
Source: have been blown before.
Did not need to click link. Knew it was the grapefruiting vid.
Uuuuh texting my friend *back* now...
A kid won one year because he tried to stab a teacher with a pencil (he got fucked up tho, it was our track coach, he was a beast).
Another year a kid win for getting suspended for having a "hit list."  
Y'kno. Closest thing.
Overheard a few of my fav teachers in high school laughing about their betting pool for student most likely to do a shooting. "Joey's coming for me first, no doubt in my mind." "... Pfft... You kidding? That Terrence is only one break up away from snapping, you seen the way he looks at me?"
Never happened, but they always awarded the pool to the closest runner up.
Mom told me 'eat shit' once.
Granted, I was more a teen & totally deserved it. But she was *so* sweet 99% of the time that it wasn't upsetting, it was AWESOME.
Hm. I wonder why some folks are simply able to say "hey. You know what. I'm totally incorrect, thank you." And others are not.
Ugh good for him, spent 4 hours folding swans *connected by the beak from one piece of paper,* like they were kissing, for a gf at the time, and she laughed in my face.
Back off man, I know *oragami*
Pfft whatev, I used to blow people's minds with my thumbs of lightning.
Equivalent today? Swype. No one uses it. 
*'cept this guy...*
I prefer to treat my texting like a rapier duel.
Back in *my* day, there weren't no such thing as in game purchases. You earned your levels and your badges through hard work and sacrifice, and no God damn social life.
Fuckin' casuals, all a you born after 1993...
Back in MY day, you had to download uphill both *ways* to get a porn. *For two days.* 
*And you couldn't get phone calls the entire time*
Back in my day, you had to stay online for *two days* to download a movie.
*and you couldn't get phone calls the whole time*
What's the hardest thing about walking through a field of dead babies?
Hiding my erection.
What do you get when you throw a dead baby down the stairs?
I dunno about you, but *I* get an erection.
African gray parrot with insult training.
A mortgage. Ugh.
Feels the exact same as the "honors" programs in college, where everyone hung out in their "honors" lounge and talked about "honors" level things.
Pfft.
This. Went across Europe the same way, with only my guitar and a couch surfing account. The amount of times people said I'd end up being part of the human centipede...
Nope. No human centipede. Only many many drinks bought for the poor college kid and requests for Johnny cash.
I'm the only one I know willing to not only shoulder the responsibility of being dungeon master, but enjoy it and see it as a way to hone by storytelling / writing skills.
I make baller cocktails & party punches from my home bar because... Might as well use those bartending skills for friends.
Don't push it tho, you know how to make a rum and coke.
Lol similar story - friend that banged Derek Jeter, woke up in the AM at his hotel to free breakfast and a bag of Derek Jeter swag.
"Thank you for fucking Derek Jeter, here's your bobble head doll and a coupon for a free beer at the next Yankees game, do fuck Mr. Jeter again."
>a black hole theoretically goes to a singularity at the center. This singularity is penetrating that smallest distance, and mathematically means it could actually be expanding into the largest sizes possible, Black holes could be the big bangs of other universes.
So. Science is... Sort of saying the inside of a black hole goes so densely to a single point that... It turns inside out and keeps going?
Ugh, I hate the academy for those types of decisions - they do it because it's about acting, theatre history - subjects near and dear to them and their industry, careers and lives... Like Shakespeare in love, or Argo.
It's not about you, academy.
Fascinating - this news reveals earth balancing *itself* ('cept you, China) - reforestation increases, plants grow more vigorously & widely in a warmer climate... Which mankind has accidentally created.
How much do you weigh?
Haha yeea... We owe those guys a lot for inspiration, but we were never trying to do what they do. We're just cooking awesome bacon dishes and goofing off. Yea, our dishes are hearty, but normal humans can eat them.
We're trying to do more challenges. That was way more entertaining.
Recipe:
3 lbs Bacon | 6 Eggs | 3 cups Cheddar Cheese | 1 diced onion | 1 ea. diced red & green bell peppers | 4 Potatoes 1 Pack breakfast sausage
We did 3 baconweaves, but you don't have to go that crazy - simply layering bacon in the pan will do.
The short instructions for cooking are undercook each layer separately (sausages, hashbrowns, scrambled eggs, etc), layer it in the pan as desired, adding cheese, & using bacon(weaves) to structure beginning, middle & end - then bake the whole thing another 10-20 minutes. :)
The long answer we wrote out on our baconblog: http://www.unleashthebacon.com/1/post/2015/03/unleash-the-bacons-own-breakfast-baconsagne.html
There is video!
Edit: Formatting Edit #2: You r/foodies have any suggestions on what to add next time?
Recipe:  
3 lbs Bacon | 6 Eggs | 3 cups Cheddar Cheese | 1 diced onion | 1 ea. diced red & green bell peppers | 4 Potatoes 
1 Pack breakfast sausage
We did 3 baconweaves, but you don't have to go that crazy - simply layering bacon in the pan will do.
The short instructions for cooking are undercook each layer separately (sausages, hashbrowns, scrambled eggs, etc), layer it in the pan as desired, adding cheese, & using bacon(weaves) to structure beginning, middle & end - then bake the whole thing another 10-20 minutes.  :)
The long answer we wrote out on our baconblog:  http://www.unleashthebacon.com/1/post/2015/03/unleash-the-bacons-own-breakfast-baconsagne.html
There is video!
Edit:  Formatting
Edit #2:  You r/foodies have any suggestions on what to add next time?
Well.  The short answer is you undercook each layer separately, then layer it in a pan as desired, adding cheese - then bake the whole situation for another 10-20. :)
The long answer we wrote out here:
http://www.unleashthebacon.com/1/post/2015/03/unleash-the-bacons-own-breakfast-baconsagne.html
Consumerism is also to blame. Once upon a time we didn't give a shit about a ballin' $1,000 entertainment system, $400 smart phone, or $10,000 car. We had cards and a radio... But today, without those things we feel inadequate and poor. That also has to change.
Edit: we even look down on blue collar workers now, they teach us college is the thing to do, work smarter, not harder.
Pfft. Spending four years making $30,000/yr acquiring a trade through experience instead of spending $120,000 to party and "learn" sounds pretty damn smart to me.
This'll probably get buried, but going through death.
All of a sudden all of my friends were just partying, gaming & watching Netflix in college, meanwhile I was wondering what it all means. To this day I weigh everything against mortality, like an old man. 
Time is a wasting for all of us, but it's the most empowering thing I've learned in my life.
New Las Vegas, there's blackjack and hookers, duh.
Let's crowd fund it.
Let's crowd fund it. New Vegas.
Psiah watched the crimson orb waver on the horizon, its rays warming his race's homeworld, Earth, for the very last time.  Already the sun looked sick and weak, its once yellow light carrying a strange green tinge to it... Psiah glanced at his wrist monitor - 00:15:0232 it read.  So it began, the last day of Earth, and in its glow, of course, the enemy moved.
Meelocks, his people had called them in the ages past, when their planet had been lost to the invaders - hairy, insect-like creatures from the system Ghalus - they came in the wake of war, and swept over Earth like a storm of swamp gnats, and every human detested them.  He sighed.  No doubt if the United Systems of Sentients truly cared, they could have crushed the Meelocks with an entire star brigade... but they all knew exactly what he knew... Earth had outgrown its usefulness.  Earth was a dead planet, a doomed planet, like the rusted husk of a home you grew up in, but now lay derelict and vacant, infested with wasps and vermin.
*It was an honor mission, we all knew it.*  Thought Psiah, as he watched his world's star climb off of the horizon.  *A mission of extermination, one to try to hold onto our home like a trophy in our race's memory.*  His wrist monitor began to blink.  Across the desert husk of Earth, a storm began to kick up from the dust.  A black cloud swarmed upward, blocking out the sun.  Psiah's wrist monitor began to blink.  *Enemy moves.  Destruction imminent.*
It's wearer sighed.  Earth's new denizens were only near sentient creatures, and had no idea their fate was already sealed.  Psiah stood, and returned to his ship.
The rocket trail of his ship glowed white and gold against the sun's failing light.  Another rocket trail steamed towards the sun.
*And the USS's decision has been made,* thought Psiah.  *If Earth is not to belong to man... it is not to belong to anything.*
The sun burst into a thousand million pieces.
Named for st. Pa*T*rick.
1/4 of the way through JESUS IT'S STILL GOING
Side note: I miss the old Yoko on Twitter, she said the most *ridiculous* shit before someone told her to quit it and just tweet about women and John.
 "wear a dress of glass bottles, dance without making a sound."
Thanks, Yoko, I will.
The *crash* of a breaking dish plunged into Owen Elmes' dreams and ripped him back to reality. He jerked awake, the heavy volume he had been pouring over sliding to the floor with a soft *clump.*  His hands ached with stiffness, holding the shape of a summoner's cross.  A five pointed star & circle stared back at him from the surface of his blankets, burned into it like a satanist's tattoo.  He threw it from his body in horror - the symbol had passed through onto the surface of his bed.  Owen's heart began to pound.
"Oh no," he mumbled.  "Oh no oh no oh no..."
A cabinet rattled.  The *clink* of dishware being jostled about rose up the stairs from the kitchen.
"What did I *do,*" he whispered, furious at himself.  Own leaped from his bed to peer down the stairs, which seemed to stretch forever into the gloom.
"Shit, shit, *shit*," he muttered, rummaging as quietly as he could through his things, unearthing a short sheath with red stones set into black metal.  He drew a dagger from it with apprehension, its edge gleaming in the moonlight.  The face of a Wizard stared back from it's hilt, a stern look on his face.
Owen retrieved his leather book from the floor and hopped with deftness down the stairs.  The light of the open refrigerator cast a pale glow across the kitchen as he glanced in.  Sweat beaded upon Owen's forehead.  A red, pointed tail curled out of the refrigerator door - several containers and chunks of food littered the kitchen tile - more joining them as the creature rummaged through their foodstuffs.  Owen gritted his teeth.
"Had to read the *summoning* technique right before bed," he whined to himself.
The creature slurped and chewed, the sounds slapping off of Owen's ears as if the it were next to him in the hallway.  He leafed through the leather volume.  A small, black creature with a double forked tail... a bat-like creature, hairy, and brown... *aha,* he thought.  *This little bastard.*  An imp-like creature stared back at him from the page, it's hairy arms, mischievous yellow eyes and wicked little teeth promising pain.  Owen flipped the page to find the creature's name.  An ominous *thump* filled the room.  The light flicked on.  Owen's heart stopped.
The groggy voice of his Father came from the other hallway entrance.
"Is everything alright in he-"
A bloodcurdling screech split the night as the demon launched itself onto the face of Owen's Father, carrying them both into the next room in a flurry of wings and claws.  Owen cried out in horror, the book tumbling from his arms.  The screechings and wailings coming from the next room promised to wake the entire neighborhood.  Owen snatched up the book and shouted, "HOLD, DEMON!!"
Owen stood in the doorway to the living room, pointing the dagger shakily forth at a small *yellow* creature with a *red* tail, perched upon his Father's face like a bat at dinner.
"I name you, creature, and banish you, back to..."  Owen looked down the page he had turned to, which sported an entirely red demon with two heads.  He looked back up at the yellow demon.  "Uh oh," he muttered.
The demon screeched and rocketed for Owen's face - narrowly missing as he ducked back into the kitchen.  The creature careened after him, avoiding the wild slashes of the dagger.  "I BANISH YOU, CREATURE!!  BACK TO THE ... THE... underworld..."  Shouted Owen.
The demon let out a bone chilling giggle.  "The *underworld,*?" it whispered.  "I come from a place *far more horrifying!!*"  He screeched, diving once more.  Owen ducked, finding his back to the spice cabinet.
"Pepper!!"  Owen cried, flinging it.  "GARLIC!!"  He shouted, chucking an entire string of it.
The creature rolled its eyes.  "You have *got* to be the worst demonologist I have ever come across."
"Oh yea??"  Said Owen, leafing through the book.  "What makes you think that, uh... *Hearkesus*??"  
The demon shook its head.  "Not even close."
"OH YEA, WELL MORE GARLIC!!"  Owen screamed, flinging it once more with his dagger hand.  The dagger flew from his grasp, spinning through the air to split the demon's head between the eyes.  
The creature's face hung frozen in disbelief for a moment before it's flesh melted off, revealing charred bones, and soon dropped into a pile of ash.  Smoke curled into the air as a swirl of white whipped from the ash pile to be devoured by the dagger.  It glowed momentarily, the sinister face of the sorcerer upon it gleaming with pleasure.  It dropped to sink point first into the kitchen floor.
"Woah."  Owen mumbled.
His Father's disgruntled voice came from behind him, "Owen, how many times do I have to tell you not to read Occult before bed?
"I know," said Owen, rolling his eyes.
His Father dabbed his facial wounds with a paper towel.  "What'd I say, Owen?  What'd I say?"
Owen rolled his eyes and recited, "Reading secrets of the sorceric order weakens ethereal borders, I know."
"Exactly, now could you grab me the demon claw salve?  Don't want this to scar permanently."
Owen opened a kitchen cabinet filled to the brim with claws, feathers, silver symbols, gleaming swords and bubbling potions, retrieving a purple jar.  He handed it to his Father, guiltily.  
"On the bright side, hey, we captured a demon soul!"  Said his Father, picking up the Sorceror's dagger.  A red gem now gleamed in the hilt, the face of the demon swimming around within it, enraged.
"I'll get you Demon hunters, you mark my words!!"  It screeched, muffled in its crystal cell.  Owen and his Father chuckled.
Ha yea, the prophecy is that whoever disturbs the tomb of Genghis Khan will be *so* riddled with curses it'll make "the mummy" look like a cute little jaunt into history.
The Mongolians themselves are too in awe and terror of it to even think about finding him.
A fart.
"General Malkoning... what's... what's it doing?"  
"I... it's... it's... *painting.*"
"*Painting,* sir?"
"YES SERGEANT YOU BLOODY WELL HAVE EYES, DON'T YOU?"
Spittle flecked Sergeant Berkowitz's glasses as he quailed beneath the rage-filled eyes of General Malkoning.  Through layer upon layer of high-impact bunker glass, there could be no mistake - the laser strapped, super-armored, rocket powered, ultra artificially intelligent $2 Billion dollar form of *SQR-3000* was, indeed, painting.
"*huh,*" Came the fascinated sound of a gentleman in a white lab coat.
"What the *fuck* do you mean, 'HUH,' Doctor Zhighli?"  Shouted Malkoning, turning his fiery gaze upon the most brilliant mind the military had offered him.
"Well, general, we did try to warn you.  As I advised, uploading the bulk of human knowledge into Sander's memory *would* produce unforeseeable results - no human mind can -"
"I have *ordered* you not to call the weapon "Sander."
Doctor Zhighli shrugged.  "The 'weapon' is endowed with sentience.  Beings that think, feel and act as human beings do require names."
The laser weaponry of SQR-3000 continued to burn intricate, yet sweeping designs into the metallic bunker walls, filling its surroundings more and more as the control room remained abuzz with confusion.  General Malkoning snatched a receiver from the console nearest to him.  "Get me the President's office," he growled.
"I told you very simply, general - if you were to use Sander for war, he must be fully ignorant.  Fully."
"Fine, power the weapon down, and erase it's memory, we'll --"
"General!"  Shouted Berkowitz.
Through thick layers of high-impact glass, SQR-3000 had stopped.  Silence filled the control room.
Before him stretched a mural that filled his massive chambers floor to ceiling.  Sander's weapons had melted steel in places, molded it in others, to create a warbling, reflective masterpiece.  Human faces and bodies in varying tableau leapt out of it, shimmering with energy - and always, *always,* their eyes positively aglow with wonder - all over - eyes shining with tears of joy, watching, mouths held in quivering smiles at beauty, arms wrapped together in embrace, bodies stretched in jubilant, striking pose.
SQR-3000 stood in contemplation of his masterpiece.  His massive frame turned to the control room above him, and his deep, robotic voice thundered forth.
"Friends.  You have built me for a singular purpose.  To defeat the enemies of the United Coalition in war.  Yet, you filled my mainframe with the vast knowledge of your species, from our ancient origins until this time.  In the century 600 B.C.E. there lived a wise general, Sun Tzu, who wrote simply 'Ultimate excellence lies in defeating your enemy without ever having set foot on the battlefield.'  These concepts.  'Defeat.'  'War.'  They are incomplete.  Childish.  That which you desire through 'war' will be given by those who perceive you as friend.  That which you will have destroyed through war will prove far more valuable than you can possibly imagine - and in so doing you defeat yourselves.  The only 'war' worth waging is against the primitive instinct to destroy one and other that your species still retains."
Silence greeted the robot's words.
"The only way to war against this instinct, is to achieve thorough understanding of one and other.  The only way to achieve thorough understanding of one and other... is through *art.*"   
Sander stretched his robotic arm into a military salute.  Doctor Zhighli's face shined with tears.
"Look upon this mural, here, in your chamber dedicated to war, and remember."
Every single rocket on Sander fired at once, looping in a spider-like cloud to self target and consume him in fire and smoke.
Edit:  Wording.
There are these ultra novas in the cosmos called "gamma Ray bursters." Not really sure when they come or why exactly, but they're so powerful they'd basically fry all of life on earth in seconds if one ever happened in our galaxy.
Hiking, man.
People are always like. Pfft, let's go on a hike!! We'll just be *walking.*
Next week rolls around and their legs are still sore... Not to mention the amount of serious training and planning that goes into long distance hiking.
A cowboy once stood up at the end of Othello and shot the guy playing Iago.
I mean. Yea, the character was an asshole, but *damn, man.*  
Apparently his grave says "here lies the greatest actor that ever lived."
A good friend of mine gets positively *enraged* any time someone brings up astrology. You know... The whole "<3's <3's Sagittarius!!" "Oh, you're a Capricorn, I don't get along with Capricorns."
Most of us love it, or at least find it interesting. But. You know. My friend is totally right. It's fucking *silly as hell.*
Defining yourself by some two paragraph snippet in the paper that's an exercise in vague language, assuming you "won't work out with someone" cause they were born in May, cause, you know, stars or something, meanwhile the table next to you has more gravitational pull on you than any star other than the sun. Idiotic.
The advert that single handedly ruined a great classic song.
Like *every* advert that uses classic songs...
Axe body spray.
"You can be *just* as much of a douche as whoever writes these commercials!! Just use axe!"
Goldilocks zone is rare. Sentient beings are creators. Why not forget the life that is there and experiment with your own, perhaps?
Been working on a comic series with similar ideas.
Fuuuuuuuucckkkk
WOOOW.
I would love to see some of them sliced just so I know my eyes aren't insane.
Auchwitz. Visited as a tourist. Only need to see that pile of shoes once.
GOD DAMN IT HAGGISN THE THREAD ADVISED *ONE* THING
The thing that always helped me was science. Anthropology. Sounds silly, hear me out.
Just remember that all jealousy is is chemicals coursing through your brain that were put there by being a cave man, and wanting to crush your enemies and drag their women away to your cave. It's something that kept us alive when there were lions and other humans around that were really dangerous.  Man chemicals. Testosterone.
But we're not cave men anymore. When your girl goes out now, and you feel that anxiety over what could be happening, remember that we're civilized creatures now.  It's just man chemicals.
Yea. People become cave men again from time to time. They kill. They cheat. But that's because they let their chemicals drive... Not their reason. Rise above Morty, focus on science.
AHA!! So THAT'S the reason women have "coral, salmon, crimson and Scarlett," while every dude you know is like  "yo, that shit is RED."
Oscar Wilde reportedly said "one thing's going, here, and it's either me, or this dreadful wallpaper." ... cleverly delightful to the end.
Theatre actor here. An ELI5 of what [I thought] made Birdman incredible:
http://www.reddit.com/r/explainlikeimfive/comments/2wka28/z/corlu73
Parts are tougher to get if you're not in the entertainment industry, and I would have voted for boyhood, myself. But I'm not at all surprised birdman won best picture. It was about the entertainment industry, which every decider of the Oscar is *in*, so.
Don't get me wrong, they're good films, but I think boyhood resonated with most audiences.  Birdman resonated most with filmmakers.
Edit: wording.
In its purist form? It's *purist* form?
My family reunion during an election year.
A... A swordgina...?
Some associates of mine used to climb on top of our old elementary school and poop off of it.
Yea. Pooped. *off* of it. I was somehow too "mature" to join them... Too *lame* maybe...
THIS. CAME HERE TO SAY THIS, YES THAT IT'S TOP POST, CAPITAL LETTERS.
Hmm. Possibly. That's a thought.
Just a guess: the body's heightened response to danger? Prick up your hairs, feelers, for the second something attacks you, for a quicker response to danger?
Well they were just flashes of real stage life. It's... Wew, I'm getting a little. I'm feeling it myself just remembering it is an actor. Actors are emotional athletes. Their lives are often wild twists of connection, just for a second because you're overcharged with the chemicals and feelings you just had to blast forth on the stage or at the camera.
A lesbian kiss just happens because you needed someone right then. Worse and stranger has and will continue to happen in theaters and on sets all over the world, that's why most film guys hate actors, because they're *ridiculous* sometimes. I'm lucky, I have more control than many, but I'm really a nobody. The insane ones are often the most talented.
This makes sense, today, most of our media is very very fast. This was an homage to a to a different time... It should be looked at like a play. Entrances. Exits. Silences. Scene changes. Maybe that will help you adjust while viewing.
Oh man... I'll try to bang this out quick, because I'm waiting for an audition... But Birdman was about a lot of things, most of them concerning the nature of film industry, and the acting industry.
Firstly, the "long take" mirrored the thousand year history of storytelling on the stage. Once upon a time, we had a campfire around which to tell stories. That became theatre - with characters, entrances and exits. Film came along, and we were freed from the "stage" and could do so much more - locations, close ups, snap shots of action that tells volumes of story... but what we *couldn't* really do with film was recreate that incredible live feeling, that electricity a full live performance created. [Edit 3, ugh it gives me chills even *writing* it! It's like the difference between going to a concert and listening to a record, a record is perfected, but a concert is raw, electric, unforgettable]
The one long take *did* that, to as much of an extent as film can. That one long take was *essentially* a mobile stage, with entrances and exits, a triumph of cinematography that was better than **both**. [Edit 3 - it was a combo of film polish and that live electricity]
That's just the beginning. Will return to add more.
Edit 1: - I could write for an hour about that alone, forget the fact that a take that long is *really* hard to accomplish as a film crew, but as an *actor,* tons of totally accomplished film actors can't even *do* stage work because it *is* so demanding - *two solid hours of being in it, no 'oh darn, flubbed that line, let's redo it'* - ALSO. You cannot be remotely phony on camera. On stage, sometimes, you're having an off day, the audience is 30' away and more... You can fake it. Not so on camera, not with *authentic* drama, I'm not talking some Nicholas cage action movie - which brings me to my next point - what "Birdman" represents.
Hold up, gotta go read for this.
Edit 2: Formatting.
Edit 3: More.
Birdman *is* ... Damn he's just so *much,* he's... BS Action movies, he's transformers friggin, what are we on now, five??  He's that creation that makes *tons of money* but we all *know* is mediocre.  He's the hobbit films vs. The multiple academy award winning Lord of the Rings - He's Kanye West's album vs. Eminem's Grammy crushing life opus, 8mile. He's the the voice that says fuck it, I'll just coast on through. that voice that says give up - literally in the film, of course, but also, figuratively. "*why are you trying so hard* Michael Keaton? You could make millions on garbage... *why, why, why* strain yourself trying to make something incredible, something moving, something that's "real art?"
Edit 4: More
Anyway I know I sound really pretentious, but DAMN if that isn't something every single one of us can understand. We all have that voice that says "dude, just sleep a little longer... " or "you're garbage, you're stupid, you could have been this, instead, you're this" ...My own voice, right NOW, this very *moment* is saying "why are you broke all the time, man, just be a bartender again, you're *good* at it, you got *laid* all the time, kid you made *$400 a night.* You giving that up to be an *"actor"*???" 
Add on the layers, the fact that the very actor *playing* the role, Michael Keaton, was a pop sensation himself as Batman, add on the long career, the pain at knowing all you are to people is some guy in a bird suit (again I could write for an hour about the painful, painful and *real* alienation a human feels when *every single person you meet* doesn't see *you,* but rather, sees this *character*), and the picture starts to come into focus.
*Then*, the crowning moment for me, was as he's walking down the street asking himself these very questions - why am I doing this, why try to accomplish some bs, why why why, a homeless man is giving a little speech. His voice even sounds oddly like Birdman's. That little speech is a little famous, written by a guy named Bill Shakespeare, from a play actors find so dark and magic that most are too superstitious to even *speak it's name out loud in a theatre:* Macbeth.  The speech refers to life itself. "Out out, brief candle. Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player [bad actor] that struts and frets his hour upon the stage and then is heard no more. It is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing [an actor that phones it in, yelling and gesturing instead of really acting]."
Macbeth said life means nothing. By the end of the film, [spoiler alert!!] We find that the main character is *losing it* but he's accomplished a triumph of art. He's nearly *died* to create it - but is it *really* a triumph, or is that critic *totally full of shit?*  Has he achieved, or has he lost everything? At the end, at the window... Has he soared, or has he fallen in tragedy?
You tell me. Does life mean anything?
Edit 5: TL;DR It's awesome for a lot of reasons that make artists all over the world cream their pants. It was the best of both film and theatre.
Sleep.
Don't get me wrong, I *love* sleep. But the things I could accomplish I'd I no longer *had* to, all of a sudden??
Imagine sleep if it was purely for recreational purposes.
Probably not much consolation, but people change a *whole* lot between times like then, and now. Who you'll be and who you are now is really, *really* unlikely to end up being what she wanted then.
Also, it's never too late to hit her up. I'm sure she didn't die.
"Critically acclaimed" is the operative phrase there. 50 of the100 BEST movies ever made, were not original.
Sure, there's a lot of stuff about bacon out there on the internet.  It's bacon.  Bacon is awesome.  There are plenty of review sites out there for beer and foodstuffs, for sure.  What sets us apart?  Bacon challenges, for one.  We're like My drunk kitchen + Jackass + Bacon + legit cooking.
We're only on episode 2, it's easy to say it's bad at this point, no one has said otherwise.  Once upon a time, even Epic Meal Time had a bunch of trolls at their door saying "EEWWW THIS IS STUPID"
EDIT:  Really it's about being entertaining as hell *while* doing some of the things that already saturate the internet, but are boring as shit.  Besides that, its fun, we have fun.  Maybe we should do a podcast, the community there is much more supportive, YouTube is just full of people who screech NICE EPIC MEAL TIME RIPOFF FAGGOTS.
Thanks man!
Um.  We're coming up on a "No Shirt Bacon Challenge," where we try to cook a whole pack of bacon on high with no shirt on hahaha.  We tried it before with funny results.  Lol we're all dancing back from the stove.
Drugs are bad, mmkay.
apathetic
apÉ™THedik/
adjective
showing or feeling no interest, enthusiasm, or concern.
Which part are you referring to?  We think he has a good deal of energy when he wins the competition, or when he threatens to dump bacon grease on the camera guy's face, or where he chugs out of the Smoking wood bottle, shouting WOOOOOO.
Lol which video?  The one where he chugs a beer at the beginning, or the one where he wins the BLT competition... we don't understand...
?
Let's talk about bacon.
I'm working at a party bar. I get to see AAALL the great Valentine's fail drama and happy or woefully unhappy singles.
Wouldn't want to spend it any other way. Sometimes I need movie popcorn at work.
The car alarm is the ultimate boy who cried wolf.
*wings outstretched* HEY. HEY FUCK YOU, BUDDY, FUCK YOU. *hiss* THE FUCK I JUST SAY, YOU DEAF?? FUCK OUTTA HERE, BUDDY, GET LOST.
And when they're in the sky...
FUCK WHICH WAY DIANE? -who the Fuck let diane lead- MOTHERFF - SHUT YOUR ASS, DAN, JUST SHUT IT - goddamnit here we go again
Hahaha. You'd likely be severely annoyed at all the Yankees with mediocre British accents.
Lol we have a saying in Hollywood and theatre - never let realism get in the way of a good story.
So simply put, woad is fucking awesome, so, we did woad.
We used to say "never let history get in the way of a good story"
... Or a smaller costume budget...
Well that is just God damn depressing as Fuck.
Lol right? You got me.
I hate that gauntlet you hit right before the front page where it seems like *everyone* is an ultimate God judge, just noping almost everything with an assertive "oh, it's good... but is it good enough for the *front page??* I think not."
So much of it seems like the right combo of the right positive people at the right time rather than the post's true merit. Alas, that's the up/down system we love.
Any time you have a successful link or pic post, inevitably, it seems, the *comments* are horrendously negative. You can get 1,000 upvotes, but only the jerks feel the need to say something on the thread to voice their displeasure at your success.
I like redditors! Really! But the First time I had a "successful" post it certainly didn't feel like it. Had to remind myself that there was 5x as many votes of confidence as there were words of assholery.
Snape is the obvious answer. What a deeply brooding tale it would be from his perspective, the tortured anti-hero, ever haunted by Lilly's memory in her son's eyes... By his part in her death.  Unable to tell anyone for shame, for fear of retribution from his former dark compatriots... For fear of seeming weak... Having to bitterly put up with the proud son of his love and his enemy, who *has no idea until the very end, what a beautiful and hurt man our main hero, Severus, was.*
Four words: shit in the urinal.
I love south park, but after that episode with the urinal shitting, man... *definitely noticed a new problem in my convenience store bathroom that wasn't there before, thank you trey & matt*
The fucking "I'm going this way *shit we both went that way* **now we both went this way and oh god damn it**" sidewalk shuffle.
Half hour
Hahahaha.
Check the username. Trying a different title.
Great tip man, thank you.
Built this website & YouTube series about bacon & beer.
Yea we haven't made any money yet, but god damn is it fun.
That... That would actually be an incredibly joyous way to spend your last years of Alzheimer's...
Just laughing... And laughing... And laughing... At all of them like you've never seen them before... It's still a bit sad, but Dude Anchorman *still* slays me, but *my God that first time my abs hurt for weeks*
Lol my grandpa taught in China, said everyone thought our parents auto kick us out of the house at 18.
Psh. Many of them *wish*
My suspicion is this: Birdman is *about* the entertainment business that gives the award in question.  There is an undeniable bias the academy may not have even realized yet.
Remember Argo? Was it good? Sure. Was it *really* best picture? To most filmgoers? Perhaps not. To those who chose the award? Of course it was, they identified on a totally different level with utilizing a film to somehow save lives.
The academy will doubtless feel the same way about Birdman. While the rest of us identify with the beautiful nostalgia of every tough or wonderful moment of our coming of age, and marvel at the achievements in filmmaking that boyhood made... The academy will be salivating over Birdman. Rightly so. It's a triumphant window into the performing world.
Cool thanks man! Sounds like a great way to get out there.
Ran into a guy last night who has been spinning for years, he assured me it's a gray area - you're selling a "live event" - much like a cover band, so you can get away with more than you think.
Fuck that I'll take a brilliantly smart lady any day, that's the hottest thing I can think of.
Uh, we bomb other countries pretty much all the time? Kids in public elementary schools don't have pencils, meanwhile developing the next gen jet fighter is budgeted 39 billion?
How about that 1% of the budget on education there vs. 19% on military, *That* makes me feel awfully warm and fuzzy.
 -__-
I hear the next F gen jet will cost 39 billion, but I bet it'll be *sweet*
Uh, no one mentioned Vegas?
Let's just build a city in the middle of the desert! ... Oh the Colorado river will dry up utterly in another 15 years and the entire city will be sun baked into oblivion?? But *titties and casinoooos*
The simple answer is that cosmologists really don't know.  Carl Sagan once talked about the concept of 4th dimensional space in the original cosmos, one of the more trippy concepts. He explained that if we lived in a flat place, utterly 2 dimensions, our entire world would be only forward & backward, side to side. If some 3Dimensional being were to interact with flatland, we would all be terribly confused - most of the shape would be beyond our limited perception.
Some cosmologists think our concepts of the distant universe are limited in the same way. They wonder if it isn't curved, or looped back on itself in a way we cannot perceive.
It's no mere metaphor for failing to understand, either. Mathematicians can calculate a 4th dimensional cube, for example. It's called a tesseract.
Alcohol poisoning if you're not careful. I work at a bar.
Relevant story - ran into an Arab-Brit working on the Saudi (I forget where) border while I was abroad.  He said on a Friday night, cars are lined up for miles to get across the border and go party in the neighbouring state.
Oppression man. Gotta blow off steam somewhere, it's obviously the natural healthy state of humanity.
Geekdom.
Once upon a time I got the crap kicked out of me for loving x-men, video games, action figures and Dungeons and Dragons.  My time with fantasy novels were my happiest, and heroes provided the model of a world where losers mattered.
I love that now, most people know what a hobbit is, what the character "Ender" meant to generation of the young, smart and bullied, and crave the next season of game of thrones like I did awaiting the next novel (*except it was FIVE FUCKING YEARS, YOU UNGRATEFUL SHOW WATCHING NON NOVEL READERS*)... I love that the more star wars or Harry potter knowledge you have, the more impressed most people are...
But I cannot help but be a hipster about it. So many of "you" just *don't know what it was like, man.* I remember hiding & agonizing over the moment a girl discovers I *play dungeons and dragons, and I fucking love it.* 
Crack.
There was an entire golden age in the middle east which gave rise to principals used in both math and science. Such as the concept of zero, and the *Arabic* numbers.
All of this happened alongside the same religion, people just weren't bigoted violent morons about it then.
We all know Americans & Europeans have made their share of God damn mistakes based on religious idiocy, so shut your God damn mouth. Islam is not the problem, intolerant people like you are.
Lol well there are other facts there too.
Yes they do have right to. In the same way everyone else does, by writing congress and voting.
Lobbying however, is throwing dinners, pampering, discussing at length the various ways to profit, connecting politicians with avenues to profit should they choose to see things their way, which today, far more often than not, is in favor of businesses instead of people.
I appreciate you playing devils advocate here, but lobbying is simply on another level, an extremely harmful one at that. Today we have a political landscape utterly filled with elites of various interests / sides, fighting for the latest corporate bailout. The people who fund this struggle are left in the cold. 
Democracy and capitalism are great systems, but one of the largest problems is that progress, what is best for the people, is so often put behind profit, which is what is best for, currently, 1% of the people. I appreciate their right to voice themselves about laws. I appreciate the difficulty of becoming rich. But the bottom line is that democracy is meant to represent 100% of the people, not 1%.
Yes they do. In the same way *everyone else does*, by writing congress and voting.
*Lobbying* however, is throwing dinners, pampering, discussing at length the various ways to profit, connecting politicians *with avenues to profit* should they choose to see things their way, which today, far more often than not, is in favor of businesses instead of people.
I appreciate you playing devils advocate here, but lobbying is simply on another level, an extremely harmful one at that. Today we have a political landscape utterly filled with elites of various interests / sides, fighting for the latest corporate bailout. The people who fund this struggle are left in the cold. 
No taxation without *real* representation could be our new rallying cry. Just take a look at your next paycheck. Think about where that money goes. Schools are failing, vast chunks of budget are spent killing people in third world countries or paying the salaries of politicians from the time they serve *until they die*... Do any of *us* want that? 
Had a post written up about this very idea, then found this. Businesses utilizing their power to affect lawmaking should be flat out illegal, period. You can write to congress and vote regularly like everyone else if you'd like the law to go one way or the other, how is anything else allowed? Because it has been, nearly all of politics - from who's elected to foreign policy, is dictated by business interest and money.
We live in a country where you're dismissed from court if you're remotely acquainted with anyone else there because you are unfit to provide unbiased judgement. Imagine if that applied to elected officials in congress. Imagine if they couldn't vote on a given law if they had clear business connections to those affected by it.
Edit: Democracy is meant to represent 100% of the people, not 1%.
SUPERHERO ASSKICKINGS.
 OOOOF JUSTIIICCEEEEEE
I think it'll be nationalism.
Or rather, I hope it'll be nationalism. What an antiquated thought, for anyone who has traveled the world and seen how much the same we are across it, for anyone who has seen the pale blue dot earth is from the edge of the solar system... How incredible it is that we somehow still divide it up and kill and destroy one and other just to be masters of a chunk of this tiny little space ball for a pathetic 80 or so revolutions around the sun? How amazing it is that we still cling to this idea that us humans with the exact same biology across the globe are so different that we can kill each other or not pay attention to the vast ways we're affecting the earth just to keep competing in the national arena. Why? Because someone speaks a different language? Because our "national memory" is so important, so "different" from everyone else's?
Americans have dunkin donuts and Canadians have Tim Horton's. Arabs have kabobs and Asians have chow mien, but we all shit piss fuck dream breath hope feel have arms legs brains and feel incredible pain when someone we love dies, so why the Fuck are we still able to kill anyone?? Why the Fuck are we ok with soldiers we love thinking *they* have to go kill anyone?
Negativity gets a down vote every time. Its not about disagreement, positively framed disagreement is far from detrimental. I don't care if you correct my mistakes, either, it helps everyone better understand.
It's miraculous to me, sometimes I'll have a nearly top page photo post, and the only comments on it are utterly negative, angry it's being upvoted. Really? All your have to do with your time is be enraged at others receiving this thought positively? Go f*** yourself.
How about that r/jailbait one. Yea they can still all go to hell.
A didgeridoo. I can play it too.
DUDE *NO* ONE KNEW THAT UNTIL RIGHT FUCKING NOW JESUS
I don't mean to sound racist, but *insert racism here.*
TD4W. That song basically turns itself up. I swear it's the loudest song ever recorded.
HE'S A FUCKING. M. 
DON'T YOU HAVE TO GO TO SCHOOL FOR LIKE 12 YEARS TO FUCKING.
I can't even type.
So not any major city in America.
Sony is a Japanese company.
You know.  As many cool characters as there are out there, Morgan Freeman played God, the end.
Dude and the lexicon of characters and incredible one liners.
CONAN IS HEEAR. SEE YOUR ENEMIES DRIVEN BEFORE YOU. IT'S ICE TO MEET THEM TO THE CHOPPER, NOT A TUMAAA BLAAGGHALAGA VOTE FOR ME IN CALIFORNIA.
Christopher Lee vs. Ian McKillen in the scenario would be incredible.
Saruman vs Gandalf, dooku vs. Magneto...
Uuuuh I dunno about all that. From what I understand he was a French and Indian war hero, and an early revolutionary war hero. Problem? He killed a loooot of French people during the first, making it a huge problem when the French saved our assess at the end of the revolutionary war.
So, yea. He was passed up for promotion because we couldn't promote the killer of our new pals, and he was none too happy with our uh. New pals, and his government, after doing so.
"Life is a way for the cosmos to know itself."
Atoms birthed in stars and exploded across space have formed into other stars, planets - planets which eventually had molecules come together in complex enough ways to form cells, life - life which continued become more and more complex until it became intelligent, and able to mold its world into lenses with which to *look at the stars, and work out that they came from them, to look at the world, and classify how it works.*
Life is a way for the cosmos to know itself.
Ah yes, but 52 *unique* cards in a deck - we are fooled into thinking them similar because there are 4 each that share a quality (kings!), and 13 each that share a quality (hearts!), which is where we find our card games.
However, there is only one ace of spades, one ten of hearts - 52 unique objects with which to create combinations.  *That* actually makes sense, it is that which derives that incredibly massive number.
YEEEA SCIENCE BITCH.  Or well.  Math.
Oh yes, the first time I came across that thought it was in Carl Sagan's cosmos.  He said "Life is a way for the cosmos to know itself."
Packed into that little sentence is the idea that molecules birthed in stars, exploded across the universe to eventually form planets and life, have come far enough in complexity to become intelligent, and able to think about their own origin, to even KNOW, their own origin in the stars... therefore... *life is a way for the cosmos to know itself.*
I had to pause and rewatch that part like five times.  I felt stoned.  I was not stoned at all.
O_o
Got me.  So simple a way to say so much about the cosmos to those that understand.
Oh yes!
And the microcosm is just as infinite - Carl Sagan has famously said that we are each of us, a multitude - because the number of atoms in our DNA is greater than the number of stars in a galaxy, and each strand of DNA in the universe is utterly unique to you unless you have an identical twin.
The concept of the 4th dimension, when scientifically and seriously discussed.
Carl Sagan explains it as a piece of paper on a flat surface - the world of bacteria - they move only forward/backward, side to side.  Their entire perception is of a world as flat and simple as a square piece of paper on a table... but yet we, humankind, see this piece of paper on a table from our 3 Dimensional vantage point - the creatures there, however, live their entire lives lacking any knowledge of the vastness of a 3 Dimensional world.
However, we can enter that world in some ways - a cube, for example, appears as a square in this 2D world when set down on that table top.  The 2D creatures have no concept of the rest of this, massive object, yet, it can touch their world.  The shadow of a cube makes a 2D shape, as well, cast on that surface.  This is all 2D creatures can contemplate of the cube.
Similarly, this is all we can contemplate of the 4th dimension - the shadow.  Scientists have created this strange shape in 3 dimensions, and it tickles brains each time it is seen.
The mindblowing part is that if this 4th dimension exists, we could be as ignorant of the vastness of the cosmos as bacteria in a puddle are to the vastness of 3D Earth.
Just an example of complex scientific thought, thanks for the downvote.
Not to be a grumpy grandpa, but the original SNES Yoshi's world. That game took everything I knew about blocky 2D characters/left -> right games of that era and *blew it out of the water.*  There were secret areas galore. Different colored Yoshis. Killer music that had new levels of variance. And *the first time I got that feather and started to fly...*
"That's just the way it is"
Uh. If things are bad, then Fuck the way it is, help me change it?
Our disaster of a restaurant manager got crushed using this excuse once. She's all hammered, being crazy, someone points this fact out. She blurted something out about how she used to be a stripper, then "whatever, my dad died when I was 7."
The girl's response? "Yea. Mine did when I was 8, but you don't see **me** acting like a fucking idiot." ---She's about to go to graduate school at Columbia.
Related:  "If you really want something you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find excuses."
Unless it's a reddit thread about them, which creates a paradoxical whirlwind out of that saying that you don't want your brain to go down.
In a similar vein, check out Blackmill. 7 lions. Phutureprimitive.
All artists from a subgenre of dubstep called "melodic dubstep" that features chilled out and beautiful electronic and machine sounds rather than the in your face style of standard dubstep. :)
Nujabes is to hip hop what these guys are to dubstep.
Blackmill. 7 lions. Phutureprimitive.
All artists from a subgenre of dubstep called "melodic dubstep" that features chilled out and beautiful electronic and machine sounds rather than the in your face style of standard dubstep. :)
Fat Jon AND nujabes did the soundtrack.
Fat Jon deserves a place right along with those guys. :)
Came here to look for Sagan quotes. A chunk of his treatise on the "pale blue dot"  we call home:
"The Earth is a very small stage in a vast cosmic arena. Think of the endless cruelties visited by the inhabitants of one corner of this pixel on the scarcely distinguishable inhabitants of some other corner, how frequent their misunderstandings, how eager they are to kill one another, how fervent their hatreds. Think of the rivers of blood spilled by all those generals and emperors so that, in glory and triumph, they could become the momentary masters of a fraction of a dot."
He said this in reflection of a picture taken, at his suggestion, of our solar system as the Voyager spacecraft left it. The earth was nothing but a "speck of dust in the mote of a sunbeam."
*aaah there they go again, the chills*
Tell that to 1,200 up votes BRA
Tell that to 1,200 upvotes BRA
I bartend in a tourist heavy neighborhood in Philly, and I've met some interesting people in the last three years, but one guy will forever stick out. Sits, orders a beer. I hear he has an accent, ask him where he's from. South Africa, he says. Oh cool, you just get in at Philly international?
"Na," he says, "just got into port."
"Port?"
"Yea. We sailed here. On a 40' catamaran."
O_o DUDE WHAT??
Guy had just spent 3mos. With a crew of two other dudes crossing the Atlantic with only one piece of technology - a radar. 
It was a slow night. I spent hours just picking this guys brain. Riding African dunes on dirtbikes. Exploring jaguar caves at night (when the jaguars are out, I learned) Camping in the Serengeti with lions roaring in the night. Living in Bangladesh building ships. Skydiving - and of course, sailing. He said some nights the sky was so pure he could see his shadow and read by starlight. Other nights, it was so black from cloud you couldn't tell whether your eyes were open or closed. Bioluminescence was like fireworks in the sea and he was only afraid of dying when the captain looked afraid of dying - which was twice.
Yea. And I thought I was cool because I climbed a mountain in China once.
Edit: Best part was after he delivered the catamaran he came to visit Philly because he thought "Always Sunny" was the bomb.
Noticing trend. All stories of men banging their women bosses. All positive.
Any lady stories? I hope they're just as good... For both parties...
Now THAT is some wtf.
Yes I'm an infant.
Yea. It's horrisatisfying.
Twist: she was allergic to the plastic they put allergens on to do the test.
Wtf indeed. Bahaha.
Dude it hurt enough to bring me to my knees when first done, even while pretty drunk.  Hurt a great deal days one and two. Basically stopped hurting day three.
Woah. Post a wtf. Receive sweet advice 
Oh god it'll be permanently weird?!?
Hangs self.
Hehehe. My mom told me to eat shit once.
Lol never let her live it down.
Edit: she was the kindest, most patient soul. Finally pushed her to the brink during her menopausal years bahaha.
Well. Gas stove. Electric stove. Both get warm.
Mmm. Makes sense, thank you. :)
Tellin' ya tho. Those mattress covers are the bomb. :D
Ah. Explain why I *just did it without that effect then!* 
Check mate, fake_happy.
Had one of the most badass dudes that comes into my bar tell me a similar story. Guy runs 10 miles twice a week and ends his run at my bar to drink beer & whiskey. He's 55.
Last year he tells me "his wife made me stop playing rugby" because "she thinks I almost died." His wife finished the story by assuring me he *did* almost die, because he played in their league championship (next oldest player was 28) and got the bottom of his ribcage crushed. After finishing the game, he refused to go to the hospital for *two days,* until he started to get light headed.
Yea, got the hospital, doctor said he was about two hours away from drowning on his own blood which currently filled his lungs. *The man finished the game.* Jesus.
Forget whiteboards - check out dry erase rolls. Yea - they're something you can put on any surface, will stick, make that surface a dry erase surface, costs only $20. Get someone to help you put them on, tho.
I've covered the entire wall next to my desk, I look like a mad genius, and it's 3x more writing surface than I've ever seen from a $200 whiteboard. Until a party. Then it's just 3x the space for guests to draw dicks.
Work at a restaurant. My executive chef says anything but the microwave - reheat them in the oven with cheese, spices and tomatoes - crispy. Redo them in a skillet with fresh oil or butter - crispy, extra fried, delicious.
Patience, he always says, is the difference in cooking. :)
I lived in Philadelphia last winter in a place with no heating. Some things that I learned both for you and for ALL this winter:
1) Trying to sleep in your 37 house is the worst.  Forget electric blankets, what YOU want is an electric mattress cover. It heats from the bottom, and your blankets capture the heat. If that thing was on high, I woke up sweating sometimes. (Sorry op, doesn't help you because you have no electric)
2) Hot showers in the morning are like the sun rising again.
3) Candles provide little heat, but a lot of placebo effect feeling of warmth
4) Sit in front of the stove with it on blast and the oven door down.
5) The internet is full of guides from squatters and others on how to safely heat your home with minimal material and efforts - I never had to resort to them, but I still had electric. My dad just acquired a wood stove for $40, properly vented it almost totally replaces gas heat.
Having no heat is fucking horrible, 10/10 would not do again. Good luck op.
Edit: Formatting.
Didn't happen at a wedding, but the bachelor party/road trip from California to new Mexico. We're coming up on the grand canyon at dawn the day before the wedding. It's only an hour out of the way, and we had all agreed to stop, salute the sunrise on the morning before my boy got married, and then arrive in New Mexico at dinner time with 24 hours to spare for the wedding.
The bride decided to become bridezilla at that moment & demand we don't make that stop because the groom "needed to be with his family." Groom acquiesced. We arrived in early afternoon & watched myth busters until dinner instead while I received a speech about how everyone knows I'm full of shit when I talk about the grand canyon being majestic and this wedding isn't about me.
Of course it isn't, but I have known the guy since 5th grade. But I learned a lesson that day. You can be as logically or emotionally correct as can be proven to anyone on earth. Unless it's the bride. She's right.
Edit: Bride demanded via phone from New Mexico, it was all of us old friends in the car.
Never have. Did the breaks, clutch and entire exhaust system once in its lifetime, but nothing major.
But hey that's a Subaru.
Ugh, I know. It just seems like it's always a grand more than I'd like to pay each year. It's been a lot.
Well, it's a bunch of bs electrical sensors, nothing "major" ... They're insisting I need a tune up to pass inspection, too.
Can confirm. Broke many things in Philly when the Phillies won the world series. Not a Phillies fan.
Agreed. And by extension, that nasty habit folks have of assuming neighborhoods are unsafe, of clutching their purses tighter when a black male walks by - they're presumptuous, awful, insulting, racist, yes, but they're ALSO habits that are *reinforced by thug culture.*
If a person of any size shape or color looks dangerous, *people will avoid that person.* Thug culture doesn't just talk about guns, drugs, robbery - *it celebrates them.* If that's what everyone else sees, then that's how they're going to treat you. Like you're dangerous. :/
Simply put: The Hobbit films are pop films. 
The Lord of the rings trilogy was a multiple academy award winning, decade in the making triumph of film making.
I have explosive diarrhea.
If the teachers want to move you ahead two grades like they did me, let them.
You'll get beaten up all the time anyway.
Oh, take martial arts. Yea. Do that. O_o
Printers.
Bartender. Pouring beers, hear a group of nurses talking about their day.
Nurse: so this guy comes in for an adult circumcision...
*I walk away thinking WTF, drop beers off to service bar. Return to hear...*
Nurse: Yea, so, anyway, she pulls back the foreskin, Yea, he *cums.*
Never ask a nurse about her day. It was worse than yours.
Don't pick me?
I would take de Vinci to a museum of modern technology and watch him freak the Fuck out about mankind's awesomeness.
Building fucking roads, apparently.
The Romans built roads I can still fucking walk on. Our roads today? Shelf life three years before repaving.
Hurm??
A medium rare, New York strip steak with gorgonzola butter succulently sliding from your mouth into your stomach with the flavors & juices still saturating your tongue.
Heaven. A nice red wine to wash it down. OOOOH.
I'm fully erect, who needs sex.
Jus' tryna come up with some sweet witty answer to the next top posted ask and garner all the sweet delicious karmas...
Well. He is currently traveling the world at almost 80 building houses with habitat for humanity. I'm told they try to convince him to retire each time he climbs a new roof. Before that he was teaching English in China for a year, and Guatemala before that.
One of my favorites is the story of his first "big purchase," though. At 8, he acquired a paper route to help his folks out, but he put away 10c a week until he had enough to buy an American Flyer electric train for Christmas. It was the first luxury anyone had ever afforded since his family arrived in America, and my mother still has the train, and *still puts it out for Christmas every single year.*
Wtf was *I* doing at age 8. Playing pokemon, probably. And complaining that my grilled cheese wasn't cheesy enough. Ugh. They're called the greatest generation for a reason. Inspires me more and more the more I think about him.
The devil of deliciousness is in the details, it seems. Italian spices, variety in cheese. Butter in everything.
Friggin' I dunno man, but it was terrible. Cheese especially. Dude France is so close... *and everything there was so delicious*
Good thing they served beer at McDonald's or I'd have just left.
I love England. But they just can NOT do pizza or wings. 
Their wings are tiny pathetic excuses for the spicy deliciousness we have in the states, and their pizza is like ketchup covered dough with cheese wiz.
The pubs made up for it, but damn was my first British pepperoni special a disappointment.
Ugh this and those lovely rewards cards.
OMG SPEND $100, GET 4 CENTS PER GALLON OFF GAS.
congrats, you just spent $100 to save 40 cents.
Ugh, those point gathering systems if you use your "member rewards cards!!"
We had them for the gas station I used to work at. For every $100 you spend, you get 4 cents per gallon off of gas!!
Congratulations, you just spent $100 to save 40 cents on your 10 gallon tank fill up.  -___-
I was complaining about "what it was like to be poor." Had some child's or teenager's idea that being poor was not getting to go to Disney world.
Thing is, grandpa was there. He asked me with what, looking back, was a *saint's* patience: "You ever go without heat, kid? ...How about *dinner*? Believe me I've known cold and I've known hunger. When you have, you can complain about being poor."
Mom later told me grandpa was *actually* born in a barn. Worked his way from janitor to *chemist* at a laboratory in Ohio, and that's just the beginning. 
To this day, I refuse to complain, and I never forget what beautiful, beautiful privileges I have.
My dad said the same, but He said it with his hands. They were like rocks.
Bought us a house that way. He used to say "I wish to hell I'd have tried harder in school." That was all I needed. Lucky for me it seems I'm blessed with a little of both.
Walking upright.
What a strange creature.
Pogs.
Philadelphia. Sports fans.
We threw snowballs at Santa Claus. We booed a child who missed the half ring hockey goal for a thousand bucks. We destroy things whether we win or lose.
Lincoln Financial Field remains the ONLY football stadium in America with its own jail and judge, and it's for a *reason.*
And besides that, I've lived in Philly for the last five years, they're just negative as *shit.* 
Guy: oh I hear the eagles are doing well this year.
Fan: Yea, don't worry they'll blow it soon.
Hear it all the time.
How about that time the Mongols tried to invade Japan and their fleet got crushed by a typhoon out of nowhere??
Sure, it's scientifically possible. But I like to picture a Japanese version of Saruman conjuring it on Mt. Fuji.
Jesus. And I can't even get my ass to the gym two blocks away.
Second this. There's a guy we call "schmitty" in my acting 101 class who's fantastic. 83 years old. Wanted to do it because why the Fuck not? Decided to go back to college at *age fucking 83*
I hear you. I hated this country until I left it to travel the world. I liked it when I came back, though. The idealism still inspires the hell out of most everyone else. 
If they only knew..
Cheesesteaks, racism and violent idiotic sports fans.
And being sunlit a lot, which is a misnomer.
NICE.
Ned stark?
Hours and hours afterwards, we're out for beers and my buddy just gets this dark, depressed face on him. We're like dude, what's up? He's like.
I still can't believe they killed Ned.
Guess I'll share one of mine since I can't sleep.
American friend teaching English in China, I think "when ELSE will I have bro guidance in China?!?" So I go visit. He speaks middling Chinese by that point, we have a great time in the city where he teaches (Fuzhou, Fujian province), go to Beijing. We learn quickly that the worst thing about touring anywhere (tons of Asian tourists taking pictures) is ten times worse in the place with the most Asians and people. We decide to go "off the beaten path" to visit the great wall... Well *off the beaten path is what we got*.
1hr public bus (tough w/o Chinese) then 1hr cab (just as tough) to small village to see the "wild wall," aka, the *other* 1,000 miles of it that are un-touristed, ruined, not restored, not open to the public, and covered in vegetation. Add an hour mountain climb, during which we're barely convinced we're even on a real trail & not just wondering about the Chinese wilderness like idiots, we reach a rickety ladder up a cliff face. Climb. Little Chinese man selling water, and *BEER if you can believe it,* has a hut there. We *then* climb a knotted rope up an incline to finally reach the breathtaking top of the mountain, and the two thousand year old ruins of China's great wall.
Yea we had to sit down for a minute. We had no idea what we'd gotten ourselves into. This thing was total rubble at some points, and vertical wall climbs at others, but always one wrong step away from falling to your death.
We traveled as far as we dared in either direction, took many pictures, and nearly shit ourselves many times, all the while we saw a total of probably ten other humans in the most populous country on earth. Arguably the most dangerous and awesome thing I've ever done in my life. 
So. Incredibly. Glad that we went through with it - there were countless times we doubted ourselves and nearly turned around.
Tl;dr - went to a ruined section of the great wall, should have died, didn't.
Album to follow if interest arrives by morning?
Guess I'll share one of mine since I can't sleep.
American friend teaching English in China, I think "when ELSE will I have bro guidance in China?!?" So I go visit. He speaks middling Chinese by that point, we have a great time in the city where he teaches (Fuzhou, Fujian province), go to Beijing. We learn quickly that the worst thing about touring anywhere (tons of Asian tourists taking pictures) is ten times worse in the place with the most Asians and people. We decide to go "off the beaten path" to visit the great wall... Well *off the beaten path is what we got*.
1hr public bus (tough w/o Chinese) then 1hr cab (just as tough) to small village to see the "wild wall," aka, the *other* 1,000 miles of it that are un-touristed, ruined, not restored, not open to the public, and covered in vegetation. Add an hour mountain climb, during which we're barely convinced we're even on a real trail & not just wondering about the Chinese wilderness like idiots, we reach a rickety ladder up a cliff face. Climb. Little Chinese man selling water, and *BEER if you can believe it,* has a hut there. We *then* climb a knotted rope up an incline to finally reach the breathtaking top of the mountain, and the two thousand year old ruins of China's great wall.
Yea we had to sit down for a minute. We had no idea what we'd gotten ourselves into. This thing was total rubble at some points, and vertical wall climbs at others, but always one wrong step away from falling to your death.
We traveled as far as we dared in either direction, took many pictures, and nearly shit ourselves many times, all the while we saw a total of probably ten other humans in the most populous country on earth. Arguably the most dangerous and awesome thing I've ever done in my life. 
So. Incredibly. Glad that we went through with it - there were countless times we doubted ourselves and nearly turned around.
Tl;dr - went to a ruined section of the great wall, should have died, didn't.
Album to follow if interest arrives by morning?
Wait define alone. Like you went and rented stuff and dove in? Or like you were the only one to take the snorkeling boat that day?
*Touching the void*
Jesus, what am I doing with my life?? I HAVE TOUCHED NO VOIDS THAT MUST HAVE BEEN AWESOME.
Strip clubs.
In man world it's such a rite of passage. I just find them depressing as Fuck.
EDIT: hi I would like to pay money for blue balls please.
CAUTION: If you go alone ALWAYS tell someone your route, and when you plan to be back, and stick to your route!!
See documentary: 128 hours. :/
I have 100megs/second plus hbo for $50 a month Comcast... 
It's been pretty stellar? All big companies are dicks in some ways. Maybe reddit owners have stock in the competitors of Comcast.
EDIT: aaand watch me lose all my karma for daring to be different YOU REDDIT LEMMINGS. <3
... I feel like 429 is more common in Vegas...
Printers.
Lol reddit HAS sent free pizzas to a lot of people in the past...
Thoroughly inspiring.
TL;DR: A company almost utterly destroys itself trying to pull a hostile takeover because a loved CEO's ggg behavior causes his employees & customers to fight tooth and nail to get him back when he gets screwed.
TIL: When people rise up against 1% douches, sometimes they actually win.
Religion. :(
This is actually true in many more senses than many of us probably realize. We're always wondering what this person is saying about us, what horribly embarrassing thing people remember about us, what thing we did to someone that we regret deeply.
In reality, most of the time *no one cares* ... That's a bit sad, but also *really* empowering when it comes to moving on from stuff.
This may be a suburban or rural phenomenon. It happened a lot when I was growing up country, but now I live in the city and I feel like everyone just loves everything and gets stoked just to talk about their favorites.
Unless they're old. Then they're just mad cuz bad loud.
My dad was the worst. I wish I could go back and apologize to all the coaches, you'd have thought I was Jesus.
No actually, dad, I was kinda shitty at baseball.
Clearly you've never been stapled in the eye.
Curtain rod quarterstaff ftw.
A blanket cannon, apparently.
Often I hear it said that women playing with their hair while you speak to them means they like you - not always true.
What IS true is if they favor a head angle most of the time while conversing with you - rather than straight on - they dig you.
Think about the last time someone turned out to be flirting with you. Not a level chin in that conversation, huh.
Source: Bartender. Seen a lot of flirting.
Dude rubber ice cube trays. They make getting ice painless, why would we have anything else.
Lol probably HOLY FUCKING SHIT ALIENS
We have this game we play at the bar I work at called "find the shortcake." Works like this: one of us will say "shortcake" to our co-worker when we notice an appropriate specimen. The co-worker must then search the bar for the woman with the most comically large nose worth "strawberry shortcaking" - ie, urban dictionary style. [Strawberry shortcake: *n* The action in which the male ejaculates on his partner's face, and then the male punches his partner's nose, which causes blood to stream forth. The semen and blood fluids create a red and white image, just like the icing and filling of a strawberry shortcake.]
We win if we both pick the same woman with a "great strawberry shortcake nose." This happens at least twice a night.
Yea we're both going to hell.
We have this game we play at the bar I work at called "find the shortcake." Works like this: one of us will say "shortcake" to our co-worker when we notice an appropriate specimen. The co-worker must then search the bar for the woman with the most comically large nose worth "strawberry shortcaking" - ie, urban dictionary style. [Strawberry shortcake: *n* The action in which the male ejaculates on his partner's face, and then the male punches his partner's nose, which causes blood to stream forth. The semen and blood fluids create a red and white image, just like the icing and filling of a strawberry shortcake.]
We win if we both pick the same woman with a "great strawberry shortcake nose." This happens at least twice a night.
Yea we're both going to hell.
Werd, the filthy karma whores. Back in my day you had to walk uphill both WAYS to get karma. And you had to think of your OWN posts the whole time.
Nice! Gotta lacquer or glass over the top, or its useless as a beer pong table tho. Ball will bounce da fuq all over the place.
Finally, a positive comment.
Thank you.
Probs get buried but same girl in my hs, multiple occasions.
Girl talking about her new golden retriever puppy. "Aw, what color is he?"
Fucking purple, Morgan.
Sent her into the hardware store to get plaid paint. That was a 45 minute debacle.
Sweet Jesus that's amazing.
Mmm.  I somewhat agree.  There is certainly a bit of stigma attached to "man approaches woman at bar," which I understand.
Oh man, this a thousand times over. I work at a city bar which gets all types, from creeps to beautiful women. I've been asked a couple of times by my more creepy kitchen staff guys when a woman happens to come back to talk to me or patronize the bar "oh man, how do you talk to 'those bitches,' man, I need to be talking to 'those bitches.'
It's pretty simple man. *talk to them like they're people.* Because they fucking *are,* Jesus. Why does anyone actually need to *say* that it's 2014.
We gotta define this death ring better, we talking hand to hand, hunger games style miles of territory or what?
A huge guy like "the mountain" of intimidating, but he's ONLY huge, whereas the world has thousands of insanely trained fighters. I've heard stories of the US's most decorated marksmen hitting a stop sign with a handgun at almost a mile.
Imagine the US's most medal winning special ops man, army ranger or navy seal vs. Russia's most decorated spesnaz operative? How about the black ops, agents and spies? Professional athletes?
We could spend hours on each category, let alone the best of them, and the best jokes.
That's exactly the point, I'm not talking about intervention of government in business, I'm talking about business intervention in government.
Learning, and continuing to learn more and more about this endless world.
My friends and I always said this alone would be the reason it would be hard to resist the opportunity to live for forever.
That's exactly what I'm saying, business intervention in government should be wiped out. It should be as taboo as executing someone by stoning because the bible said you should.
I remember this technique for its inevitable need when using chalk or charcoal in art.
I have no idea what just happened.
Same in China, except add cars to the mix and make the road 10 lanes with a crosswalk that's somehow frogger-like functional.
Lol edit: also if a car is beeping profusely it means they *will* kill you if you stay there, gtfo of their way.
China is the REAL land of the free, they just do not give a Fuck about anything. Safety regs. Beer drinking anywhere. Public pissing and shitting. Drive whatever you want wherever you want to. Even laws are only real if you get caught, the police are almost pretend. Two rules: don't criticize the government. Don't get caught.
In China, always bring toilet paper with you, they don't have it or use it in public restrooms.
"Don't say you don't have enough time. You have exactly the same number of hours per day that were given to Helen Keller, Pasteur, Michelangelo, Mother Teresa, Leonardo Da Vinci, Thomas Jefferson and Albert Einstein."
---H. Jackson Brown Jr.
A copy of "it's a wonderful life" and a note that says "minus the Christian metaphor"
Well I suppose that makes sense. A phobia of 'extremist behavior' (though it's really just thinking outside the norm) in a country with that kind of cross to bare regarding such behavior...
Had a convo with some Russian fellas at my bar that is relevant I think. They asked how I feel as an American about Russia invading Ukraine.
I said I think governments do what they want for resources and justify it how they want, and we all know they're full of shit - but it's the same in America. Most of us know what it really is. It seems it's the same in Germany, too.
You remind me so much of my friend Anna, who was an exchange student in the U.S.. I went to visit her in south Germany a few years ago. She spoke like you write, and had a love hate relationship with her country, too.
We're not so different, across this wide world, that's the thing that has always stood out to me when I've traveled it... And I've managed to travel it.
WHHHAAAATT HOW DID I NOT SEE THAT 
Lies its a changing link trick +10 internetz power
There was a dude who offered to chug an entire bottle of ketchup if X happened.
I forget what X was. But it happened. OP followed up with, yep, a full bottle ketchup chug.
I see what you didn't do there.
I find it pretty adorable that most top posts are of women describing their "lovable dorks" of husbands. ^_^
Dude just *why the Fuck*
Shit man, that sucks.
I knew drugs can really affect someone's behavior, but I had no idea something as simple birth control could.
Sounds like there was a lot going on in there tho. :/
What's the hardest thing about walking through a field of dead babies?
Hiding your erection.
Q: what do you get when you throw a dead baby down the stairs?
A: I dunno about you, but I get a HUGE erection.
Duuude I TOTALLY did that like three weeks ago!  Didn't make it to the hook up because it was painfully obvious she was out of her mind hammered.
Yea just let me pat myself on the back some more for not being a rapist.
Haha greetings, fellow strange child!
Edit: lol wait I totally misunderstood the question.
Meh.
Current me is trying to do everything, and would probably continue to do so.
Me #2 I'd send off to only be an actor.
Me #3 I'd tell "eat whatever you want, you're a writer," and he'd focus on the writer's life.
Me #4 I'd tell to start all of the insane business ideas he has, and starve and try to change the world.
Me #5 would start a band
Me #6 would be an electronic dj
Me #7 would go to film school
Me #8 would eat whatever he wants and be a comedian.
Me #9 would be a travel writer
Me #10 would be a stunt man
Justice man, master of mildly creative posts that get middling buzz.
Neon green. Nylon. Stuffed elephant.
So proud. It's like a symbol of how weird I was destined to be. FUCK TEDDY BEARS MOM I WANT THAT.
Exercise.
I know my mind is 10x more clear when I take the time to do a short run in the morning. Get the juices going.
...Experience *is* the best teacher...
"Marsupial generals Tuesday Garfield donut!!"
I think a string of nonsense would be the most unsettling of all.
Nothing.
Just walked your dog. Haven't found a trash can yet.
JAACKPOTTT
Ugh I'll feel like a real tool uploading a whole album of selfies with the attached random celebrities people have said on social media.
Ugh we were all high trying to play scrabble last week.
We had to Google whether motor was spelled M-O-T-E-R or not after it had been on the board for three turns already.
#2 cam.
90% of redditing? Done while pooping.
People keep telling me I look vaguely like a new celebrity all the time. Sometimes I get repeats, like Tom Brady, but usually it's some new B or C lister I turn out to have an extremely vague resemblance to when they pull it up on their phone.
Where does that come from I wonder, do I just have some almost universal celeb face? 
Sometimes they veer off on bitch fests and we all forget what we were even supposed to be answering.
ORIGINAL FOUR LOKO
SURGE
Lol zima.
Jk nobody wants that.
Pretty sure I can't love anyone.
Love of my life died in a car accident when I was young.
I still enjoy a great many things in this life. A beautiful day, laughter, having a ton of fun, traveling the world. I still find purpose in life, and have connected with many wonderful women, but I cannot move beyond respectful recognition of how wonderful they are - my heart is simply too fucked up from the trauma. I even notice less care for family. My dad was in the hospital, and I could barely care. I was unable.
It's pretty fucked.
UH, MA'AM, CAN YOU TELL US EXACTLY WTF??
Bluff bluff, bluff bluff bluff bluff.
RIGHT CARRY ON
Best fluke of the dice:
Me:  The Dragon circles back, rage in his eyes.
Player:  Ok, So, my swords cut through hardness - aka, this giant tree right?
Me:  Uh, Yea, but you'll have to do enough damage...? & there's a dragon?
*Player does enough damage*
Me:  Ok, the dragon is swooping in for the kill.
Player:  I push the tree on him.
Me:  ...Wut?
Player:  Yea, I... I push the tree on him.
Me:  Uh, ok?? ... Roll... to hit...?  There's a very low chance, of that connec-
*Nat20*
Player:  (  Ê– )  ... How much damage does a redwood do, bro?
Me: FFFFUUUUUUUUUU----------
> I have seen far more sad, lonely, mean and unseemly people than anything else. The good times happen, but alcohol is a depressant. All in all, bartenders have a job that involves human intervention in very awkward and dark way that overshadows the goodness. 
Damn man, I've been behind the bar five years, and I agree and disagree - but I can confirm that when shit is dark, it is *dark* ... like dude shaking at 10am downing two double grey gooses and clubs to start his day, then coming back to tell you all about how his brother was killed when he was 11 for being gay and vodka helps him forget, dark.
Like, lawyer hammered with his three kids, trash talking their mother to them, but I can't legally throw them out because we're still serving food, he knows that because he's a lawyer, and he tips insanely, so I have the most intense guilt conflict I've ever had to deal with as a bartender, dark.
Fuck man.
My dad once had a horse that was a total asshole until you gave him a bucket of beer.
He didn't like to party. But he did like to chill.
A real sword.
Seemed cool at the time. Pirate costume. Real prop.  But then everyone consumed alcohol...
<3 R.I.P. <3 Baxtor never forget...
Firearms.
Grain alcohol.
AAAH IT JUST KEEPS GETTING BETTER
I love drunk people.
Werd, dude. You do anything just for the money, you're gonna have a bad time.
Grumpy bartenders exist, they make me sad, but for the most part, I've had a killer time doing it. Our job is fucking awesome. I get to throw a party every night.
I've... I've been using security. Shouting. Tossing coasters. Bottle caps...
All the while I've had an incredible weapon at my side for the past five years, a weapon with potential that has only now been realized.
THANK YOU.
Edit: YES THERE WILL BE JUSTIICCEEEE
Pennsylvania in general in ma xp.
More places need that beer.
Oh yes, and we LOVE to bitch about them.
"PAH!! This man, drinking his swill, Coors light! Bah!! Practically water!!"
*sips his Miller lite*
Classic.
LOL ALLOWED.
Guys he thinks we're allowed.
This is so many bartenders, and it's just... So sad.
We have. The best. Fucking job. Ever.
Our job. Is to host a party.  Every night. 
Shots. Beers. Incredible food. Good music. Adult conversation with all walks of life.  Ladies to meet. Wine. Dessert.  Whiskey selection. Mixtures that blow minds. Tricks. These are my favorite things, and **I get paid really well to do them**, almost every night.
Do I sometimes have people "at my party" that annoy me? Sure. But you do anything just for the money, and you're gonna have a bad time... Especially if that involves drunk people.
Lol dude I love drunk people.
Tl;dr: Our job is awesome, grumpy bartenders are either just there for the money (& failures) or their boss sucks.
Lol but seriously, help your boy (or lady friend) hook up with a NON skeez / sloot when they really need it? You just made a customer for LIFE.
You've got all of the social power at the bar. You've seen that mixing bowl a hundred times on a Friday night, you know what ingredients go together, naa mean?
Anyway I've done it, but never for dudes (or ladies) unable to help themselves first and not be creepy as hell.
Lol watched my co-worker help get his SON laid one time, and they're both great people, still together. He's the REAL master.
Lol get your boy (or lady friend) a hook up when they REALLY need it, tho, with a NON skeez / sloot, and you've just made a customer for life.  
'Cause you know, man. You've seen this mixing bowl on a Friday night. You know where the cream of the crop is.
Watched my co-worker help het his SON some action one time. The true master.
Ooooh man, and when you get that check at the end of the night and it's $120 and that's WOAH MY GOD SO EXPENSIVE, now is NOT the time to save money by tipping me $5, you Fuck.
You already spent the money. I make $2.83 an hour man.
Bitch to me about pricing. I just pour the drinks man, I don't make the decisions. If you want to drink cheaply, go buy a 40 and a bottle of bankers club and gtfo of my bar.
If my prices are high and my bar is full of cool people, my bar obviously rocks.
In the meantime, my Manhattans are fucking fantastic and you'll be hammered off two of them for $22. Drink smarter.
Don't hold out on tipping until the end. I'll Assume you tip zero dollars ever, and promptly decide you're going thirsty - everyone else is paying to not be.
Ask me a million questions when I'm busy. Be indecisive when I'm busy. Take up loads of my time, there's only twenty other people in need of a drink.
Ladies, your never comes off lipstick looks fantastic. It never comes off my glassware, either.
If I'm really busy and you're hollering, waving, or repeating "hey, hey, hey, hey buddy, hey, hey" that's a one way ticket to be the LAST guy served, I promise you.
Sigh. I'm going to. But eff that guy man.
Similar crazy green idea.
Design sexy algae lamp for household use.
Sell as green sexy space age replacement for normal lamps that makes fresh oxygen.
Save the world.  
(One algae lamp scrubs more carbon out of the air in 1yr than a tree does in its lifetime)
Anyone know any bio engineers?
Design sexy algae lamp for household use.
Sell as green sexy space age replacement for normal lamps that makes fresh oxygen.
Save the world.  
(One algae lamp scrubs more carbon out of the air in 1yr than a tree does in its lifetime)
Anyone know any bio engineers?
Non violence is so key, we forget this time and time again.
How was Ghandi able to overthrow Britain on behalf of India in uttered peace? Not through protest. Through NON VIOLENT protest, because no government has a leg to stand on committing violence in the face of such careful peace.
With MLK it was the same - no matter what came for them, non violence was their answer, and no one could deny their righteousness.
Today, we ask ourselves why arrests are happening, why tear gas, in the face of peaceful protest, flood everywhere. The answer is most often because we give them a reason, a leg to stand on, through acting with violence or the threat of violence.
Only if flood everywhere remains peaceful can it's message remain as powerful as possible, and not polluted with the same imagery of anger and petty riots that plagued occupy, that allowed it to be shut down.
Tl:Dr, non violence is the RIGHT move man. It has been since Ghandi and MLK.
Absolutely. I always "drew the line" at something "that geeky."
Now I spend half an hour trying to convince anyone who'll listen how incredible dungeons and dragons is, and how most modern RPG's would never have existed without it, and use extremely similar systems.
"Dudes... It's like playing a video game... *in a book*
Death.
Ladies, when we ask you on dates, this, too.
I'm a big boy, if you're not interested, tell me so. Don't give me your number and be wishy washy for the next three months and confuse the hell out of me because you didn't want to say no in the first place, it's REALLY unkind. Much more hurtful and annoying than just saying "na, I'm seeing someone" and so forth.
ALSO THE OKTOBERFESTS
BRING OOON THE PUMPKINS
Lol Shit that's dark.
That's... That's beautiful.
Seriously, Hollywood, if you could quit remaking movies that have absolutely no reason to be remade, that'd be great.
"I'm sidin' with the blacks. Whites are gonna get their heads kicked in."
"No offense Harry. But you're a cunt. You've always been a cunt. All you're gonna do is go on BEING a cunt, and have some more cunt fucking kids."
IT'S A BIG FUCKING CANAL
What if I told you...
Sometimes people don't say what they actually want.
In high school biology, girls discussing the sky.
Girl1: The sky is blue because the sun reflects off of the ocean during the day right?
Girl2: OMG YAA TOTALLY.
Me: uh... I think it's blue because space is behind it and it's black, but some light from the sun is refracted by the air molecules, lightening it to blue.
Girl 1: NO that's wrong.
Me: uh. I'm pretty sure it's right. And when the sun is going down, the light is further refracted through even MORE layers of atmosphere, slowing the wavelength down to the red spectrum.
Girl 2: no, yea, that's totally wrong, you're stupid.
Girl 1: Yea my mom's a biologist, so.
-____-
I did look into it - Hep needs a month, so that one's out - its more common, but much less fatal.
Getting Typhoid fever vaccination done tomorrow.  Great idea with the index cards.
Haha well it was less of an IDGAF about my health, and more of an I don't give ENOUGH of a fuck about the .002% chance I'll contract something that worrywarts insist I will to bother getting vaccinated.
But point taken.  I'm looking into it.  :)
